Vol. I. C
THE HEIDENMAUER.
CHAPTER. I.
Stand you both forth now; stroke your chins, and swear by your
beards that I am a knave.
As You Like It
.
The
reader must imagine a narrow and secluded
valley, for the opening scene of this tale. The time
was that in which the day loses its power, casting
a light on objects most exposed, that resembles
colors seen through glass slightly stained; a
peculiarity
of the atmosphere, which, though almost of
daily occurrence in summer and autumn, is the
source of constant enjoyment to the real lover of
nature. The hue meant is not a sickly yellow, but
rather a soft and melancholy glory, that lends to
the hill-side and copse, to tree and tower, to stream
and lawn, those tinges of surpassing loveliness that
impart to the close of day its proverbial and
soothing charm. The setting sun touched with
oblique rays a bit of shaven meadow, that lay in a
dell so deep as to owe this parting smile of nature
to an accidental formation of the neighboring
eminences
,
a distant mountain crest, that a flock had
cropped and fertilized, a rippling current that glided
in the bottom, a narrow beaten path, more worn by
hoof than wheel, and a vast range of forest, that
swelled and receded from the view, covering leagues
of a hill-chase, that even tradition had never peopled.
The spot was seemingly as retired as if it had been
chosen in one of our own solitudes of the wilderness;
while it was, in fact, near the centre of Europe, and
in the sixteenth century. But, notwithstanding the
absence of dwellings, and all the other signs of the
immediate presence of man, together with the
wooded character of the scene, an American eye
would not have been slow to detect its
distinguishing
features, from those which mark the wilds of
this country. The trees, though preserved with
care, and flourishing, wanted the moss of ages, the
high and rocking summit, the variety and natural
wildness of the western forest. No mouldering
trunk lay where it had fallen, no branch had been
twisted by the gale and forgotten, nor did any
upturned
root betray the indifference of man to the
decay of this important part of vegetation. Here
and there, a species of broom, such as is seen
occasionally
on the mast-heads of ships, was erected
above some tall member of the woods that stood on
an elevated point; land-marks which divided the
rights of those who were entitled to cut and clip;
the certain evidence that man had long before
extended
his sway over these sombre hills, and that,
retired as they seemed, they were actually subject
to all the divisions, and restraints, and vexations,
which, in peopled regions, accompany the rights of
property.
For an hour preceding the opening of our tale,
not a sound of any nature, beyond that of a
murmuring
brook, had disturbed the quiet of the silent
little valley, if a gorge so narrow, and in truth so
wild, deserved the name. There was not even a
bird fluttering among the trees, nor a hawk soaring
above the heights. Once, and for a minute only,
did a roebuck venture from its cover, and descend
to the rivulet to drink. The animal had not
altogether
the elastic bound, the timid and irresolute
movement, nor the wandering eye of our own deer,
but it was clearly an inhabitant of a forest; for
while it in some degree confided in the protection,
it also distrusted the power of man. No sooner was
its thirst assuaged, than listening with the keenness
of an instinct that no circumstances of accidental
condition could destroy, it went up the acclivity
again, and sought its cover with troubled steps. At
the same instant, a grayhound leaped from among
the trees, on the opposite side of the gorge, into the
path, and began bounding back and forth, in the
well-known manner of that species of dog, when
exercising in restlessness, rather than engaged in
the hot strife of the chase. A whistle called the
hound back from its gambols, and its master entered
the path.
A cap of green velvet, bearing a hunting-horn
above the shade, a coarse but neat frock of similar
color, equally ornamented with the same badge of
office, together with the instrument itself suspended
from a shoulder, and the arms usual to one of that
class, denoted a forester, or an individual charged
with the care of the chase, and otherwise intrusted
with a jurisdiction in the forest; functions that
would be much degraded by the use of the abused
and familiar term of gamekeeper.
The forester was young, active, and,
notwithstanding
the rudeness of his attire, of a winning
exterior
.
Laying his fusee against the root of a tree,
he whistled in the dog, and renewing the call, by
means of a shrill instrument that was carried for
that purpose, he soon succeeded in bringing its
fellow
to his side. Coupling the grayhounds in a leash,
which he attached to his own person, he threw the
horn from its noose, and blew a lively and short
strain, that rolled up the valley in mellow and
melodious
notes. When the instrument was removed
from his lips, the youth listened till the last of the
distant echoes was done, as if expecting some reply.
He was not disappointed. Presently an answering
blast came down the gorge, ringing among the
woods, and causing the hearts of many of its
tenants
to beat quick and fearfully. The sounds of the
unseen instrument were far more shrill and wild
than those of the hunting horn, while they wanted
not for melancholy sweetness. They appeared both
familiar and intelligible to the young forester, who
no sooner heard them, than he slung the horn in its
usual turn of the cord, resumed the fusee, and stood
in an attitude of expectation.
It might have been a minute before another youth
appeared in the path, higher in the gorge, and
advancing
slowly towards the forester. His dress
was rustic, and altogether that of a peasant, while
in his hand he held a long, straight, narrow tube of
cherry wood, firmly wrapped with bark, having a
mouth-piece and a small bell at the opposite end,
resembling those of a trumpet. As he came forward,
his face was not without an expression of ill humor,
though it was rather rendered comic than grave, by
a large felt hat, the front rim of which fell in an
enormous shade above his eyes, rendering the trim
cock in the rear, ludicrously pretending. His legs,
like those of the forester, were encased in a sort of
leathern hose, that left the limbs naked and free
below the knee, while the garment above set so
loosely and unbuttoned above that important joint,
as to offer no restraint to his movements.
Thou art behind thy time, Gottlob, said the
young forester, as the boor approached, and the
good hermit will not give us better welcome for
keeping him from prayer. What has become of
thy herd?
That may the holy man of the Heidenmauer
declare, for it is more than I could answer were
Lord Emich himself to put the question, and say, in
the manner he is wont to use to the Abbot of
Limburg
what
hath become of thy herd, Gottlob?
C 2
Nay, this is no trifling matter, if thou hast, in
sooth, let the cattle stray! Where hadst thou the
beasts last in sight?
Here in the forest of Hartenburg, Master
Berchthold, on the honor of an humble servitor of
the Count.
Thou wilt yet lose this service, Gottlob, by thy
carelessness!
It would be a thousand pities were thy words
to be true, for in that case Lord Emich would lose
the honestest cow-herd in Germany, and it would
go near to break my heart were the friars of
Limburg
to get him! But the beasts cannot be far, and
I will try the virtue of the horn once more, before I
go home to a broken head and a discharge. Dost
thou know, Master Berchthold, that the disgrace of
which thou speakest never yet befell any of my
family, and we have been keepers of cattle longer
than the Friedrichs have been electors!
The forester made an impatient gesture, patted
his hounds, and waited for the effects of the new
blast, that his companion was by this time preparing
to sound. The manner of Gottlob was that of
entire
confidence in his own knowledge of his calling,
for notwithstanding his words, his countenance at
no time betrayed uneasiness for the fate of his trust.
The valley was soon ringing with the wild and
plaintive tones of the cherry-wood horn, the hind
taking care to give the strains those intonations,
which, by a mute convention, had from time
immemorial
been understood as the signal for
collecting
a lost herd. His skill and faith were soon
rewarded
,
for cow after cow came leaping out of the
forest, as he blew his air, and ere long the necessary
number of animals were in the path, the younger
beasts frisking along the way, with elevated tails
and awkward bounds, while the more staid
contributors
of the dairy hurried on, with business-like air,
but grave steps, as better became their years and
their characters in the hamlet. In a few minutes
they were all collected around the person of the
keeper, who having counted his charge, shouldered
his horn, and disposed himself to proceed towards
the lower extremity of the gorge.
Thou art lucky to have gotten the beasts
together
,
with so little trouble, Gottlob, resumed the
forester, as they followed in the train of the herd.
Say dexterous, Master Berchthold, and do not
fear to make me vain-glorious. In the way of
understanding
my own merits there is little danger of
doing me harm. Thou shouldest never discourage
modesty, by an over-scrupulous discretion. It would
be a village miracle, were a herd so nurtured in the
ways of the church to forget its duty!
The forester laughed, but he looked aside, like
one who would not see that to which he wished to
be blind.
At thy old tricks, friend Gottlob! Thou hast
let the beasts roam upon the range of the friars!
I have paid Peter's pence, been to the chapel of
St. Benedict for prayer, confessed to Father Arnolph
himself, and all within the month: what more need
a man do, to be in favor with the Brothers?
I could wish to know if thou ever entertainest
Father Arnolph with the history of thy visits to the
pastures of the convent, with Lord Emich's herd,
honest Gottlob.
So! Dost thou fancy, Master Berchthold, that,
at a moment when there is every necessity to
possess
a calm and contemplative spirit, I should strive
to put the pious monk in a passion, by relating all
the antics of some ill-bred cow, or of a heifer, who
is as little to be trusted without a keeper, as your
jung-frau before she reaches the years of caution is
to be trusted at a fair without her mother, or a
sharp-sighted old aunt, at the very least!
Well, have a care, Gottlob, for Lord Emich,
though loving the friars so little, will be apt to order
thee into a dungeon, on bread and water for a
week, or to make thy back acquainted with the lash,
should he come to hear that one of his hinds has
taken this liberty with the rights of a neighbor.
Let Lord Emich then expel the brotherhood
from the richest pasturage near the Jaegerthal.
Flesh and blood cannot bear to see the beasts of a
noble digging into the earth with their teeth, after
a few bitter herbs, while the carrion of a convent
are rolling the finest and sweetest grasses over their
tongues. Look you, Master Berchthold, these friars
of Limburg eat the fattest venison, drink the
warmest
wine, and say the shortest prayers of any monks
in Christendom! Potz-Tausend! There are some
who accuse them, too, of shriving the prettiest
girls! As for bread and water, and a dungeon, I
know from experience that neither of the remedies
agrees with a melancholy constitution, and I defy
the Emperor, or even the Holy Father himself, to
work such a miracle, as to make back of mine
acquainted with the lash.
Simply because the introduction hath long since
had place.
That is thy interpretation of the matter, Master
Berchthold, and I wish thee joy of a quick wit.
But we are getting beyond the limits of the forest,
and we will dismiss the question to another
conversation
.
The beasts are full, and will not disappoint
the dairy girls, and little matters it whence the
nourishment comesLord Emich's pastures or a
churchly miracle. Thou hast hunted the dogs
lightly to-day, Berchthold?
I have had them on the mountains for air and
movement. They got away on the heels of a
roebuck
,
for a short run, but as all the game in this
chase belongs to our master, I did not see fit to let
them go faster than there was need.
I rejoice to hear thee say, it, for I count upon
thy company in climbing the mountain when our
work is ended; thy legs will only be the fresher for
the toil.
Thou hast my word, and I will not fail thee; in
order that no time be lost, we will part here to meet
again in the hamlet.
The forester and the cow-herd made signs of
leave-taking, and separated. The former quitted
the public road, turning short to the right by a
private
way, which led him across narrow meadows,
and the little river that glided among them, towards
the foot of the opposite mountain. Gottlob held on
his course to a hamlet that was now visible, and
which completely filled a narrow pass in the valley,
at a point where the latter made a turn, nearly at a
right angle with its general direction.
The path of the former led him to an habitation
very different from the rude dwellings towards
which the steps of the cow-herd tended. A massive
castle occupied a projecting point of the mountain,
overhanging the cluster of houses in the gorge, and
frowning upon all that attempted the pass. The
structure was a vast but irregular pile. The more
modern parts were circular salient towers, that were
built upon the uttermost verge of the rock, from
whose battlements it would not have been difficult
to cast a stone into the road, and which denoted
great attention to strength in their masonry, while
beauty of form and of workmanship, as they were
understood at the period of which we write, were
not entirely neglected. These towers, though large,
were mere appendages to the main building, which,
seen from the position now before the mind of the
reader, presented a confused maze of walls,
chimneys
,
and roofs. In some places, the former rose
from the greensward which covered the hill-side;
while in others, advantage had been taken of the
living rock, which was frequently so blended with
the pile it supported, both being of the same reddish
free-stone, that it was not easy at the first glance to
say, what had been done by nature and what by art.
The path of the forester led from the valley up
the mountain, by a gradual and lateral ascent to a
huge gate, that opened beneath a high arch,
communicating
with a court within. On this side of the
castle there was neither ditch, nor bridge, nor any
other of the usual defences, beyond a portcullis, for
the position of the hold rendered these precautions
in a measure unnecessary. Still great care had
been taken to prevent a surprise, and it would have
required a sure foot, a steady head, and vigorous
limbs, to have effected an entrance into the edifice,
by any other passage than its gate.
When Berchthold reached the little terrace that
lay before the portal, he loosened his horn, and,
standing on the verge of the precipice, blew a
hunting
strain, apparently in glee. The music echoed
among the hills as suited the spot, and more than
one crone of the hamlet suspended her toil, in dull
admiration, to listen to its wild effect. Replacing
the instrument, the youth spoke to his hounds and
passed beneath the portcullis, which happened to be
raised at the moment.
CHAPTER II.
What sayest thou to a hare, or the melancholy of moor-ditch!
King Henry IV
.
The
light had nearly disappeared from the gorge,
in which the hamlet of Hartenburg lay, when
Berchthold descended from the castle, by a path
different from that by which he had entered it an
hour before, and crossing the rivulet by a bridge of
stone, he ascended the opposite bank into the street,
or rather the road. The young forester having
kennelled the hounds, had laid aside his leash and
fusee, but he still kept the horn suspended from his
shoulder. At his side, too, he carried a
couteau-de-chasse
,
a useful instrument of defence in that age
and country, as well as a weapon he was entitled
to carry, in virtue of his office under the Count of
Lienengen-Hartenburg, the master of the hold he
had just quitted, and the feudal lord of most of the
adjoining mountains, as well as of sundry villages
on the plain of the Palatinate. It would seem that
the cow-herd expected his associate, or perhaps we
might venture to call him friend, for such in truth
did he appear to be, by the easy terms on which
they met. Gottlob was in waiting near the cottage
of his mother, and when the two joined each other,
they communicated by a sign, and proceeded with
swift steps, leaving the cluster of houses.
Immediately on quitting the hamlet, the valley
expanded, and took that character of fertility and
cultivation, which has been described to the reader
in the Introduction; for all who have perused that
opening and necessary preface to our labors, will at
once recognize that the two youths introduced to
their acquaintance, were now in the mountain basin
which contained the Abbey of Limburg. But three
centuries, while they have effected little in altering
the permanent features of the place, have wrought
essential changes in those which were more
perishable
.
As the young men moved swiftly on, the first rays
of the moon touched the tops of the mountains, and
ere they had gone a mile, always holding the
direction
of the pass which communicated with the
valley
of the Rhine, the towers and roofs of the Abbey
itself were illuminated. The conventual buildings
were then perfect, resembling, by their number and
confusion, the grouping of some village, while a
strong and massive wall encircled the entire brow
of the isolated hill. The construction resembled
one of those warlike ecclesiastical princes of the
middle ages, who wore armor beneath the stole; for
while the towers and painted windows, the pious
memorials and votive monuments, denoted the
objects
of the establishment, the defences betrayed
that as much dependence was placed on human as
on other means, for the protection of those who
composed the brotherhood.
There is a moon for a monk as well as for a
cow-herd, it would seem, observed Gottlob,
speaking
however in a voice subdued nearly to a
whisper
.
There comes the light upon the high tower
of the Abbey, and presently it will be glistening on
the bald head of every straggler of the convent,
who is abroad tasting the last vintage, or otherwise
prying into the affairs of some burgher of
Deurckheim
!
Thou hast not much reverence for the pious
fathers, honest Gottlob; for it is seldom thou lettest
opportunity pass to do them an ill turn, with tongue
or hungry beast.
Look you, Berchthold, we vassals are little
more than so much clear water in which our master
may see his own countenance, and at need his own
humors. Whenever Lord Emich has a sincere
hatred
for man or horse, dog or cat, town or village,
monk or count, I know not why it is so, but I feel
my own choler rise, until I am both ready and
willing
to strike when he striketh, to curse when he
curseth, and even to kill when he killeth.
'Tis a good temper for a servitor, but it is to be
hoped, for the sake of Christian credit, that the
sympathy
does not end here, but that thy affections are
as social as thy dislikes.
More so, as there is faith in man! Count Emich
is a huge lover of a venison pasty of a morning,
and I feel a yearning for it the day longCount
Emich will dispatch you a bottle of Deurckheim in
an hour, whereas two would scarce show my zeal
for his honor in the same time; and as for other
mortifications of this nature, I am not the man to
desert my master for want of zeal.
I believe thee, Gottlob, said Berchthold
laughing
,
and even more than thou canst find words to
say in thine own favor, on topics like these. But,
after all, the Benedictines are churchmen, and sworn
to their faith and duty, as well as any bishop in
Germany
;
and I do not see the cause of all the dislike
of either lord or vassal.
Ay, thou art in favor with some of the fraternity,
and it is rare that the week passes in which thou art
not kneeling before some of their altars; but with
me the case is different, for since the penance
commanded
for that affair of dealing a little freely with
one of their herds, I have small digestion for their
spiritual food.
And yet thou hast paid Peter's pence, said thy
prayers, and confessed thy sins to Father Arnolph,
and all within the month!
What wouldst thou have of a sinner? I gave the
money on the promise of having it back with usury;
Vol. I. D
I prayed on account of an accursed tooth that
torments
me, at times, in a manner worse than a
damned soul is harrowed; and as to confession, ever
since my uncommon candor, concerning the herd,
got me into that penance, I confess under favor of a
proper discretion. To tell the truth, Master
Berchthold
,
the church is something like a two-year old
wife; pleasant enough when allowed her own way,
but a devil of a vixen when folded against her will.
The young forester was thoughtful and silent, and
as they were now in the vicinity of the hamlet which
belonged to the friars of Limburg, his loquacious
and prurient companion saw fit to imitate his reserve,
from a motive of prudence. The little artificial
lake mentioned in the Introduction was in existence,
at the time of our tale; but the inn, with the
ambitious
sign of the anchor, is the fruit of far more
modern enterprise. When the young men reached
a ravine, that opened into the mountain near the
present site of this tavern, they turned aside from
the high road, first taking care to observe that no
curious eye watched their movements.
Here commenced a long and somewhat painful
ascent, by means of a rough path, that was only
lighted in spots by the rising moon. The vigorous
limbs of the forester and the cow-herd, however,
soon carried them to the summit of the most
advanced
spur of the adjoining mountain, where they
arrived upon an open health-like plain. Although
the discourse between them had been maintained
during the ascent, it was in more subdued tones even
than when beneath the walls of Limburg, the spirits
of Gottlob appearing to ooze away the higher he
mounted.
This is a dreary and a courage-killing waste,
Berchthold, whispered the cow-herd, as his foot
touched the level ground; and it is even more
disheartening
to enter on it by the aid of the moon,
than in the dark. Hast ever been nearer to the
Teufelstein, at this hour?
I came upon it once at midnight; for it was
there I made acquaintance with him that we are now
about to visitDid I never relate the manner of
that meeting?
What a habit hast thou of taxing a memory!
Perhaps if thou wert to repeat it, I might recall the
facts by the time thou wert ended; and to speak
truth, thy voice is comfortable on this sprite's
common
.
The young forester smiled, but without derision,
for he saw that his companion, spite of his
indifference
to all grave subjects, was, as is generally the
case, the most affected of the two when put to a
serious trial, and perhaps he also remembered the
difference that education had made in their powers
of thinking. That he did not treat the subject as
one of light import himself, was also apparent by the
regulated and cautious manner in which he
delivered
the following account.
I had been on the chases of Lord Emich since
the rising of the sun, commenced Berchthold, for
there was need of more than common vigilance to
watch the neighboring boors. The search had led
me far into the hills, and the night came, not as it is
now seen, but so pitchy dark, that, accustomed as I
was from childhood to the forest, it was not possible
to tell the direction of even a star, much less that
of the Castle. For hours I wandered, hoping at
each moment to reach the opening of the valley,
when I found myself of a sudden in a field that
appeared
endless and uninhabited.
AyThat was this devil's ball-room!thou
meanest untenanted by man.
Hast thou ever known the helplessness of being
lost in the forest, Gottlob?
In my own person, never, Master Berchthold;
but in that of my herd, it is a misfortune that often
befalls me, sinner that I am!
I know not that sympathy with thy cows can
teach thee the humiliation and depression that come
over the mind, when we stand on this goodly earth,
cut off from all communication with our fellows, in
a desert, though surrounded by living men, deprived
of the senses of sight and hearing for useful ends,
and with all the signs of God before the eyes, and yet
with none of the common means of enjoying his
bounty, from having lost the clue to his intentions.
Must the teeth, of necessity, be idle, or the throat
dry, Master Forester, because the path is hid?
At such a moment the appetites are quieted, in
the grand desire to return to our usual
communication
with the earth. It is like being restored to the
helplessness of infancy, with all the wants and habits
of manhood besetting the character and wishes.
If thou callest such a condition a restoration,
friend Berchthold, I shall make interest with St.
Benedict that I may remain deposed to the end of
my days.
I weigh not the meaning of every word I utter,
with the recollection of that helpless moment so
fresh. But it was when the desolate feeling was
strongest, that I roved out of the chase upon this
mountain heath; there appeared something before
my sight, that seemed a house, and by a bright light
that glittered, as I fancied, at a window, I felt again
restored to intercourse with my kind.
Thou usest thy terms with more discretion now,
said the cow-herd, fetching a heavy breath, like one
who was glad the difficulty had found a termination.
I hope it was the abode of some substantial tenant
of Lord Emich, who was not without the means of
comforting a soul in distress.
Gottlob, the dwelling was no other than the
Teufelstein, and the light was a twinkling star, that
chance had brought in a line with the rock.
I take it for granted, Master Berchthold, thou
didst not knock twice for admission at that door!
I am not much governed by the vulgar legends
and womanish superstitions of our hills, but
Softlysoftlyfriend forester; what thou
callest
by names so irreverent, are the opinions of all
who dwell in or about Deurckheim; knight or monk
burgher or count, has equally a respect for our
venerable traditions. Tausand Sechs und
Zwanziges
!
what would become of us, if we had not a
gory tale, or some alarming and reverend spectacle
of this sort, to set up against the penances, and
prayers, and masses of the Friars of Limburg!As
much wisdom and philosophy as thou wilt,
foster-brother
of mine, but leave us our Devil, if it be
only to make battle against the Abbot!
Notwithstanding thy big words, I well know that
none among us has, at heart, a greater dread of this
very hill than thyself, Gottlob! I have seen thee
sweat cold drops from thy forehead, in crossing the
heath after night-fall.
Art quite sure 'twas not the dew? We have
heavy falls of that moisture in these hills, when the
earth is parched!
Let it then be the dew.
To oblige thee, Berchthold, I would willingly
swear it was a water-spout. But what didst thou
make of the rock and the star?
I could change the nature of neither. I pretend
not to thy indifference to the mysterious power that
rules the earth, but thou well knowest that fear
never yet kept me from this hill. When a near
approach
showed me my error, I was about to turn
away, not without crossing myself and repeating
an Ave, as I am ready to acknowledge; but a
D 2
glance upward convinced me that the stone was
occupied
Occupied?I have always known that it was
possessed, but never before did I think it was
occupied
!
There was one seated on its uppermost
projection
,
as plainly to be seen as the rock itself.
Whereupon thou madest manifest that good
speed which has gained thee the favor of the Count,
and thy post of forester.
I hope the nerve to put the duties of my office
in practice, had their weight with Lord Emich,
rejoined
Berchthold, a little quickly. I did not run,
Gottlob, but I spoke to the being who had chosen a
seat so remarkable, and at that late hour.
Spite of his spirits and affected humor, the
cowherd
unconsciously drew nearer to his companion,
casting at the same time an oblique glance in the
direction
of the suspected rock.
Thou seemest troubled, Gottlob.
Dost thou think I am without bowels? What,
shall a friend of mine be in this strait, and I not
troubled! Heaven save thee, Berchthold, were the
best cow in my herd off her stomach, I could not
be in greater concern. Hadst any answer?
I hadand the result has gone to show me,
returned the forester, musing as he spoke, like one
who was obtaining glimpses of long-concealed truth,
that our fears oftentimes prevent us from seeing
things as they are, and are the means of nourishing
our mistakes. I got an answer, and certainly,
contrary
to what most in Deurckheim would have
believed
,
it was given in a human voice.
That was encouraging, though it were hoarser
than the roaring of a bull!
It spoke mildly and in reason, Gottlob, as thou
wilt readily believe, when I tell thee it was no
other than the voice of the Anchorite of the Cedars.
Our acquaintance then and there commenced, since
which time, as thou knowest well, it hath not flagged
for want of frequent visits to his abode, on my part.
The cow-herd walked on in silence, for more than
a minute, and then stopping short, he abruptly
addressed
his companion:
And this then hath been thy secret, Berchthold,
concerning the manner of commencing on thy new
friendship.
There is no other. I well knew how much thou
wert fettered by the opinions of the country, and
was afraid of losing thy company in these visits,
were I, without caution, to tell all the circumstances
of our interview. But now thou hast become known
to the anchorite, I do not fear thy desertion.
Never count upon too many sacrifices from thy
friends, Master Berchthold! The mind of man is
borne upon by so many fancies, is ruled by so many
vagaries, and tormented by so many doubts, when
there is question concerning the safety of the body,
to say nothing of the soul, that I know no more rash
confidence, than to count too securely on the
sacrifices
of a friend.
Thou knowest the path, and can return by
thyself
,
to the hamlet, if thou wilt, said the forester
peevishly, and not without severity.
There are situations in which it is as difficult to
go back as to go forward, observed Gottlob; else,
Berchthold, I might take thee at thy word, and go
back to my careful mother, a good supper, and a
bed that stands between a picture of the Virgin, one
of St. Benedict, and one of my Lord the Count.
But for my concern for thee, I would not go another
foot towards the camp.
Do as thou wilt, said the forester, who
appeared
,
however, to know the apprehension his
companion
felt of being left alone in that solitary and
suspected
spot, and who turned his advantage to good
account, by quickening his pace in such a manner as
would soon have left Gottlob to his own
thick-coming
fancies, had he not diligently imitated his gait.
Thou canst tell the people of Lord Emich, that
thou abandoned me on this hill.
Nay, returned Gottlob, making a merit of
necessity
,
if I do that, or say that, may they make a
Benedictine of me, and the Abbot of Limburg to
boot!
As the cow-herd, who felt all his master's
antipathies
against their religious neighbors, expressed
this determination in a voice strong as his resolution,
confidence was restored between the friends, who
continued their progress with swift paces. The
place was, sooth to say, one every way likely to
quicken any dormant seeds of superstition that
education
,
or tradition, or local opinions had implanted
in the human breast.
By this time our adventurers had approached a
wood of low cedars, which, apparently encircled in
a round wall that was composed of a confused but
vast pile of fallen stones, grew upon the advanced
spur of the hills. Behind them lay the heath-like
plain, while the bald rock which the moon-beams
had just lighted, raising its head from out of the
earth, resembled some gloomy monument placed in
the centre of the waste, to mark and to render
obvious
,
by comparison, the dreary solitude of the
naked fields. The back-ground was the dark slopes
and ridges of the forest of the Haart mountains.
On their right was the glen, or valley, from which
they had just ascended; and on their front, looking
a little obliquely from the grove, the plain of the
Palatinate, which lay in misty obscurity, like a dim
sea of cultivation, hundreds of feet beneath their
elevated stand.
It was rare, indeed, that any immediate dependant
of the Count Emich, and more especially any of
those who dwelt in or about his castle, and who
were likely to be called into his service at an
unexpected
moment, ventured so far from the fortress,
and in the direction of the hostile Abbey, without
providing himself with the means of offence and
defence
.
Berchthold wore, as wont, his hunting-knife,
or the short straight sword, which to this day is
carried by that description of European dependant
called a chasseur, and who is seen, degraded to the
menial offices of a footman, standing behind the
carriages of ambassadors and princes, reminding
the observant spectator of the regular and certain
decadency of the usages of feudal times. Neither
had Gottlob been neglectful of his personal security,
as respects human foes; for on the subject of
resisting
all such attacks, his manhood was above
reproach
,
as had been proved in more than one of
those bloody frays, which in that age were of
frequent
occurrence between the vassals of the minor
German princes. The cow-herd had provided
himself
with a heavy weapon that his father had often
wielded in battle, and which needed all the vigor of
the muscular arm of the son, to flourish with a due
observance of the required positions and attitudes.
Fire-arms were of too much value and of too
imperfect
use to be resorted to on every light occasion,
like that which had now drawn the foster-brothers,
for such supported by long habit was the secret of
the intimacy between the forester and the cow-herd,
from their hamlet to the hill of Deurckheim.
Berchthold loosened his couteau-de-chasse, as he
turned by an ancient gate-way, whose position was
known merely by an interruption of the ditch that
had protected this face of the wall, and an opening
in the wall itself, to enter the inclosure, which the
reader will at once recognize as the Pagan's Camp
of the Introduction. At the same moment Gottlob
cast his heavy weapon from his shoulder, and
grasped its handle in a more scientific manner.
There was certainly no enemy visible to justify
these movements, but the increasing solitude of the
place, and that impression of danger which besets
the faculties, when we find ourselves in situations
favorable to deeds of violence, probably induced the
double and common caution. The light of the
moon, which was not yet full, had not sufficient
power to penetrate the thick branches of the cedars;
and when the youths were fairly beneath the gloomy
foliage, although not left in the ordinary darkness
of a clouded night, they were perhaps in that very
species of dull and misty illumination, which, by
leaving objects uncertain while visible, is the best
adapted to undermine the confidence of a distrustful
spirit. There was little wind, but the sighs of the
night air were plaintively audible, while the
adventurers
picked their way among the fragments of the
place.
It has been elsewhere said, that the Heidenmauer
was originally a Roman camp. The warlike and
extraordinary people who had erected these
advanced
works on the remotest frontier of their wide
empire, had, of course, neglected none of the means
that were necessary, under the circumstances,
either for their security or for their comfort. The
first had been sufficiently obtained by the nearly
isolated position of the hill, protected, as it was, by
walls so massive and so high as those must have
been, which had consumed the quantity of materials
still visible in the large circuit that remained; while
the interior furnished abundant proofs that the latter
had not been neglected, in its intersecting remains,
over which Gottlob more than once stumbled, as
he advanced into the shadows of the place. Here
and there, a ruined habitation, more or less
dilapidated
,
was still standing, furnishing, like the
memorable
remains of Pompeii and Herculaneum,
interesting
and infallible evidence of the usages of those
who have so long since departed to their eternal
rest. It would seem, by the rude repairs which
rather injured than embellished these touching,
though simple monuments of what the interior of the
camp had been in its day of power and pride, that
modern adventurers had endeavored to turn them
to account, by converting the falling huts into
habitations
appropriated to their own temporary uses.
All, however, appeared to have been long before
finally abandoned; for as Berchthold and his
companion
stole cautiously among the crumbling stones,
the gaping rents and roofless walls denoted hopeless
decay. At length the youths paused, and fastened
their looks in a common direction, as if apprized
that they were near the goal of their expedition.
In a part of the grove, where the cedars grew
more dense and luxuriant than on most of that
stony and broken soil, stood a single low building,
which, of all there, had the air of being still
habitable
.
Like the others, it either had been originally
constructed by the masters of the world, or restored
on the foundations of some Roman construction by
the followers of Attila, who, it will be remembered,
had passed a winter in this camp; and it was now
rendered weather-proof by the usual devices of the
poor and laborious. There was a single window, a
door, and a rude chimney, which the climate and
the elevated situation of the place rendered nearly
indispensable. The light of a dim torch shone
through the former, the only sign that the hut was
tenanted; for on the exterior, with the exception of
the rough repairs just mentioned, all around it lay
in the neglected and eloquent stillness of ruin. The
reader will not imagine, in this description, any of
that massive grandeur which so insensibly attaches
itself to most that is connected with the Roman
name; for while, in the nature of things, the most
ponderous and the most imposing of the public
works of that people are precisely those which are
the most likely to have descended to our own times,
the traveller often meets with memorials of their
power, that are so frail and perishable in their
construction
,
as to owe their preservation, in a great
measure, to an accidental combination of
circumstances
favorable to such a result. Still, the Roman
was ordinarily as much greater in little things, if
connected with a public object, as he excelled all
who have succeeded him, in those which were of
more importance. The Ringmauer, or
Heidenmauer
,
is a strong proof of what we say. There is
not an arch, nor a tomb, nor a gate, nor a paved
road of any description in the vicinity of
Deurckheim
,
to show that the post was more than a
temporary
military position; and yet the presence of its
former occupants is established by more evidence
than would probably be found, a century hence,
were half of the present cities of Christendom to be
suddenly abandoned. But these evidences are rude,
and suited to the objects which had brought them
into existence.
The forester and the cow-herd stood long
regarding
the solitary hut, which had arrested their looks,
like men hesitating to proceed.
I had more humor for the company of the
honest
anchorite, Master Berchthold, said the latter,
before thou madest me acquainted with his
fondness
for taking the night air on the Teufelstein.
Thou hast not fear, Gottlob? Thou, who
bearest
so good a name for courage among our youths!
I shall be the last to accuse myself of cowardice,
or of any other discreditable quality, friend forester;
but prudence is a virtue in a youth, as the Abbot of
Limburg himself would swear, were he here
He is not present in his own reverend and
respected
person, said a voice so nigh the ear of
Gottlob, as to cause him to jump nimbly aside; but
one who may humbly represent some portion of his
sanctity, is not wanting to affirm the truth of what
thou sayest, son.
The startled young men saw that a monk of the
opposite mountain had unexpectedly appeared
between
them. They were on the lands of the Abbey,
or rather on ground in dispute between the burghers
of Deurckheim and the convent, but actually in
possession
of the latter; and they felt the insecurity of
their situation as the dependants of the count of
Hartenburg. Neither spoke, therefore, for each
was striving to invent some plausible pretext for his
appearance in a place so unfrequented, and which,
in general, was held in so little favor by the
neighboring
peasantry.
You are youths of Deurckheim? asked the
monk, endeavoring to observe their features by the
imperfect light that penetrated the foliage of the
dark cedars. Gottlob, whose besetting infirmity was
a too exuberant fluency of tongue, took on himself
the task of answering.
We are youths, reverend father, he said, as
thy quick and sagacious sight hath so well seen. I
will not deny my years, and if I would, the devil,
who besets all between fifteen and five-and-twenty
in the shape of some giddy infirmity, would soon
betray the imposture.
Of Deurckheim, son?
As there is question between the Abbey and the
town concerning these hills, we might not stand any
better in thy favor, holy Benedictine, sere we to
say yes.
In that suspicion, thou dost little justice to the
Abbey, son: we may defend the rights of the
Church, confided in their temporalities as they are
to an unworthy and sinful brotherhood, without
feeling
any uncharitableness against those who believe
Vol. I. E
they have claims better than our own. The love
of mammon is feeble in bosoms that are devoted to
self-denying and repentant lives. Say then boldly
that you are a Deurckheim, and dread not my
displeasure
.
Since it is thy good pleasure, benevolent monk,
I will say boldly that we are of Deurckheim.
And you come to consult the holy Anchorite of
the Cedars?
It is not necessary that I should tell one of thy
knowledge of human nature, reverend Benedictine,
that the failing of all dwellers in small towns, is an
itching to look into the affairs of their neighbors.
Himmel! If our worthy burgomasters would spare
a little time from the affairs of other people to look
into their own, we should all be greatly gainers;
they in their property, and we in our comfort!
The Benedictine laughed, and he motioned for the
youths to follow, advancing himself towards the hut.
Since you have given yourselves this trouble, no
doubt with a praiseworthy and pious intention, my
sons, he said, let not respect for my presence
change your purpose. We will go into the cell of
the holy hermit, in company; and if there should be
advantage from his blessing, or discourse, believe
me I will not be so unjust as to envy either of you a
share.
The manner in which the friars of Limburg
deny themselves advantages, in order to do profit to
their fellow-christians, is in the mouths of all, far and
near; and this generosity of thine, reverend monk,
is quite of a piece with the well-earned reputation
of the whole brotherhood.
As Gottlob spoke gravely, and bowed with
sufficient
reverence, the Benedictine was in a slight
degree
his dupe; though, as he passed beneath the low
portal of the hut, he could not prevent a lurking
suspicion
of the truth.
CHAPTER III.
He comes at last in sullen loneliness,
And whence they know not, why they need not guess.
Lara
.
In
those ages in which moral wrongs were chiefly
repaired by superstition, and the slaves of the grosser
passions believed they were only to be rebuked by
signal acts of physical self-denial, the world often
witnessed examples of men retiring from its
allurements
,
to caves and huts, for the ostensible
purposes
of penitence and prayer. That this
extraordinary
pretension to godliness was frequently the
cloak of ambition and deceit is certain, but it would
be uncharitable to believe that, in common, it did not
proceed from an honest, though it might be an
ill-directed
,
zeal. Hermitages are still far from
infrequent
in the more southern parts of Europe, though
they are of rare occurrence in Germany; but
previously
to the change of religion which occurred in
the sixteenth century, and consequently near the
period of this tale, they were perhaps more often
met with among the descendants of the northern
race, than among the more fervid fancies of the
southern stock of that quarter of the world. It is
a law of nature that the substances which most
easily receive impressions, are the least likely to
retain
them; and possibly there may be requisite a
constancy and severity of character to endure the
never-ending and mortifying exactions of the
anchorite
,
that were not so easily found among the
volatile and happy children of the sun, as among
the sterner offspring of the regions of cold and
tempests.
Whatever may be said of the principles of him
who thus abandoned worldly ease for the love of
God, it it quite sure, that in practice, there were
present and soothing rewards in this manner of life,
that were not without strong attractions to morbid
minds; especially to those in which the seeds of
ambition were dormant rather than extinct. It was
rare, indeed, that a recluse established himself in the
vicinity of a simple and religious neighborhood, and
few were they who sought absolute solitude without
reaping a rich harvest of veneration and moral
dependence
among the untrained minds of his admirers.
In this treacherous manner does vanity beset us in
our strong-holds of mental security, and he who
has abandoned the world, in the hope of leaving
behind him those impulses which endangered his
hopes, finds the enemy in a new shape, intrenched
in the very citadel of his defences. There is little
merit, and commonly as little safety, in turning the
back on any danger, and he has far less claims to
the honors of a hero who outlives the contest in
consequence of means so questionable, than he who
survives because he has given a mortal blow to his
antagonist. The task assigned to man is to move
among his fellows doing good, filling his part in the
scale of creation, and escaping from none of the
high duties which God has allotted to his being; and
greatly should he be grateful, that, while his service
is arduous, he is not left without the powerful aid of
that intelligence which controls the harmony of the
universe.
The Anchorite of the Cedars, as the recluse now
visited by the monk and his accidental companions
was usually termed by the peasants, and by the
burghers of Deurckheim, had made his appearance
about six months before the opening of our story, in
the Ringmauer. Whence he had come, how long
he intended to remain, and what had been his
previous
career, were facts equally unknown to those
among whom he so suddenly took up his abode.
None had seen him arrive, nor could any say from
what sources he drew the few articles of household
furniture which were placed in his hut. They who
left the camp untenanted one week, on returning the
next, had found it occupied by a man, who had
arranged
one of the deserted buildings in a manner to
shelter him from the storms, and who, by erecting
a crucifix at his door, had sufficiently announced
the motive of his retirement. It was usual to hail
the establishment of a hermit in any particular
district
,
as a propitious event; and many were the
hopes excited, and plans of effecting temporal
objects
concocted, by the intervention of the prayers
of the stranger, before his presence had been known
a fortnight. All within the influence of the name of
the hermit, except Emich of Leinengen-Hartenburg,
the burgomasters of Deurckheim, and the monks
of Limburg, heard of his arrival with satisfaction.
The haughty and warlike baron had imbibed a
standing prejudice against all devotees, from an
inherited
enmity to the adjoining convent, which had
contested the sovereignty of the valley with his
family for ages; while the magistrates had a latent
jealousy of every influence which custom and the
laws had not rendered familiar. As to the monks,
the secret of their distrust was to be found in that
principle of human nature, which causes us to
dislike
being outdone in any merit of which we make
an especial profession, even though superior
godliness
be its object. Until now the Abbot of Limburg
was held to be the judge, in the last resort, of all
intercessions
between earth and heaven; and as his
supremacy had the support of time, he had long
enjoyed
it in that careless security which lures so
many of the prosperous to their downfall.
These antipathies on the part of the honored and
powerful might, to say the least, have rendered the
life of the anchorite very uncomfortable, if not
positively
E 2
insecure, were it not for the neutralizing effect
of the antagonist forces which were set in motion.
Opinion, deepened by superstition, held its shield
over the humble hut, and month after month glided
away, after the arrival of the stranger, during which
he received no other testimonials of the feelings
excited
by his presence, than those connected with the
reverence of the bulk of the population. An
accidental
communication with Berchthold was
ripening
into intimacy, and, as will be seen in the course
of the narrative, there were others to whom his
counsel, or his motives, or his prayers, were not
indifferent.
The latter fact was made sufficiently apparent to
those who on account of their mutual distrust, now
presented themselves with less ceremony than usual,
at the threshold of the hut. The light within came
from a fagot which was burning on the rude hearth,
but it was quite strong enough to show the monk
and his companions that the anchorite was not alone.
Their footsteps had evidently been heard, and a
female had time to arise from her knees, and to
arrange
her mantle in such a manner as effectually to
conceal her countenance. The hurried action was
scarcely completed, when the Benedictine darkened
the door with his gloomy robes, while Berchthold
and his friend stood gazing over his shoulders, with
lively curiosity mingled with surprise.
The form and countenance of the anchorite were
those of middle age. His eye had lost nothing of
its quickness or intelligence, though his movements
had the deliberation and care that long experience
insensibly interweaves in the habits of those who
have not lived in vain. He expressed neither
concern
nor wonder at the unexpected visits, but
regarding
his guests earnestly, like one who assured
himself of their identity, he mildly motioned for all
to enter. There was jealous suspicion in the glance
of the Benedictine, as he compried: for until now,
he had no reason to believe that the recluse was
usurping so intimate and so extensive an influence
over the minds of the young, as the presence of the
unknown female would give reason to believe.
I knew that thou wert of holy life and constant
prayer, venerable hermit, he said, in a tone that
questioned in more than one meaning of the term,
but until this moment, I had not thought thee vested
with the Church's power to hearken to the
transgressions
of the faithful and to forgive sins!
The latter is an office, brother, that of right
belongs only to God. The head of the Church
himself
is but an humble instrument of faith, in
discharging
this solemn trust.
The countenance of the monk did not become
more amicable at this reply, nor did he fail to cast
a scrutinizing glance at the muffled form of the
stranger, in a fruitless endeavor to recognize her
person.
Thou hast not even the tonsure, he continued,
while his uneasy eye rolled from that of the recluse
to the form of the stranger, who had shrunk, as far as
the narrow place would permit, from observation.
Thou seest, father, I have all the hair that time
and infirmities have left me. But is it thought, in
thy beneficed and warlike abbey, that the advice of
one who has lived long enough to know and to lament
his own errors, can injure the less experienced? If
unhappily I may have deceived myself, thou art
timely present, reverend monk, to repair the wrong.
Let the maiden come to the confessional of the
Abbey Church, if distrust or apprehension weigh
upon her mind; doubt it not, she will find great
comfort in the experiment.
As I will testify, from many trials abruptly
interposed the cow-herd, who advanced intrusively
between the two devotees, in a manner to occupy
all their attention. `Go upon the hill, and ease thy
soul, Gottlob,' is my good and venerable mother in
the practice of saying, whenever my opinion of
myself
is getting to be too humble, `and discourse with
some of the godly fathers of the Abbey, whose
wisdom
and unction will not fail to lighten thy heart of
even a heavier load. There is Father Ulrich, he is
a paragon of virtue and self-denial; and Father
Cuno is even more edifying and salutary than he;
while Father Siegfried is more balmy to a soul, than
the most reverend Abbot, the virtuous and pious
Father Bonifacius himself! Whatever thou doest,
child, go upon the hill, and enter boldly into the
church, like a loaded and oppressed sinner as thou
art, and especially seek counsel and prayer from the
excellent and beloved father Siegfried.'
And thouwho art thou? demanded the
half-doubting
monk, that thus speakest of me, in terms
that I so little merit, to my face?
I would I were Lord Emich of Hartenburg, or
for that matter, the Elector Palatine himself, in
order to do justice to those I honor; in which case
certain Fathers of Limburg should have especial
favor, and that quickly too, after my own flesh and
blood! Who am I, father? I wonder that a face
so often seen at the confessional should be forgotten.
What there is of me to boast of, Father Siegfried, is
of thine own formingbut it is no cause of surprise
that thou dost not recall me to mind, since the meek
and lowly of spirit are sure to forget their own
good works!
Thou callest thyself Gottlobbut the name
belongs
to many Christians.
More bear it, reverend monk, than know how
to do it honor. There is Gottlob Frincke, as arrant
a knave as any in Deurckheim; and Gottlob Popp
might have more respect for his baptismal vow;
and as to Lord Gottlob of Manheim
We will overlook the transgressions of the
remainder
of thy namesakes, for the good that thou
thyself hast done, interrupted the Benedictine, who,
having insensibly yielded to the unction of flattery in
the commencement of the interview, began now to
be ashamed of the weakness, as the fluent cow-herd
poured forth his words in a manner to excite some
suspicion of the quality of praise that came from
such a source. Come to me when thou wilt, son,
and such counsel as a weak head, but a sincere
heart, can render, shall not be withheld.
How this would lighten the heart of my old
mother to hear! `Gottlob,' would she say
What has become of thy companion, and of the
maiden? hastily demanded the Benedictine.
As the part of the cow-herd was successfully
performed
,
he stood aside, with an air of well-acted
simplicity and amazement, leaving the discourse to
be pursued between the recluse and the monk.
Thy guests have suddenly left us, continued
the latter, after satisfying himself, by actual
observation
,
that no one remained in the hut but himself,
its regular occupant, and the honey-tongued
Gottlob
;
and, as it would seem, in company!
They are gone as they came, voluntarily and
without question.
Thou knowest them, by frequent visits, holy
hermit?
Father, I question none: were the Elector
Friedrich
to come into my abode, he would be welcome,
and this cow-herd is not less so. To both, at parting,
I merely say, `God speed ye!'
Thou keepest the cattle of the burghers, Gottlob?
I keep a herd, reverend priest, such as my
masters
please to trust to my care.
We have grave cause of complaint against one
of thy fellows who serves the Count of Hartenburg,
and who is in the daily habit of trespassing on the
pastures of the church. Dost know the hind?
Potz Tausend! If all the knaves who do these
wrongs, when out of sight of their masters, were
set in a row before the eyes of the most reverend
Abbot of Limburg, he would scarce know whether
to begin with prayers or stripes, and they say he is a
potent priest at need, with both! I sometimes
tremble
for my own conduct, though no one can have a
better opinion of himself than I, poor and lowly as
I stand in your reverend presence; for a hard
fortune
,
and some oversight in the management of my
father's affairs, have brought me to the need of
living among such associates. Were I not of
approved
honesty, there might be more beasts on the
Abbey lands; and they who now pass their time in
fasting in sheer humility, might come to the
practice
of sheer necessity.
The Benedictine examined the meek countenance
of Gottlob with a keen distrustful eye; he next
invited
the hermit to bestow his blessing, and then
motioning for the hind to retire, he entered on the
real object of his visit to the hermitage.
We shall merely say, at this point of the
narrative
,
that the moment was extremely critical to
all who dwelt in the Palatinate of the Rhine. The
Elector had, perhaps imprudently for a prince of his
limited resources, taken an active part in the
vindictive
warfare then raging, and serious reverses
threatened to endanger not only his tranquillity but
his throne. It was a consequence of the feudal
system
,
which then so generally prevailed in Europe,
that internal disorders succeeded any manifest
though it might be only a temporary derangement
of the power of the potentate that held the right of
sovereignty over the infinite number of petty rulers
who, at that period, weighed particularly heavy on
Germany. To them he was the law, for they were
not apt to acknowledge any supremacy that did not
come supported by the strong hand. The
ascending
scale of rulers, including baron, count,
landgrave
,
margrave, duke, elector, and king, up to the
nominal head of the state, the emperor himself, with
the complicated and varied interests, embracing
allegiance
within allegiance, and duty upon duty, was
likely in itself to lead to dissension, had the Imperial
Crown been one of far more defined and positive
influence than it was. But, uncertain and indirect
in the application of its means, it was rare that any
very serious obstacle to tranquillity was removed,
without the employment of positive force. No
sooner was the Emperor involved in a serious
struggle
,
than the great princes endeavored to recover
that balance which had been lost by the long
ascendency of a particular family, while the minor
princes seldom saw themselves surrounded with
external
embarrassment, that internal discord did not
come to increase the evil. As a vassal was
commonly
but a rude reflection of his lord's enmities
and prejudices, the reader will have inferred from
the language of the cow-herd, that affairs were not
on the most amicable footing between those near
neighbors, the Abbot of Limburg and the Count of
Hartenburg. The circumstance of their existing so
near each other was, of itself, almost a certain
cause of rivalry; to which natural motive of
contention
may be added the unremitted strife between
the influence of superstition and the dread of the
sword.
The visit of the monk had reference to certain
interests connected with the actual state of things,
as they existed between the Abbey and the Castle.
As it would be premature, however, to expose his
object, we shall be content with saying, that the
conference between the priest and the hermit lasted
for half an hour, when the former took his leave,
craving a blessing from one of a life so pure and
self-denying as his host.
At the door of the hut, the monk found Gottlob,
who had early been gotten rid of, it will be
remembered
,
but who, for reasons of his own, had seen fit
to await the termination of the conference.
Thou here, son! exclaimed the Benedictine.
I had thought thee at peace, in thy bed, favored
with the benediction of a hermit so holy!
Good fortune is sure to drive sleep from my
eyes, father, returned Gottlob, dropping in by the
side of the monk who was walking through the
cedars towards the ancient gateway of the camp.
I am not of your animal kind, that is no sooner
filled with a good thing than it lies down to rest;
but the happier I become, the more I desire to be
up to enjoy it.
Thy wish is natural, and, although many
natural
desires are to be resisted, I do not see the
danger
of our knowing our own happiness.
Of the danger I will say nothing, father, but of
the comfort, there is not a youth in Deurckheim,
who can speak with greater certainty than myself.
Gottlob, said the Benedictine, insensibly edging
nearer to his companion, like one willing to
communicate
confidentially, since thou namest
Deurckheim
,
canst say aught of the humor of its people, in
this matter of contention between our holy Abbot
and Lord Emich of Hartenburg?
Were I to tell thy reverence the truth that lies
deepest in my mind, it would be to say, that the
burghers wish to see the affair brought to an end,
in such a way as to leave no doubt, hereafter, to
which party they most owe obedience and love,
since they find it a little hard upon their zeal, to
have so large demands of these services made by
both parties.
Thou canst not serve God and Mammon, son;
so sayeth one who could not deceive.
And so sayeth reason, too, worshipful monk;
but to give thee at once my inmost soul, I believe
there is not a man in our Deurckheim, who believes
himself strong enough in learning to say, in this
strife of duties, which is God and which is
Mammon!
How! do they call in question our sacred
missionour divine embassyin short, our being
what we are?
No man is so bold as to say that the monks of
Limburg are what they are; that might be
irreverent
to the Church, and indecent to Father
Siegfried
;
and the most we dare to say is, that they
seem to be what they are; and that is no small
matter, considering the way things go in this world.
`Seem to be, Gottlob,' said my poor father, `and
thou wilt escape envy and enemies; for in this
seemliness there is nothing so alarming to others;
it is only when one is really the thing itself, that men
begin to find fault. If thou wishest to live peaceably
with thy neighbors, push nothing beyond seeming to
be, for that much all will bear, since all can seem;
whereas being oftentimes sets a whole village in an
uproar. It is wonderful the virtue there is in
seeming
,
and the heart-burnings and scandal, ay, and the
downright quarrels there are in being just what one
seems.' No, the most we say, in Deurckheim, is
that the monks of Limburg seem to be men of God.
And Lord Emich?
As to Count Emich, father, we hold it wise to
remember he is a great noble. The Elector has
not a bolder knight, nor the emperor a truer vassal;
we say, therefore, that he seems to be brave and
loyal.
Thou makest great account, son, of these
apparent
qualities.
Vol. I. F
Knowing the frailty of man, father, and the
great likelihood of error, when we wish to judge
of acts and reasons, that lie deeper than our
knowledge
,
we hold it to be the most prudent. No, let
us of Deurckheim alone, as men of caution!
For a cow-herd, thou wantest not witCanst
read?
By God's favor, Providence put that little
accident
in my way when a child, reverend monk, and
I picked it up, as I might swallow a sweet morsel.
'Tis a gift more likely to injure than to serve
one of thy calling. The art can do little benefit to
thy herd!
I will not take upon myself to say, that any of
the cattle are much the better for it; though, to
deal fairly by thee, reverend Benedictine, there are
animals among them that seem to be.
How! wilt thou attempt to show a fact not only
improbable but impossible? Go to, thou hast fallen
upon some silly work of a jester. There have been
numberless of these commissions of the devil poured
forth, since the discovery of that imprudent brother
of Mainz. I would gladly hear in what manner a
beast can profit by the art of printing?
Thy patience, Father Siegfried, and thou shalt
know. Now here is a hind that can read, and there
is one that cannot. We will suppose them both the
servants of Emich of Hartenburg. Well, they go
forth of a morning with their herds; this taking the
path to the hills of the Count, and that, having read
the description of the boundaries between his Lord's
land and that of the holy Abbot of Limburg, taking
another, because learning will not willingly follow
ignorance; whereupon the reader reaches a nearer
and better pasture, than he who hath gone about to
feed upon ground that has only been trodden upon
too often before, by hoof of beast and foot of man.
Thy learning hath not done much towards
clearing thy head, Gottlob, whatever it may have
done for the condition of thy herd!
If your worship has any doubts of my being
what I say, here is proof of its justice, thenI know
nothing that so crams a man and confuses him as
learning! He who has but one horn can take it and
go his way; whereas he that hath many, may lose
his herd while choosing between instruments that
are better or worse. He that hath but one sword,
will draw it and slay his enemy: but he that hath
much armor, may lose his life while putting on his
buckler or head-piece.
I had not thought thee so skilful in answers.
And thou thinkest the good people of Deurckheim
will stand neuter between the Abbey and the Count?
Father, if thou wilt show me by which side they
will be the greatest gainers, I think I might venture
to say, with some certainty, on which side they will
be likely to draw the sword. Our burghers are
prudent townsmen, as I have said, and it is not
often that they are found fighting against their own
interests.
Thou shouldst know, son, that he who is most
favored in this life, may find the balances of justice
weighing against him in the next; while he who
suffers in the flesh, will be most likely to find its
advantage in the spirit.
Himmel! In that case, reverend Benedictine,
the most holy Abbot of Limburg himself may fare
worse hereafter then even a hind who now lives
like a dog! exclaimed Gottlob, with an air of
admiration
and simplicity that completely misled his
listener. The one is said to comfort the body in
various ways, and to know the difference between
a cup of pure Rhenish and a draught of the washy
liquors that come from the other side of our
mountains
;
while the other, whether it be of necessity
or inclination I will not take upon myself to say,
drinks only of the spring. 'Tis a million of pities
that one never knoweth which to choose, present
ease with future pain, or a starving body with a
happy soul! Believe me, Father Siegfried, were thy
reverence to think more of these trials that befall us
ignorant youths, thou wouldst not deal so heavily
with the penances, as thine own severe virtue often
tempts thee to do.
What is thus done is done for thy health, future
and present. By chastening the spirit in this
manner
,
it is gradually prepared for its final purification,
and thou art not a loser in the eyes of thy fellows,
by leading a chaste life. Thou wilt have justice at
the settlement of the great account.
Nay, I am no greedy creditor, to dun
Providence
for my dues. I very well know that what
will come cannot be prevented, and therefore I take
patience to be a virtue. But I hope these accounts,
of which you tell us so often, are kept with sufficient
respect for a poor man; for, to deal fairly with
thee, father, we have not overmuch favor in settling
those of the world.
Thou hast credit for all thy good deeds with thy
fellows, Gottlob.
I wish it were true! To me it seems that the
world is ready enough to charge, while it is as
niggardly
as a miser in giving creditI never did an
evil actand as we are all mortal and frail, most
holy monk, these accidents will befall even your
saint or a Benedictinethat the deed itself and all
its consequences were not set down against me, in
letters that a short-sighted man might read; while
most of my meritsand considering I am but a
cow-herd they are of respectable qualityseem to
be forgotten. Now your Abbot, or his Highness the
Elector, or even Count Emich
The Summer Landgrave! interrupted the monk,
laughing.
Summer or winter, as thou wilt, Father
Siegfried
,
he is Count of Hartenburg, and a noble of
Leiningen. Even he does no deed of charity, or
even of simple justice, that all men do not seize upon
the occasion to proclaim it, as eagerly as they
endeavor
to upbraid me for the accidental loss of a
beast, or any other little backsliding, that may
befall
one, who being bold under thy holy instruction,
sometimes stumbles against a sin.
Thou art a casuist, and, at another time, I must
look more closely into the temper of thy mind. At
present, thou mayst purchase favor of the Church
by enlisting a little more closely in her interests. I
remember thy cleverness and thy wit, Gottlob, for
both have been remarked in thy visits to the
convent
;
but, until this moment, there has not been
sufficient
reason to use the latter in the manner that
we may fairly claim to do, considering our frequent
prayers, and the other consolations afforded in thy
behalf.
Do not be too particular, Father Siegfried, for
thy words reveal grievous penance!
Which may be much mitigated in future, if not
entirely avoided, by a service that I would now
propose
to thee, honest Gottlob, and which I will
venture
to say, from my knowledge of thy reverence
for holy things, as is manifest in thy attentions to
the pious hermit, and thy love for the Abbey of
Limburg, thou wouldst not refuse to undertake.
So!
Nay, I have as good as pledged myself to Father
Bonifacius to procure either thee, or one shrewd
and faithful as thee, to do a trusty service for the
brotherhood.
The latter might not be easy among the
cowherds
!
Of that I am sure. Thy skill in the
management
of the beasts may yet gain thee the office of
F 2
tending the ample herds of the abbey. Thou art
already believed fit for the charge.
Not to deny my own merits, sagacious father, I
have already some knowledge of the pastures.
And of the beasts, too, Gottlob; we keep good
note of the characters of all who come to our
confessionals
.
There are worse than thine among them,
I do assure thee.
And yet have I never told thee half that I might
say of myself, father!
It is not important now. Thou knowest the state
of the contest between Count Emich and our Abbey.
The service that I ask of thee, son, is this; and by
discharging it, with thy wonted readiness, believe
me thou wilt gain favor with St. Benedict and his
children. We have had reason to know, that there
is a strong band of armed men in the castle, ready
and anxious to assail our walls, under a vain belief
that they contain riches and stores to repay the
sacrilege
;
but we want precise knowledge of their
numbers and intentions. Were we to send one of
known pursuits on this errand, the Count would find
means to mislead him; whereas, we think a hind of
thy intelligence might purchase the Church's
kindness
without suspicion.
Were Count Emich to get wind of the matter,
he would not leave me an ear with which to listen
to thy holy admonitions.
Keep thine own council, and he will not suspect
one of thy appearance. Hast no pretext for visiting
the castle?
Nay, it would be easy to make a thousand. Here,
I might say, I wished to ask the cow-herd of Lord
Emich for his cunning in curing diseased hoofs,
or I might pretend a wish to change my service, or,
there is no want of laughing damsels in and about
the hold.
Enough: thou art he, Gottlob, for whom I have
sought daily for a fortnight. Go thy way, then,
without fail, and seek me, after to-morrow's mass,
in the Abbey.
It may be enough on the side of Heaven, father,
but men of our prudence must not forget their
mortal
state. Am I to risk my ears, do discredit to
my simplicity, and neglect my herd, without a
motive
?
Thou wilt serve the Church, son; get favor in
the eyes of our reverend Abbot, and thy courage
and dexterity will be remembered in future
indulgences
.
That I shall serve the Church it is well known
to me, reverend Benedictine, and it is a privilege of
which a cow-herd hath reason to be proud; but, by
serving the Church, I shall make enemies on earth,
for two sufficient reasons: first, that the Church is
in no great esteem in this valley; and second,
because
men never love a friend for being any better
than themselves. `No, Gottlob,' used my excellent
father to say, `seem to all around thee conscious of
thy unworthiness, after which thou mayst be what
thou seemest. On this condition only can virtue live
at peace with its fellow-creatures. But if thou
wouldst have the respect of mankind,' would he
say, `set a fair price on all thou doest, for the world
will not give thee credit for disinterestedness; and
if thou workest for naught, it will think thou
deservest
naught. No,' did he shake his head and add,
`that which cometh easy is little valued, while that
which is costly, do men set a price upon.'
Thy father was, like thyself, one that looked to
his ease. Thou knowest that we inhabitants of cells
do not carry silver.
Nay, righteous Benedictine, if it were a trifle of
gold, I am not one to break a bargain for so small a
difference.
Thou shalt have gold, then. On the faith of my
holy calling, I will give thee an image of the
Emperor
in gold, shouldst thou succeed in bringing the
tidings we require.
Gottlob stopped short, and kneeling, he reverently
asked the monk to bless him. The latter complied,
half doubting the discretion of employing such an
emissary, between whose cunning and simplicity he
was completely at fault. Still, as he risked nothing,
except in the nature of the information he was to
receive, he saw no sufficient reason for recalling the
commission he had just bestowed. He gave the
desired
benediction, therefore; and our two
conspirators
descended the mountain in company,
discoursing
,
as they went, of the business on which the
cowherd
was about to proceed. When so near the road
as to be in danger of observation, they separated,
each taking the direction necessary to his object.
CHAPTER IV.
And not a matron, sitting at her wheel,
But could repeat their story
Rogers
.
The
female, enveloped in her mantle, had so well
profited by the timely interposition of Gottlob Frinck,
as to quit the hermit's hut without attracting the
notice
of the Benedictine. But the vigilance of young
Berchthold had not been so easily eluded. He
stepped aside as she glided through the door, then
stooping merely to catch the eye of the cow-herd,
to whom he communicated his intention by a sign,
he followed. Had the forester felt any doubts as to
the identity of her he pursued, the light and active
movement would have convinced him, that age, at
least, had no agency in inducing her to conceal her
features. The roe-buck of his own forests scarce
bounded with more agility than the fugitive fled, on
first quitting the abode of the recluse; nor did her
speed sensibly lessen, until she had crossed most of
the melancholy camp, and reached a spot where
the opening of the blue and star-lit void showed that
she was at the verge of the wood, and near the
margin of the summit of the mountain. Here she
paused, and stood leaning against a cedar, like one
whose strength was exhausted.
Berchthold had followed swiftly, but without
losing that appearance of calmness and of superior
physical force which gives dignity to the steps of
young manhood, as compared with the timid but
more attractive movements of the feebler sex. He
seemed conscious of his greater powers, and
unwilling
to increase a flight that was already swifter
than circumstances required, and which he knew to
be far more owing to a vague and instinctive alarm,
than to any real cause for apprehension. When the
speed of the female ceased, his own relaxed, and
he approached the spot where she stood panting for
breath, like a cautious boy, who slackens his haste
in order not to give new alarm to the bird that has
just alighted.
What is there so fearful in my face, Meta, that
thou fleest my presence, as I had been the spirit of
one of those Pagans that they say once peopled this
camp? It is not thy wont to have this dread of a
youth thou hast known from childhood, and I will
say, in my own defence, known as honest and ture!
It is not seemly in a maiden of my yearsit
was foolish, if not disobedient, to be here at this
hour, answered the hurried girl:I would I had
not listened to the desire of hearing more of the
holy hermit's wisdom!
Thou art not alone, Meta!
That were unbecoming, truly, in my father's
child! returned the young damsel, with an
expression
of pride of condition, as she glanced an eye
towards
the fallen wall, among whose stones
Berchthold
saw the well-known form of a female servitor
of his companion's family. Had I carried
imprudence
to this pass, Master Berchthold, thou wouldst
have reason to believe, in sooth, that it was the
daughter of some peasant, that by chance had
crossed thy footstep.
There is little danger of that error, answered
Berchthold quickly. I know thee well; thou art
Meta, the only child of Heinrich Frey, the
Burgo-master
of Deurckheim. None know thy quality
and hopes better than I, for none have heard them
oftener!
The damsel dropped her head in a movement of
natural regret and sudden repentance, and when
her blue eye, softened by a ray of the moon, met
the gaze of the forester, he saw that better feelings
were uppermost.
I did not wish to recount my father's honors,
nor any accidental advantage of my situation, and,
least of all, to thee, answered the maiden, with
eagerness; but I felt concern lest thou shouldst
imagine I had forgotten the modesty of my sex and
conditionor, I had fear that thou mightestthy
manner is much changed of late, Berchthold!
It is then without my knowledge or intention.
But we will forget the past, and thou wilt tell me,
what wonder hath brought thee, to this suspected
and dreaded moor, at an hour so unusual?
Meta smiled, and the expression of her
countenance
proved, that if she had moments of
uncharitable
weakness, they were more the offspring of the
world's opinions, than of her own frank and
generous
nature.
I might retort the question on thee, Berchthold,
and plead a woman's curiosity as a reason why
I should be quickly answeredWay art thou here,
at an hour when most young hunters sleep?
I am Lord Emich's forester; but thou, as there
has just been question, art a daughter of the
Burgo-master
of Deurckheim.
I give thee credit for all the difference. Did
my mother know that I was thus about to furnish a
reason for my conduct, she would say, `Keep thy
explanations, Meta, for those who have a right to
demand them!
And Heinrich Frey?
He would be little likely to approve of either
visit or explanation.
Thy father loves me not, Meta?
He does not so much disapprove of thee, Master
Berchthold, as that thou art only Lord Emich's
forester
.
Wert thou as thine own parent was, a
substantial
burgher of our town, he might esteem thee
much. But thou hast great favor with my dear
mother!
Heaven bless her, that in her own prosperity
she hath not forgotten those who have fallen! I
think that, in thy heart as in thy looks, Meta, thou
more resemblest thy mother than thy father.
I would have it so. When I speak to thee of
my being the child of Heinrich Frey, it is without
thought of any present difference between us, I do
affirm to thee, Berchthold, but rather as showing
that in not forgetting my station, I am not likely to
do it discredit. Nay, I know not that a forester's
is a dishonorable office! They who serve the
Elector in this manner are noble.
And they who serve nobles, simple. I am but
a menial, Meta, though it be in a way to do little
mortification to my pride.
And what is Count Emich but a vassal of the
Elector, who, in turn, is a subject of the Emperor!
Thou shalt not dishonor thyself in this manner,
Berchthold, and no one say aught to vindicate thee.
Thanks, dearest Meta. Thou art the child of
my mother's oldest and closest friend, and whatever
the world may proclaim of the difference that now
exists between us, thy excellent heart whispers to
the contrary. Thou art not only the fairest, but, in
truth, the kindest and gentlest damsel of thy town!
The daughter, only child, and consequently the
heiress of the wealthiest burgher of Deurckheim, did
not hear this opinion of Lord Emich's handsome
forester without great secret gratification.
And now thou shalt know the reason of this
unusual
visit, said Meta, when the silent pleasure
excited
by the last speech of young Berchthold had a
little subsided; for this have I, in some measure,
promised to thee; and it would little justify thy good
opinion to forget a pledge. Thou knowest the holy
hermit, and the sudden manner of his appearance in
the Heidenmauer?
None are ignorant of the latter, and thou hast
already seen that I visit him in his hut.
I shall not pretend to give, or to seek, the
reason, but sure it is, that he had not been a week
in the old Roman abode, when he sought occasion
to show me greater notice than to any other maiden
of Deurckheim, or than any merit of mine might
claim.
How! is the knave but a pretender to this
sanctity, after all!
Thou canst not be jealous of a man of his years;
and, judging by his worn countenance and hollow
eye, years too of mortification and suffering! He
truly is of a character to give a youth of thy age,
and gentle air, and active frame, and comely
appearance
,
uneasiness! But I see the color in thy
cheek, Master Berchthold, and will not offend thee
with comparisons that are so much to thy
disadvantage
.
Be the motive of the holy hermit what it will,
on the two occasions when he visited out town, and
in the visits that we maidens have often made to his
cell, he hath shown kind interest in my welfare and
future hopes, both as they are connected with this
life, and with that to which we all hasten, although
it be with steps that are not heard even by our own
ears.
It does not surprise me, that all who see and
know thee, Meta, should act thus. And yet I find
it very strange!
Nay, said the amused girl, now thou justifiest
the exact words of old Ilse, who hath often said to
me, `Take heed, Meta, and put not thy faith too
easily in the language of the young townsmen; for,
by looking closely into their meaning, thou wilt see
that they contradict themselves. Youth is so eager
to obtain its end, that it stops not to separate the
true from the plausible.' These are her very words,
and oft repeated too, which thou hast just verified
I believe the crone fairly sleepeth on that pile of
the fallen wall!
Disturb her not. One of her years hath great
need of rest: nay, it would be thoughtless to rob
her of this little pleasure!
Meta had made a step in advance, seemingly
with intent to arouse her attendant, when the
hurried
words and rapid action of the youth caused
her to hesitate. Receding to her former attitude,
beneath the shadow of the cedar, she more
considerately
resumed
It would be ungracious, in sooth, to awaken one
who hath so lately toiled up this weary hill.
And she so aged, Meta!
And one that did so much for my infancy! I
ought to go back to my father's house, but my kind
mother will overlook the dalay, for she loveth Ilse
little less than one of her own blood.
Vol. I. G
Thy mother knoweth of this visit to the hermit's
hut, then?
Dost think, Master Berchthold, that a
Burgomaster
of Deurckheim's only child would go forth,
at this hour, without permission had? There would
be great unseemliness in such secret gossiping, and
a levity that would better suit thy damsels of Count
Emich's village: they say indeed, in our town, that
the castle damsels are none too nice in their
manner
of life.
They belie us of the mountain strangely, in the
towns of the plain! I swear to thee, there is not
greater modesty in thy Deurckheim palace, than
among our females, whether of the village or of the
castle.
It may be true in the main, and, for the credit
of my sex, I hope it is so; but thou wilt scarce find
courage, Berchthold, to say aught in favor of her
they call Gisela, the warder's child? More vanity
have I never seen in female form!
They think her fair, in Hartenburg.
'Tis that opinion which spoileth the creature's
manner! Thou art much in her society, Master
Berchthold, and I doubt not that use causeth thee
to overlook some qualities that are not concealed
from strangers. `Do but regard that flaunting
bird from the pass of the Jaegerthal,' said the
excellent
old Ilse, one morn that we had a festival in our
venerable church, to which the country round came
forth in their best array; `one would imagine, from
its fluttering, and the movements of its feathers, that
it fancied the eye of every young hunter was on its
plumage, and that it dreaded the bolt of the archer
unexpectedly! And yet have I known animals of
this breed, that did not so greatly fear the fowler's
hand, if truth were said!'
Thou judgest Gisela harshly; for though of
some lightness of speech, and haply not without
admiration
of her own beauty, the girl is far from
being uncompanionable, or, at times, of agreeable
discourse.
Nay, I do but repeat the words of Ilse, Master
Berchthold!
Thy Ilse is old, and garrulous, and is like to
utter foolishness.
This may be sobut let it be foolish, if thou
wiltthe folly of my nurse is my folly. I have
gained so much from her discourse, that I fear it is
now too late to amend. To deal fairly with thee,
she did not utter a syllable concerning thy warder's
daughter that I do not believe.
Berchthold was but little practised in the ways
of the human heart. Free in the expression of his
own sentiments as the air he breathed on his native
hills, and entirely without thought of guilt, as
respects
the feeling which bound him to Meta, he had
never descended into the arcana of that passion of
which he was so completely the subject, without
indeed knowing even the extent of his own bondage.
He viewed this little ebullition of jealousy, therefore,
as a generous nature regards all injustice, and he
entered only the more warmly into the defence of
the injured party. One of those sieve-like hearts
that have been perforated a hundred times by the
shots that Cupid fires, right and left, in a capital,
would probably have had recourse to the same
expedient
,
merely to observe to what extent he could
trifle with the feelings of a being he professed to
love.
Europeans, who are little addicted to looking into
the eye of their cis-Atlantic kinsman in search of
the mote, say, that the master passion of life is but
a sluggish emotion in the American bosom. That
those who are chiefly employed in the affairs of this
world should be content with the natural course of
the affections, as they arise in the honest relations
of the domestic circle, is quite as probable, as it is
true that they who feed their passions by vanity and
variety, are mistaken when they think that casual
and fickle sensations compose any of the true
ingredients
of that purifying and elevated sentiment,
which, by investing the admired object with all that
is estimable, leads us to endeavor to be worthy of
the homage we insensibly pay to virtue. In
Berchthold
and Meta, the reader is to look for none of
that constitutional fervor, which sometimes
substitutes
impulse for a deeper feeling, or for any of that
factitious cultivation of the theory of love, that so
often tempts the neophyte to mistake his own
hallucinations
for the more natural attachment of
sympathy
and reason. For the former they lived too
far north, and for the latter it might possibly be said,
that fortune had cast their lot a little too far south.
That subtle and nearly indefinable sympathy
between
the sexes, which we call love, to which all
are subject, since its principle is in nature itself,
exists
perhaps in its purest and least conventional form
precisely in the bosoms of those whom Providence
has placed in the middle state, between extreme
cultivation
and ignorance; between the fastidious and
sickly perversion of over-indulgence, and the
selfishness
that is the fruit of constant appeals to exertion;
or the very condition of the two young persons that
have been placed before the reader in this chapter.
Enough has been seen to show that Berchthold,
though exercising a menial office, had received
opinions superior to his situation; a circumstance
that is sufficiently explained by the allusions already
made to the decayed fortunes of his parents. His
language and manner, therefore, as he generously
vindicated Gisela, the daughter of the person
charged
to watch the approaches of Lord Emich's castle,
was perhaps superior to what would have been
expected
in a mere forester.
I shall not take upon myself the office of
pointing
out the faults of our castle beauty, if faults she
hath, he said; but this much may I say in her
defence, without fear of exceeding truth; her father
is grown gray under the livery of Leiningen, and
there is not a child in the world that showeth more
reverence or affection to him who gave her being,
than this same bird of thine, with its flaunting
plumes, and the coquetry with the archer's bolt!
'Tis said, a dutiful daughter will ever make an
excellent and an obedient wife.
The luckier then will he be who weds old
Friedrich's child. I have known her keep the gates,
deep into the night, that her father might take his
rest, when the nobles have frequented the forest
later than common; ay, and to watch weary hours,
when most of her years and sex would find excuses
for being on their pillows. Now, this have I often
seen, going forth, as thou mayst be certain by my
office, in Count Emich's company, in most of his
hunts. Nay, Gisela is fair, none will deny; and it
may be that, among her other qualities, the girl
knows it.
She appeareth not to be the only one of thy
Hartenburg pile that is aware of the fact, Master
Berchthold!
Dost thou mean, Meta, the revelling abb, from
Paris, or the sworn soldier-monk of Rhodes, that
now abide in the castle? asked the young forester,
with a simplicity that would have set the heart of a
coquette at ease, by its perfect nature and openness.
Now thou touchest on the matter, I will own,
though one of my office should be wary of opinions
on those his master loves, but I know thy prudence,
MetaTherefore will I say, that I have half
suspected
these two ill-assorted servants of the church,
of thinking more of the poor girl than is seemly.
Thy poor Gisela hath cause to hang herself!
G 2
Truly, were wassailers, like these thou namest, to
regard me with but a free look, the Burgomaster of
Deurckheim should know of their boldness!
Meta, they would not dare! Poor Gisela is not
the offspring of a stout citizen, but the warder of
Hartenburg's child, and there may be some
difference
in thy natures, toonay, there is; for thou art
not one of those that seek the admiration of each
cavalier that passeth, but a maiden that knoweth her
worth, and the meed that is her due. That thou
hast, in something, wronged our beauty of the hold,
I needs must say; but to compare thee with her,
either in the excellence of the body or that of the
mind, is what could never be done justly. If she is
fair, thou art fairer; if she is witty, thou art wise!
Nay, do not mistake me, Berchthold, by
thinking
that I have uttered aught against thy warder's
daughter that is harsh and unseemly. I know the
girl's cleverness, and moreover I am willing to
acknowledge
,
that one cruelly placed by fortune in
a condition of servitude, like her's, may find it no
easy matter to be always what one of her sex and
years could wish. I dare to say, that Gisela, did
fortune and opportunity permit, would do no
discredit
to her breeding and looks, both of which,
sooth to say, are somewhat above her condition.
And thou saidst, thy mother knew of this visit
to the hermit?
And said truth. My mother has never made
objection to any reverence paid by her daughter to
the Church or to its servants.
That hath she not!Thou art amongst the
most frequent of those who resort to the Abbey in
quest of holy offices thyself, Meta!
Am I not a Christian! Wouldst have a
well-respected
maiden forget her duties?
I say not that; but there is discourse amongst
us hunters, that of late the prior hath much perferred
his young nephew, Brother Hugo, to the duty of
quieting the consciences of the penitents. It were
better that some father, whose tonsure hath a ring
of gray, were put into the confessional, in a church
so much frequented by the young and fair of
Deurckheim
.
Thou wouldst do well to write of this to the
Bishop of Worms, or to our holy Abbot, in thine
own scholarly hand. Thou hast the clerkly gifts,
Master Berchthold, and might persuade!
I would that the little I have done in this way
had not so failed of its design. Thou hast had
frequent
proofs of its sincerity, if not of its skill, Meta.
Well, this is idle, and leads me to forget the
hermit: My motherI know not whyand now
thou makest me think of it, I find it different from
her common rule; but it is certain that she in
nowise
discourages these visits to the Heidenmauer.
We are very young, Berchthold, and may not yet
understand all that enters into older and wiser
heads!
It is strange that the holy man should seek just
us! If he most urges his advice on you among the
damsels of the town, he most gives his counsel to
me among the youths of the Jaegerthal!
There was a charm in this idea which held these
two young and unpractised minds in sweet thraldom
for many fleeting minutes. They conversed of the
unexplained sympathy between the man of God and
themselves, long and with undiminishing interest in
the subject, for it seemed to both that it contained a
tie to unite them still closer to each other.
Whatever
philosophy and experience may pretend on such
subjects, it is certain that man is disposed to be
superstitious
in respect to the secret influences that
guide his fortunes, in the dark passage of the world.
Whether it be the mystery of the unforeseen future,
or the consciousness of how much of even his
most prized success is the result of circumstances
that he never could or did control, or whether God,
with a view to his own harmonious and sublime
ends, has implanted this principle in the human
breast, in order to teach us dependence on a
superior
power, it is certain that few reach a state of
mind so calculating and reasoning as not to trust
some portion of that which is to come, to the
chances of Fortune, or to Providence; for so we
term the directing power, as the mind clings to or
rejects the immediate agency of the Deity, in the
conduct of the subordinate concerns of life. In the
age of which we write, intelligence had not made
sufficient progress to elevate ordinary minds above the
arts of necromancy. Men no longer openly
consulted
the entrails of brutes, in order to learn the will of
fate, but they often submitted to a dictation scarcely
less beastly, and few indeed were they who were
able to separate piety from superstition, or the
grand dispensations of Providence from the
insignificant
interests of selfishness. It is not surprising,
therefore, that Berchthold and Meta should cling to
the singular interest that the hermit manifested in
them respectively, as an omen propitious to their
common hopes; common, for though the maiden
had not so far relinquished the reserve she still
deemed
essential to her sex, as to acknowledge all she
felt, that subtle instinct which unites the young and
innocent left little doubt in the mind of either, of the
actual state of the other's inclinations.
Old Ilse had consequently ample time to rest her
frame, after the painful toil of the ascent between
the town and the camp. When Meta at length
approached
to arouse her, the garrulous woman broke
out in exclamations of surprise at the shortness of
the interview with the hermit, for the soundness of
her slumbers left her in utter ignorance of the
appearance
and disappearance of Berchthold.
It is but a moment, Meta dear, she said, since
we came up the hill, and I fear thou hast not given
sufficient heed to the wise words of the holy man.
We should not reject a wholesome draught because
it proves bitter to the mouth, child, but swallow all
to the last drop, when we think there is healing in
the cup. Didst deal fairly by the hermit, and tell
him honestly of thy evil nature?
Thou forgettest, Ilse, the hermit has not even
the tonsure, and cannot shrive and pardon.
Nay, nayI know not that! A hermit is a man
of God; and a man of God is holy; and any
Christian may, ay, and should pardon; and as to
shriving, give me a self-denying recluse, who passes
his time in prayer, mortifying soul and body, before
any monk of Limburg, say I! There is more
virtue
in one blessing from such a man, than in a dozen
from a carousing AbbotI know not but I might
say fifty.
But I had his blessing, nurse.
Well, that is comforting, and we have not
wearied
our limbs for naught; but thou shouldst have
told him of thy wish to wear the laced boddice, at
the last mass, in order that thy equals might envy
thy beauty. It would have been wholesome to have
acknowledged that sin, at least.
But he questioned me not of my sins. All his
discourse
was of my father's house, and of my good
mother, andand of other matters.
Thou shouldst then have edged the boddice in
among the other matters. Have I not always
fore-warned
thee, Meta, of the danger of pride, and of
stirring envy in the bosom of a companion? There
is naught more uncomfortable than envy, as I know
by experience. Oh! I am no longer young; and
come to me if thou wouldst wish to know what
envy is, or any other dangerous vice, and I warrant
thee thou shalt hear it well explained! Ay, thou
wert very wrong not to have spoken of the
boddice
!
Had it been fit to confess, I might have found
more serious sins to own, than any that belong
to dress.
I know not that! Dress is a great beguiler
of the young heart, and of the handsome face. If
thou hast beauty in thy house, break thy mirrors
that the young should not know it, is what I have
heard a thousand times; and as thou art both young
and fair, I will repeat it, though all Deurckheim
gainsay my words, thou art in danger if thou
knowest it. No, hadst thou told the hermit of that
boddice, it might have done much good. What
matters it to such a man, whether he hath the
tonsure
or not? He hath prayers, and fastings, and
midnight thought, and great bodily suffering, and
these are surely worth as much hair as hath ever
fallen from all the monks in the Palatinate. I would
thou hadst told him of that boddice, child!
Since thou so wishest it, at our next meeting it
shall be said, dear Ilse; so set thy heart at peace.
This will give thy dear mother great pleasure;
else, why should she consent that a daughter of
her's should visit a heathenish camp, at so late an
hour? I warrant thee that she thought of the
boddice!
Do cease speaking of the garment, nurse; my
thoughts are bent on something else.
Well, if indeed thou thinkest of something else,
it may be amiss to say more at present, though,
Heaven it knows! thou hast great occasion to
recall that vain-glorious mass to thy mind. How
suddenly thy communion with the hermit ended
tonight
,
Meta!
We have not been long on the mountain, truly,
Ilse. But we must hasten back, lest my mother
should be uneasy.
And why should she be so? Am I not with thee?
Is age nothing, and experience, and prudence, and
an old head, ay, and, for that matter, an old body
too, and a good memory, and such eyes as no other
in Deurckheim of my years hathI say of my
years, for thou hast better; and thy dear mother's
are little worse than thinebut of my years, few
have their equal. At thy age, girl, I was not the
old Ilse, but the lively Ilse, and the active, and, God
forgive me if there be vain-glory in the words! but
truth should always be spokenthe handsome Ilse,
and this too without aid from any such boddice as
that of thine.
Wilt never forget the boddice! here, lean on
me, nurse, or thy foot may fail thee in the steep
descent.
Here they began to descend, and as they were
now at a point of the path where much caution
was necessary, the conversation in a great measure
ceased.
He who visits Deurckheim now, will find
sufficient
remaining evidence to show that the town
formerly extended more towards the base of the
mountain than its present site would prove. There
are the ruins of walls and towers among the
vineyards
that ornament the foot of the hill, and
tradition
speaks of fortifications that have long since
disappeared, rendered useless by those
improvements
in warfare that have robbed so many other
strong places of their importance. Then, every
group of houses on an eminence was more or less
a place of defence; but the use of gunpowder and
artillery centuries ago rendered all these targets
useless, and he who would now seek a citadel, is
most sure to find it buried in some plain or morass.
The world has reached another crisis in
improvement
,
for the introduction of steam is likely to alter
all its systems of offence and defence both by land
and sea; but be the future as it may, the skill of the
engineer had not so far ripened at the period of our
tale, as to prevent Meta and her attendant from
entering within walls of ancient construction,
clumsily
adapted to meet the exigencies of the imperfect
state of the existing art. As the hour was early,
they had no difficulty in reaching the Burgomaster's
door without attracting remark.
CHAPTER V.
What news?
None, my lord; but that the world is grown honest.
Then is doomsday near!
Hamlet
.
Within
the whole of these widely extended
states, there is scarcely a single vestige of the
manner
of life led by those who first settled in the
wilderness. Little else is found to arrest the eye
of the antiquary in the shape of a ruin, except the
walls of some fortress or the mounds of an
intrenchment
of the war of independence. We have,
it is true, some faint remains of times still more
remote
;
and there are even a few circumvallations,
or other inventions of defence, that are believed to
have once been occupied by the red man; but in no
part of the country did there ever exist an edifice,
of either a public or a private nature, that bore any
material resemblance to a feudal castle. In order,
therefore, that the reader shall have as clear a
picture
as our feeble powers can draw, of the hold
occupied
by the sturdy baron who is destined to act a
conspicuous part in the remainder of this legend, it
has become necessary to enter at some length into
a description of the surrounding localities, and of
the building itself. We say of the reader, for we
profess to write only for the amusementfortunate
shall we be if instruction may be addedof our
own countrymen: should others be pleased to read
these crude pages, we shall be flattered and of
course grateful; but with this distinct avowal of our
object in holding the pen, we trust they will read
with the necessary amount of indulgence.
And here we shall take occasion to hold one
moment's
communion with that portion of the reading
public of all nations, that, as respects a writer,
composes
what is termed the world. Let it not be
said of us, because we make frequent reference to
opinions and circumstances as they exist in our
native land, that we are profoundly ignorant of the
existence of all others. We make these references,
crime though it be in hostile eyes, because they best
answer our end in writing at all, because they
allude to a state of society most familiar to our own
minds, and because we believe that great use has
hitherto been made of the same things, to foster
ignorance and prejudice. Should we unheedingly
betray the foible of national vanitythat foul and
peculiar blot of American character! we solicit
forgiveness; urging, in our own justification, the
aptitude of a young country for falling insensibly
into the vein of imitation, and praying the critical
observer to overlook any blunders in this way, if
perchance we should not manifest that felicity of
execution which is the fruit only of great practice.
Hitherto we believe that our modesty cannot justly
be impeached. As yet we have left the cardinal
virtues to mankind in the gross, never, to our
knowledge, having written of American courage;
or American honesty, nor yet of American
beauty, nor haply of American manliness, nor
even of American strength of arm, as qualities
abstracted and not common to our fellow-creatures;
Vol. I. H
but have been content, in the unsophisticated
language
of this western clime, to call virtue, virtue
and vice, vice. In this we well know how much
we have fallen short of numberless but nameless
classical writers of our own time, though we do not
think we are greatly losers by the forbearance,
because
we have sufficient proof that when we wish
to make our pages unpleasant to the foreigner, we
can effect that object by much less imposing
allusions
to national merits; since we have good reason
to believe, there exists a certain querulous class of
readers who consider even the most delicate and
reserved commendations of this western world, as
so much praise unreasonably and dishonestly
abstracted
from themselves. As for that knot in our
own fair country, who aim at success by flattering
the stranger, and who hope to shine in their own
little orbits by means of borrowed light, we commit
them to the correction of a reproof which is certain
to come, and, in their cases, to come embittered by
the consciousness of its being merited by a servility
as degrading as it is unnatural. As they dive
deeper into the secrets of the human heart, they
will learn there is a healthful feeling that cannot be
repulsed with impunity, and that as none are so
respected
as they who fearlessly and frankly maintain
their rights, so none are so contemned as those who
ignobly desert them.
During the time that Berchthold was holding
converse
with Meta, on the mountain of the
Heidenmauer
,
Emich of Leiningen was at rest in his castle
of Hartenburg. It has already been said, that the
hold was of massive masonry, the principal material
being the reddish sand-stone, that is so abundantly
found in nearly the whole region of the ancient
Palatinate
.
The building had grown with time, and
that which had originally been a tower had swelled
into a formidable and extensive fortress. In the
ages which succeeded the empire of Charlemagne,
he who could rear one of these strong places, and
maintain it in opposition to his neighbors, became
noble, and in some measure a sovereign. He
established
his will as law for the contiguous territory,
and they who could not enjoy their own lands,
without
submitting to his pleasure, were content to
purchase
protection by admitting their vassalage. No
sooner was one of these local lords firmly
established
in his hold, by receiving service and homage
from the husbandmen, than he began to quarrel
with his nearest neighbor of his own condition.
The victor necessarily grew more powerful by his
conquests, until, from being the master of one castle
and one village, he became in process of time the
master of many. In this manner did minor barons
swell into power and sovereignty, even mighty
potentates
tracing their genealogical and political
trees into roots of this wild growth. There still
stands on an abrupt and narrow ledge of land, in
the confederation of Switzerland and in the Canton
of Argovie, a tottering ruin, that, in past ages, was
occupied by a knight, who from his aerie
overlooked
the adjoining village, and commanded the
services of its handful of boors. This ruined castle
was called Hapsbourg, and is celebrated as the
cradle
of that powerful family which has long sat upon
the throne of the Csars, and which now rules so
much of Germany and Upper Italy. The King of
Prussia traces his line to the House of
Hohenzollern
,
the offspring of another castle; and
numberless
are the instances in which he who thus laid the
corner-stone of a strong place, in ages when
security
was only to be had by good walls, also laid the
foundation of a long line of prosperous and puissant
princes.
Neither the position of the castle of Hartenburg,
however, nor the period in which it was founded,
was likely to lead to results great as these just
named. As has been said, it commanded a pass
important
for local purposes, but not of so much
moment
as to give him who held the hold any material
rights beyond its immediate influence. Still, as the
family of Leiningen was numerous, and had other
branches and other possessions in more favored
portions
of Germany, Count Emich was far from being
a mere mountain chief. The feudal system had
become
methodized long before his birth, and the laws
of the Empire secured to him many villages and
towns on the plain, as the successor of those who
had obtained them in more remote ages. He had
recently claimed even a higher dignity, and wider
territories, as the heir of a deceased kinsman; but
in this attempt to increase his power, and to elevate
his rank, he had been thwarted by a decision of his
peers. It was to this abortive assumption of dignity,
that he owed the soubriquet of the Summer
Landgrave
;
for such was the rank he had claimed, and
the period for which he had been permitted to bear it.
With this knowledge of the power of their
family
,
the reader will not be surprised to hear that
the castle of the Counts of Hartenburg, or, to be
more accurate, of the Counts of
Hartenburg-Leiningen
,
was on a commensurate scale. Perched on
the advanced spur of the mountain, just where the
valley was most confined, and at a point where the
little river made a short bend, the pass beneath lay
quite at the mercy of the archer on its battlements.
In the fore-ground, all that part of the edifice which
came into the view was military, and, in some slight
degree, fitted to the imperfect use that was then
made of artillery; while in the rear arose that maze
of courts, chapels, towers, gates, portcullises,
state-rooms
,
offices, and family apartments, that marked
the usages and tastes of the day. The hamlet which
lay in the dell, immediately beneath the walls of the
salient towers, or bastions, for they partook of both
characters, was insignificant, and of little account in
estimating the wealth and resources of the feudal
lord. These came principally from Deurckheim,
and the fertile plains beyond, though the forest was
not without its value, in a country in which the ax
had so long been used.
We have said that Emich of Leiningen was taking
his rest in the hold of Hartenburg. Let the reader
imagine a massive building, in the centre of the
confused
pile we have mentioned, rudely fashioned to
meet the wants of the domestic economy of that
age, and he will get a nearer view of the interior.
The walls were wainscoted, and had much uncouth
and massive carving; the halls were large and
gloomy, loaded with armor, and at this moment
pregnant with armed men; the saloons of the
medium
size which suited a baronial state, and all the
appliances of that mingled taste in which comfort
and luxury, as now understood, were unknown, but
which was not without a portion of the effect that
is produced by an exhibition of heavy magnificence.
With few but signal exceptions, Germany, even at
this hour, is not a country remarkable for the
elegancies
of domestic life. Its very palaces are of
simple decoration, its luxuries of a homebred and
inartificial kind, and its taste is rarely superior, and
indeed not always equal, to our own. There is still
a shade of the Gothic in the habits and opinions of
this constant people, who seem to cultivate the
subtle
refinements of the mind, in preference to the
more obvious and material enjoyments which
address
themselves to the senses.
Quaint and complicated ornaments, wrought by
the patient industry of a race proverbial for this
description
of ingenuity; swords, daggers, morions,
cuirasses, and all sorts of defensive armor then in
use; such needle-work, as it befitted a noble dame
H 2
to produce; pictures that possessed most of the
faults and few of the beauties of the Flemish school;
furniture that bore some such relation to the
garniture
of the palaces of electors and kings, as the
decorations of a village drawing-room in our own
time, bear to those of the large towns; a profuse
display of plate, on which the arms of Leiningen
were embossed and graven in every variety of style;
with genealogical trees and heraldic blazonry in
colors, were the principal features.
Throughout the whole pile, there was little
appearance
,
however, of the presence of females, or
even of the means of their accommodation. Few
of that sex were seen in the corridors, or offices,
or courts; though men crowded the place in
unusual
numbers. The latter were chiefly grim and
whiskered warriors, who loitered in the halls, or in
the more public parts of the castle, like idlers
waiting
for the expected movement of exertion. None
among them were armed at all points, though this
carelessly wore his morion, that had buckled on a
breast-plate, and another leaned listlessly on his
arquebuse
or handled his pike. Here a group
exercised
,
in levity, with their several weapons of
offence
;
there a jester amused a crowd of sluggish
listeners, with his ribaldry and humor; and
numberless
were those who quaffed of the Rhenish of their
lord. Although this continent had then been
discovered
,
the goodly portion which has since fallen to
our heritage was still in the hands of its native
proprietors
;
and the plant, so long known as the weed
of Virginia, but which has since become a staple of
so many other countries in this hemisphere, was not
in its present general use amongst the Germans;
else would it have been our duty to finish this hasty
sketch, by enveloping it all in mist.
Notwithstanding
the general air of indifference and negligence,
which reigned within the walls of Hartenburg,
without
the gates, in the turrets, and on the advanced
towers, there was the appearance of more than the
customary watchfulness. Had one been there to
note the circumstance, he would have seen, in
addition
to the sentries who always guarded the
approaches
of the castle, several swift-footed spies on
the look-out, in the hamlet, on the rocks of the
mountain-side, and along the winding paths; and
as all eyes were turned towards the valley in the
direction of Limburg, it was evident that the event
they awaited was expected to arrive from that
quarter.
While such was the condition of his hold and of
so strong a body of his vassals, Count Emich
himself
had retired from observation, to one of the
quaint, half-rude, half-magnificent saloons of the
place. The room was lighted by twenty tapers, and
other well-known signs indicated the near approach
of guests. He paced the large apartment with a
heavy and armed heel; while care, or at least
severe
thought, contracted the muscles around a hard
and iron brow, which bore evident marks of familiar
acquaintance with the casque. Perhaps this is the
only country of Christendom, even now, in which
the profession of the law is a pursuit still more
honorable
and esteemed than that of armsthe best
proof of a high and enviable civilizationbut at the
age of our narrative, the gentleman that was not of
the Church, the calling which nearly monopolized
all the learning of the times, was of necessity a
soldier
.
Emich of Leiningen carried arms therefore
as much in course, as the educated man of this
century
reads his Horace or Virgil; and as nature had
given him a vigorous frame, a hardy constitution,
and a mind whose indifference to personal suffering
amounted at times to ruthlessness, he was more
successful in his trade of violence, than many a
pale and zealous student proves in the cultivation of
letters.
The musing Count scarce raised his looks from
the oaken floor he trod, as menial after menial
appeared
,
moving with light step in the presence of
one so dreaded and yet so singularly loved. At
length a female, busy in some of the little offices of
her sex, glided before his half-unconscious sight.
The youth, the bloom, the playful air, the neat coif,
the tight boddice, and the ample folds of the falling
garments, at length seemed to fill his eye with the
form of his companion.
Is it thou, Gisela? he said, speaking mildly, as
one addresses a favored dependant. How fareth
it with the honest Karl?
I thank my lord the Count, his aged and
wounded
servant hath less of pain than is commonly his
lot. The limb he has lost in the service of the
House of Leiningen
No matter for the leg, girlthou art too apt to
dwell upon that mischance of thy parent.
Were my lord the Count to leave a limb on the
field, it might be missed when he was hurried!
Thinkest thou, child, that my tongue would
never address the Emperor without naming the
defect
?
Go to, Gisela; thou art a calculating hussy,
and rarely permittest occasion to pass without
allusion
to this growing treasure of thy family. Are
my people actively on the watch, with or without
their limbs?
They are as their natures and humors tend.
Blessed Saint Ursula knows where the officers of
the country have picked up so ungainly a band, as
these that now inhabit Hartenburg! One drinketh,
from the time his eyes open in the morn until they
shut at even; another sweareth worse than the
northern warriors that do these ravages in the
Palatinate
;
this a foul dealer in ribaldry; that a glutton
who never moveth lip but to swallow; and none,
nay, not a swaggerer of them all, hath civil word
for a maiden, though she be known as one esteemed
in their master's household.
They are my vassals, girl, and stouter men at
need are not mustered in Germany.
Stout in speech, and insolent of look, my Lord
Count, but most odious company to all, of modest
demeanor and of good intentions, in the hold.
Thou hast been humored by thy mistress, girl,
until thou sometimes forgettest discretion. Go and
look my guests are informed that the hour of the
banquet is at hand;I await the pleasure of their
presence.
Gisela, whose natural pertness had been
somewhat
heightened by an indulgent mistress, and in
whom consciousness of more beauty than ordinarily
falls to the share of females of her condition had
produced freedom of language that sometimes
amounted to temerity, betrayed her discontent in a
manner very common to her sex, when it is
undisciplined
,
or little restrained by a wholesome
education
.
She pouted, taking care however that Emich's
eye was again turned to the floor, tossed her head,
and quitted the room. Left to himself, the Count
relapsed into his reverie. In this manner did several
minutes pass unheeded.
Dreaming, as usual, noble Emich, of escalades
and excommunication! cried a gay voice at his
elbow, the speaker having entered the saloon unseen
of revengeful priests, of vassalage, of shaven
abbots, the confessional and penance dire, thy rights
redressed, the frowning conclave, the Abbey cellar,
thy morion, revenge, and, to sum up all, in a word
that covers every deadly sin, that fallen angel the
Devil!
Emich forced a grim smile at this unceremonious
and comprehensive salutation, accepting the offered
hand of him who uttered it, however, with the frank
freedom of a boon companion.
Thou art right welcome, Albrecht, he replied,
for the moment is near when my ghostly guests
should arrive; and to deal fairly by thee, I never
feel myself quite equal to a single combat of wits
with the pious knaves; but thy support will be
enough, though the whole Abbey community were
of the party.
Ay, we are akin, we sons of Saint John and
these bastards of Saint Benedict. Though more
martial than your monks of the hill, we of the island
are sworn to quite as many virtues. Let me see,
he added, counting on his fingers with an air of bold
licentiousness; firstly are we vowed to celibacy,
and your Benedictine is no less sothen are we
self-dedicated
to chastity, as is your Limburg monk;
next we respect our oaths, as does your Father
Bonifacius; then both are servants of the holy cross;
by a singular influence the speaker and the Count
made the sacred symbol on their bosoms, as the
former
uttered the word, and, doubt it not, I shall be
the equal of the reverend brotherhood. They say
sin can match sin, and saint should surely be saint's
equal! But, Emich, thou art graver than becometh
a hot carousal, like this we meditate!
And thou gay as if about to gallant the dames
of Rhodes to one of thy island festivals!
The Knight of Saint John regarded his attire
with complacency, strutting by the side of his host,
as the latter resumed his walk, with the air of a bird
of admired plumage. Nor was the remark of the
Count of Hartenburg misapplied, since his kinsman
and guest had, in reality, expended more labor on his
toilette than was customary in the absence of
females
,
and in that rude hold. Unlike the stern and
masculine Emich, who rarely divested himself of all
his warlike gear, the sworn defender of the Cross
appeared entirely in a peaceful guise, if the long
rapier that dangled at his side, and which to a much
later period formed an indispensable
accompaniment
of one of gentle condition, could be excepted
from the implements of war. His doublet, fully
decorated with embroidery, fringes, and loops, and
dotted with buttons, was of a pale orange stuff, that
was puffed and distended about his person, in the
liberal amplitude of the prevailing fashion. The
nether garment, which scarce appeared, however,
essential as it might be, was of the same material,
and cut with a similar expenditure of cloth. The
hose were pink, and, rolling far above the knee,
gave the effect of a rich coloring to the whole
picture
.
He wore shoes whose upper-leather rose
high against the small of the leg, buckles that
covered
the instep, and about the throat and wrists
there was a lavish display of lace. The well-known
Maltese cross dangled by a red ribbon, at a
button-hole
of the doublet; not above the heart, as is the
custom at present among the chevaliers of the other
hemisphere, but, by a vagary of taste, so low as to
demonstrate, if indeed there is any allusion intended
by the accidental position of these jewels, that the
honorable badge was assumed in direct reference to
that material portion of the human frame which is
believed to be the repository of good cheer; an
interpretation
that, in the case of Albrecht of
Viederbach
,
the knight in question, was perhaps much
nearer to the truth than he would have been willing
to own. After poising himself, first on the point of
one shoe, and then on the other, smoothing his
ruffles, shoving the rapier more aside, and otherwise
adjusting his attire to his mind, the professed soldier
of Saint John of Jerusalem pursued the discourse.
I am decent, kinsman, he replied; fit to be
a guest at thy hospitable board, if thou wilt, in the
absence of its fair mistress, but beyond that
unworthy
to be named. As for the dames of our
unhappy
and violated Rhodes, dear cousin, thou
knowest little of their humors, if thou fanciest that
this rude guise would have any charm in their
refined
eyes. Our knights were used to bring into
the island the taste and improvements of every
distant
land; and small though it be, there are few
portions
of the earth, in which the human arts, for so I
call the decoration of the human body, flourished
more than in our circumscribed, valiant, and much
regretted Rhodes. Thus was it, at least, until the
fell Ottoman triumphed!
'Fore God, I had thought thee sworn to all
sorts of modesty, in speech, life, and other
abstinences
!
And art thou not sworn, most mutinous Emich,
to obey thy liege lords, the Emperor and the Elector
nay, for certain of thy lands and privileges, art
thou not bound to knight's service and obedience to
the holy Abbot of Limburg?
God's curse on him and on all the others of that
grasping brotherhood!
Ay, that is but the natural consequence of thy
oath, as this doublet is of mine. If the rigid
performance
of a vow is as agreeable to the body, as we
are taught it may be healthful to the soul, Count of
Leiningen, where would be the merit of observance?
I never don these graceful garments, but a
wholesome
remembrance of watchful nights passed on
the ramparts, of painful sieges and watery trenches,
or of sickly cruises against the Mussulmans, do not
present themselves in the shape of past penances.
In this manner do we sweeten sin, by our bodily
pains, and by the memory of hours of virtuous
hardships!
By the three sainted Kings of Koeln, and the
eleven thousand virgins of that honored city, Master
Albrecht! but thou wert much favored in thy
narrow
island, if it were permitted to thee to sin in this
fashion, with the certainty of tempering punishment
with so light service! These griping monks of
Limburg make much of their favors, and he who
would go with a safe skin, must needs look to an
indulgence had and well paid for, in advance. I
know not the number of goodly casks of the purest
Rhenish that little sallies of humor may have cost
me, first and last, in this manner of princely
expenditure
;
but certain am I, that did occasion offer,
the united tributes would leave little empty space in
Prince Friedrich's vaunted tun, in his ample cellars
of Heidelberg!
I have often heard of that royal receptacle of
generous liquor, and have meditated a pilgrimage
in honor of its capacity. Does the Elector receive
noble travellers with a hospitality suited to his rank
and means?
That doth he, and right willingly, though this
war presses sorely, and giveth him other
employment
.
Thy wayfaring will not be weary, for thou
mayst see the towers of Heidelberg from off these
hills, and a worthy steed might be pricked from this
court of mine into that of Duke Friedrich in a
couple of hours of hard riding.
When the merits of thy cellar are exhausted,
noble Emich, it will be in season to put the Tun to
the proof, replied the Knight of Rhodes, as our
esteemed friend here, the Abb, will maintain, in
the face of all the reformers with which our
Germany
is infested.
In introducing another character, we claim the
reader's patience for a moment of digression.
Whatever
may be said of the merits and legality of the
Reformation, effected chiefly by the courage of
Luther
(and we are neither sectarian nor unbeliever, to
deny the sacred origin of the church from which he
dissented,) it is very generally admitted, that the
Vol. I. I
long and undisputed sway of the prevailing
authority
of that age, had led to abuses, which called
loudly for some change in its administration.
Thousands of those who had devoted their lives to
the administrations of the altar, were quite as
worthy of the sacred office as it falls to man's lot
to become; but thousands had assumed the tonsure,
the cowl, or the other symbols of ecclesiastical duty,
merely to enjoy the immunities and facilities the
character conferred. A long and nearly undisputed
monopoly of letters, the influence obtained by the
unnatural union between secular and religious
power, and the dependent condition of the public
mind, the legitimate consequence of both, induced
all who aspired to moral pre-eminence, to take this,
the most certain, because the most beaten, of the
paths that led to this species of ascendency. It is
not alone to the religion of Christendom, as it
existed
in the time of Luther, that we are to look for
an example of the baneful consequence of spiritual
and temporal authority, as blended in human
institutions
.
Christian or Mahommedan, Catholic or
Protestant, the evil comes in every case from the
besetting infirmity which tempts the strong to
oppress
the weak, and the powerful to abuse their
trusts. Against this failing there seems to be no
security but an active and certain responsibility.
So long as the severe morality required of its
ministers
,
by the Christian faith, is uncorrupted by any
gross admixture of worldly advantage, there is
reason
to believe that the altar, at least, will escape
serious defilement; but no sooner are these fatal
enemies admitted to the sanctuary, than a thousand
spirits, prompted by cupidity, rush rashly into the
temple, willing to bear with the outward exactions
of the faith, in order to seek its present and visible
rewards.
However pure may be a social system, or a
religion
,
in the commencement of its power, the
possession
of an undisputed ascendency lures all alike
into excesses fatal to consistency, to justice, and to
truth. This is a consequence of the independent
exercise of human volition, that seems nearly
inseparable
from human frailty. We gradually come
to substitute inclination and interest for right, until
the moral foundations of the mind are sapped by
indulgence
,
and what was once regarded with the
aversion that wrong excites in the innocent, gets to
be not only familiar, but justifiable by expediency
and use. There is no more certain symptom of the
decay of the principles requisite to maintain even
our imperfect standard of virtue, than when the plea
of necessity is urged in vindication of any
departure
from its mandate, since it is calling in the
aid of ingenuity to assist the passions, a coalition
that rarely fails to lay prostrate the feeble defences
of a tottering morality.
It is no wonder, then, that the world, at a period
when religious abuses drove even churchmen
reluctantly
to seek relief in insubordination, should
exhibit
bold instances of the flagrant excesses we have
named. Military ambition, venality, love of ease,
and even love of dissipation, equally sought the
mantle of religion as cloaks to their several objects;
and if the reckless cavalier was willing to flesh his
sword on the body of the infidel, in order that he
might live in men's estimation as a hero of the
cross, so did the trifler, the debauchee, and even
the wit of the capital, consent to obtain circulation
by receiving an impression which gave currency to
all coin, whether of purer or of baser metal, since
it bore the outward stamp of the Church of God.
Reformers, or rather revilers, for that is the
term they most merit, returned the Abb, alluded
to in the last speech of Albrecht of Veiderbach, I
consign without remorse to the devil. As for this
pledge of our brave Knight of Saint John, noble
Count Emich, so far as I am concerned, it shall be
redeemed: for I am certain the cellars of
Heidelberg
can resist a heavier inroad than any that is
likely to invade them by such means. But I am
late from my chamber, and I had hoped, ere this, to
have seen our brethren of Limburg! I hope no
unnecessary
misunderstanding is likely to deprive us
of the satisfaction of their presence, Lord Count?
Little fear of that, so far as it may depend on
any disappointment in a feast. If ever the devil
tempted these monks of the hill, it has been in the
shape of gluttony. Were I to judge by the
experience
of forty years passed in their neighborhood, I
should think they deem abstinence an eighth deadly
sin.
Your Benedictine is privileged to consider
hospitality
a virtue, and the Abbot has fair license for
the indulgence of some little cheer. We will not
judge them harshly, therefore, but form our
opinions
of their merits by their deeds. Thou hast
many servitors without, to do them honor to-night,
Lord Emich.
The Count of Leiningen frowned, and, ere he
answered, his eye exchanged a glance with that of
his kinsman, which the Abb might have interpreted
into a hidden meaning, had it attracted his
observation
.
My people gather loyally about their lord, for
they have heard of this succor sent by the Elector
to uphold the lazy Benedictines, was the reply.
Four hundred mercenaries lie within the Abbey
walls this night, Master Latouche, and it should not
cause surprise that the vassals of Emich of
Hartenburg
are ready with hand and sword to do service
in his defence. God's mercy! The cunning priests
may pretend alarm, but if any here hath cause to be
afraid, truly it is the rightful and wronged lord of
the Jaegerthal!
Thy situation, Cousin of Hartenburg, observed
the wearer of the cross of Saint John, is, in sooth,
one of masterly diplomacy. Here dost thou stand
at sword's point with the Abbot of Limburg, ready
at need to exchange deadly thrusts, and to put this
long-disputed supremacy on the issue of battle, while
thou callest on the keeper of thy cellar to bring forth
the choicest of its contents, in order to do hospitality
and honor to thy mortal foe! This beateth, in all
niceties, Monsieur Latouche, the situation of an
abb of thy quality, who is scarce churchman
enough to merit salvation, nor yet deep enough in
sin to be incontinently damned in the general mass
of evil-doers.
It is to be hoped that we shall share the
common
lot of mortals, which is to receive more grace
than they merit, returned the Abb, a title that in
fact scarce denoted one seriously devoted to the
Church. But I trust this present meeting between
the hostile powers may prove amicable; for, not to
conceal the truth, unlike our friend the Knight here,
I am of none of the belligerent orders.
Hark! exclaimed the host, lifting a finger to
command attention: Heard ye aught?
There is much of the music of thy growlers in
the courts, cousin, and some oaths in a German that
needs be translated to be understood; but that
blessed
signal the supper-bell is still mute.
Go to!'Tis the Abbot of Limburg and his
brethren, Fathers Siegfried and Cuno. Let us to
the portal, to do them usual honor.
As this was welcome news to both the Knight
and the Abb, they manifested a suitable desire to
be foremost in paying the required attention to a
personage, as important in that region as the rich
and powerful chief of the neighboring religious
establishment
.
I 2
CHAPTER VI.
Why not!The deeper sinner, better saint.
Byron.
A wild
and plaintive note had been sounded on
a horn far in the valley towards the hill of Limburg.
This melodious music was of common occurrence,
for of all that dwell in Europe, they who inhabit
the banks of the Rhine, the Elbe, the Oder, and the
Danube, with their tributaries, are the most addicted
to the cultivation of sweet sounds. We hear much
of the harshness of the Teutonic dialects, and of
the softness of those of Latin origin; but, Venice
and the regions of the Alps excepted, nature has
amply requited for the inequality that exists between
the languages, by the difference in the organs of
speech. He who journeys in those distant lands
must, as a rule, expect to hear German warbled and
Italian in a grand crash, though exceptions are
certainly
to be found in both cases. But music is far
more common on the vast plains of Saxony than on
the Campagna Felice, and it is no uncommon
occurrence
to be treated by a fair-haired postilion of the
former country, as he slowly mounts a hill, with airs
on the horn that would meet with favor in the
orchestra
of a capital. It was one of these
melancholy
and peculiar strains which now gave the
signal
to the spies of Count Emich, that his clerical
guests had quitted the convent.
Heard ye aught, brothers? demanded Father
Bonifacius of the companions who rode at his side,
nearly at the same moment that the Lord of
Leiningen
put the same question in his hold; that horn
spoke in a meaning strain!
We may be defeated in our wish to reach the
castle suddenly, returned the monk, already known
to the reader as Father Siegfried; but though we
fail in looking into Count Emich's secret with our
own eyes, I have engaged one to do that office for
us, and in a manner, I trust, that shall put us on the
scent of his designs. Courage, most holy Abbot,
the cause of God is not likely to fail for want of
succor. When were the meek and righteous ever
deserted?
The Abbot of Limburg ejaculated, in a manner to
express little faith in any miraculous interposition in
behalf of his cure, and he drew about him the mantle
that served in some degree to conceal his person,
spurring the beast he rode only the quicker, from a
feverish desire, if possible, to outstrip the sounds,
which he intuitively felt were intended to announce
his approach. The prelate was not deceived, for
no sooner did the wild notes reach the castle, than
the signal, which had caught the attention of its
owner, was communicated to those within the walls.
At the expected summons there was a general
movement among the idlers of the courts.
Subordinate
officers passed among the men, hurrying
those away to their secret lodging places who were
intractable from excess of liquor, and commanding
the more obedient to follow. In a very few minutes,
and long before the monks, who however pricked
their beasts to the utmost, had time to get near the
hamlet even, all in the hold was reduced to a state
of tranquil repose; the castle resembling the abode
of any other powerful baron, in moments of
profound
security. Emich had seen to this disposition
of his people in person, taking strict caution that no
straggler should appear, to betray the preparations
that existed within his walls. When this wise
precaution
was observed, he proceeded, with his two
companions, to take a station near the door of the
building more especially appropriated to the
accommodation
of himself and his friends, in order to
await the arrival of the monks.
The moon had ascended high enough to illuminate
the mountain-side, and to convert the brown towers
and ramparts of Hartenburg into picturesque forms,
relieved by gloomy shadows. The signals appeared
to have thrown all who dwelt in the hamlet, as well
as they who inhabited the frowning hold which
overhung that secluded spot, into mute attention.
For a few minutes the quiet was so deep and
general
,
that the murmuring of the rivulet which
meandered
through the meadows was audible. Then
came the swift clattering of hoofs.
Our churchmen are in haste to taste thy
Rhenish
,
noble Emich, said Albrecht of Viderbach, who
rarely thought; or is it a party of their sumpter
mules that I hear in the valley?
Were the Abbot about to journey to some other
convent of his order, or were he ready to visit his
spiritual master of Spires, there is no doubt that
many such cattle would be in his train; for of all
lovers of fat cheer, Wilhelm of Venloo, who has
been styled Bonifacius in his baptism of office, is he
that most worships the fruits of the earth. I would
he and all his brotherhood were spiritually planted
in the garden of Eden! They should be well
watered
with my tears!
The wish hath a saintly odor, but may not be
accomplished without mortal aidunless thou hast
favor with the Prince Elector of Koeln, who might
haply do thee that service, in the way of miracle.
Thou triflest, knight, in a matter of great
gravity
,
answered Emich roughly, for, notwithstanding
his inherited and deadly dislike of the particular
portion of the church which interfered with his own
power, the Count of Hartenburg had all the
dependence
on superior knowledge that is the unavoidable
offspring of a limited education. The Prince
Elector
hath served many noble families in the way thou
namest, and he might do honor to houses less
deserving
of his grace, than that of Leiningen. But
here cometh the Abbot and his boon associates.
God's curse await them for their pride and avarice!
The clattering of hoofs had been gradually
increasing
,
and was now heard even on the pavement
of the outer court; for in order to do honor to his
guests, the count had especially ordered there should
be no delay or impediment from gate, portcullis, or
bridge.
Welcome, and reverence for thy churchly office,
right holy Abbot! cried Emich, from whose lips
had just parted the malediction, advancing officiously
to aid the prelate in dismountingThou art
welcome
,
brothers both; worthy companions of thy
respected and honored chief.
The churchmen alighted, assisted by the menials
of Hartenburg, with much show of honor on the
part of the Count himself, and on that of his friends.
When fairly on their feet, they courteously returned
the greetings.
Peace be with thee, son, and with this cavalier
and servitor of the Church! said Father Bonifacius,
signing with the rapid manner in which a Catholic
priest scatters his benedictions. St. Benedict and
the Virgin take ye all in their holy keeping! I trust,
noble Emich, we have not given thee cause of
vexation
,
by some little delay?
Thou never comest amiss, father, be it at morn,
or be it at even; I esteem Hartenburg more than
honored, when thy reverend head passeth beneath
its portals.
We had every desire to embrace thee, son, but
certain offices of religion, that may not be neglected,
kept us from the pleasure. But let us within; for
I fear the evening air may do injury to those that
are uncloaked.
At this considerate suggestion, Emich, with much
show of respect to his guests, ushered them into the
apartment he had himself so lately quitted. Here
recommenced the show of those wily courtesies
which, in that semi-barbarous and treacherous age,
often led men to a heartless and sometimes to a
blasphemous
trifling with the most sacred obligations, to
effect their purposes, and which, in our times, has
degenerated to a deception, that is more measured
perhaps, but which is scarcely less sophisticated and
vicious. Much was said of mutual satisfaction at
this opportunity of commingling spirits, and the
blunt professions of the sturdy but politic baron,
were more than met by the pretending sanctity and
official charity of the priest.
The Abbot of Limburg and his companions had
come to the intended feast with vestments that
partially
concealed their characters; but when the
outer cloaks and the other garments were removed,
they remained in the usual attire of their order, the
prelate being distinguished from his inferiors by
those symbols of clerical rank, which it was usual
for one of his authority to display, when not
engaged
in the ministrations of the altar.
When the guests were at their ease, the
conversation
took a less personal direction, for though rude
and unnurtured as his own war-horse, as regards
most that is called cultivation in our bookish days,
Emich of Hartenburg wanted for none of the
courtesies
that became his rank, more especially as
civilities of this nature were held to be worthy of
a feudal lord, and in that particular region.
'Tis said, reverend Abbot, continued the host,
pushing the discourse to a point that might favor his
own secret views, that our common master, the
Prince Elector, is sorely urged by his enemies, and
that there are even fears a stranger may usurp the
rule in the noble Castle of Heidelberg. Hast thou
heard aught of his late distresses, or of the
necessities
that bear upon his house?
Masses have been said for his benefit in all our
chapels, and there are hourly prayers that he may
prevail against his enemies. In virtue of a
concession
made to the abbey, by our common father at
Rome, we offer liberal indulgences, too, to all that
take up arms in this behalf.
Thou art much united in love with Duke
Friedrich
,
holy prelate! muttered Emich.
We owe him such respect as all should willingly
pay to the strong temporal arm that shields them;
our serious fealty is due alone to heaven. But how
comes it that so stout a baron, one so much esteemed
in warlike exercises, and so well known in
dangerous
enterprises, rests in his doublet, at a time when
his sovereign's throne is tottering? We had heard
that thou wert summoning thy people, Herr Count,
and thought it had been in the Elector's interest.
Friedrich hath not of late given me cause to
love him. If I have called my vassals about me,
'tis because the times teach every noble to be wary
of his rights. I have consorted so much of late
with my cousin of Viederbach, this self-denying
Knight of Rhodes, that martial thoughts will obtrude
even on the brain of one, peaceful and homebred as
thy poor neighbor and penitent.
The Abbot bowed and smiled, like one who gave
full credit to the speaker's words, while a by-play
arose between the wandering and houseless knight,
the abb, and the brothers of Limburg. In this
manner did a few minutes wear away, when a
flourish of trumpets announced that the expected
banquet awaited its guests. Menials lighted the
party to the hall in which the board was spread,
and much ceremonious form was observed in
assigning
to each of the individuals the place suited
to his rank and character. Count Emich, who in
common was of a nature too blunt and severe to
waste his efforts in superfluous breeding, now
showed himself earnest to please, for he had at
heart an object that he knew was in danger of
being baffled by the more practised artifices of the
monks. During the preliminary movements of the
feast, which had all the gross and all the profuse
hospitality which distinguished such entertainments,
he neglected no customary observance. The
robust
and sensual Abbot was frequently plied with
both cup and dish, while the inferior monks
received
the same agreeable attentions from Albrecht
of Viederbach, and Monsieur Latouche, who,
notwithstanding
it suited his convenience to pass
through life under the guise of a churchman, was
none the worse at board or revel. As the viands
and the generous liquors began to operate on the
physical functions of the brothers, however, they
insensibly
dropped their masks, and each discovered
more of those natural qualities, which usually lay
concealed from casual observation.
It was a rule of the Benedictines to practise
hospitality
.
The convent door was never closed
against the wayfarer, and he who applied for
shelter and food was certain of obtaining both,
administered
more or less in a manner suited to the
applicant's ordinary habits. The practice of a
virtue
so costly was a sufficient pretence for
accumulating
riches, and he who travels at this day in
Europe will find ample proofs that the means of
carrying into effect this law of the order were
abundantly supplied. Abbeys of this particular
class of monks are still of frequent occurrence in the
forest cantons of Switzerland, Germany, and in
most of the other Catholic states. But the gradual
and healthful transfer of political power from
clerical
to laical hands, has long since shorn them of
their temporal lustre. Many of these abbots were
formerly princes of the empire, and several of the
communities exercised sovereign sway over
territories
that have since taken to themselves the
character
of independent states.
While the spiritual charge and the mortifications
believed to characterize a brotherhood of
Benedictines
,
were more especially left to a subordinate
monk termed the prior, the abbot, or head of the
establishment, was expected to preside not only
over the temporalities, but at the board. This
frequent
communication with the vulgar interests of
life, and the constant indulgence in its grosser
gratifications
,
were but ill adapted to the encouragement
of the monastic virtues. We have already remarked
that the intimate connexion between the interests of
life and those of the church is destructive of
apostolical
character. This blending of God with
Mammon
,
this device of converting the revealed
ordinances
of the Master of the Universe into a species
of buttress to uphold temporal sway, though habit
has so long rendered it familiar to the inhabitants
of the other hemisphere, and even to a large portion
of those who dwell in this, is, in our American eyes,
only a little removed from blasphemy; but the
triumphs
of the press, and the changes made by the
steady advances of public opinion, have long since
done away with a multitude of still more equivocal
usages, that were as familiar to those who existed
three centuries ago, as our own customs to us at
this hour. When prelates were seen in armor,
leading their battalions to slaughter, it is not to be
supposed that the other dignitaries of this privileged
class, would be more tender of appearances than
was exacted by the opinions of the age.
Wilhelm of Venloo, known since his elevation as
Bonifacius of Limburg, was not possessed of all
that temporal authority, however, which tempted so
many of his peers to sin. Still he was the head of
K
a rich, powerful, and respected brotherhood, that
had many allodial rights in lands beyond the abbey
walls, and which was not without its claims to the
fealty of sundry dependants. Of vigorous mind
and body, this dignified churchman commanded
much influence by means of a species of character
that often crosses us in life, a sturdy independence
of thought and action that imposed on the credulous
and timid, and which sometimes caused the bold
and intelligent to hesitate. His reputation was far
greater for learning than for piety, and his besetting
sin was well known to be a disposition to encounter
the shock between the powers of mind and matter,
as both were liable to be affected by deep potations
and gross feedinga sort of degeneracy to which
all are peculiarly liable, who place an unnatural
check on the ordinary and healthful propensities of
naturejust as one sense is known to grow in
acuteness as it is deprived of a fellow. The abbot
loosened his robe, and threw his cowl still farther
from his neck, while Emich pledged him in Rhenish,
cup after cup; and by the time the meats were
removed
,
and the powers of digestion, or we might
better say of retention, would endure no more, his
heavy cheeks became flushed, his bright,
deeply-seated
,
and searching gray eyes flashed with a
species
of ferocious delight, and his lip frequently
quivered
,
as the clay gave eloquent evidence of its
enjoyment
.
Still his voice, though it had lost its
rebuked
and schooled tones, was firm, deep, and
authoritative
,
and ever and anon he threw into his
discourse some severe and pointed sarcasm, bitingly
scornful. His subordinates, too, gave similar proofs
of the gradual lessening of their caution, though in
degrees far less imposing, we had almost said less
grand, than that which rendered the sensual
excitement
of their superior so remarkable. Albrecht
and the abb also betrayed, each in his own manner,
the influence of the banquet, and all became
garrulous
,
disputative, and noisy.
Not so with Emich of Hartenburg. He had
eaten in a manner to do justice to his vast frame
and bodily wants, and he drank fairly; but, until
this moment, the nicest observer would have been
puzzled to detect any decrease of his powers. The
blue of his large leaden eyes became brighter, it is
true, but their expression was yet in command, and
their language courteous.
Thou dost but little compliment to my poor fare,
most holy Abbot, cried the host, as he witnessed a
lingering look of the prelate, whose eye followed
the delicious fragments of a wild boar from the hall
If the knaves have stinted thee in the choice of
morsels, by St. Benedict! but the mountains of my
chase can still furnish other animals of the kind
How now
I pray thee, mercy, noble Emich! Thy
forester
hath done thee fair justice with his spear; more
savory beast never smoked at table.
It fell by the hand of young Berchthold, the
burgher of Deurckheim's orphan. 'Tis a bold youth
in the forest, and I doubt not, his will one day be a
ready hand in battle. Thou knowest him I mean,
father, for he is often at thy abbey confessionals.
He is better known to the prior than to one so
busied with worldly cares as I. Is the youth at
hand? I would fain render him thanks.
Hear ye that, varlet! Bid my head forester
appear. The reverend and noble Abbot of Limburg
owes him grace.
Didst thou say the youth was of Deurckheim?
Of that goodly town, reverend priest; and,
though reduced by evil chances to be the ranger of
my woods, a lad of mettle in the chase, and of no
bad discourse in moments of ease.
Thou claimest hard service, Cousin of
Hartenburg
,
of these peaceful townsmen! Were they left
freely to choose between the ancient duty of our
convent, and this stirring life thou leadest the
artisans, we should have more penitents within our
walls.
The feality of Deurckheim was a long mooted
point between the corporation of Limburg and the
house of Leiningen, and the allusion of the monk
was not thrown away upon his host. Emich's
brow clouded, and for a moment it threatened a
storm; but, recovering his self-command, he
answered
in a tone of hilarity, though with sufficient
coolness:
Thy words remind me of present affairs,
reverend
Bonifacius, and I thank thee that thou hast put
a sudden check on festivities which were getting
warm without an object. The Count arose, and
filled to the brim a cup of horn, elaborately
ornamented
with gold, drawing the attention of all at
table to himself by the action. Nobles and
reverend
servants of God, he continued, I drink to the
health and happiness of the honored Wilhelm of
Venloo, the holy Abbot of Limburg, and my loving
neighbor. May his brotherhood never know a
worse guide, and may the lives and contentment of
all that now belong to it, be as lasting as the abbey
walls.
Emich concluded the potent cup at a single
draught. In order to do honor to the mitred monk,
there had been placed by the side of Bonifacius, a
vessel of agate richly decorated with jewelry, an
heir-loom of the house of Leiningen. While his
host was speaking, the looks of the latter watched
every expression of his countenance, through gray,
overhanging, shaggy brows, that shaded the upper
part of his face like a screen of shrubbery planted
to shut out prying eyes from a close; and he paused
when the health was given. Then, rising in his
turn, he quaffed a compliment in return.
I drink of this pure and wholesome liquor, he
said, to the noble Emich of Leiningen, to all of his
ancient and illustrious house, to his and their present
hopes, and to their final deliverance. May this
goodly hold, and the happiness of its lord, endure as
long as those walls of Limburg of which the Count
has spoken, and which, were his loving wishes
consulted
,
would doubtless stand for ever.
By the life of the emperor, learned Bonifacius!
exclaimed Emich, striking his fist on the table with
force, you as much exceed one of my narrow wit
in wishes, as in godliness and other excellencies!
But I pretend not to set limits to my desires in
your behalf, and throw the fault of my imperfect
speech on a youth that had more to do with the
sword than with the breviary. And now let us to
serious concerns. It may not be known to you,
Cousin of Viederbach, or to this obliging
churchman
who honors Hartenburg with his presence,
that there has been subject of amicable dispute
between
the brotherhood of Limburg and my
unworthy
house, touching the matter of certain wines,
that are believed by the one party to be its dues,
and by the other to be a mere pious grace accorded
to the church
Nay, noble Emich, interrupted the Abbot, we
have never held the point to be disputable in any
manner. The lands in question are held of us in
soccage; and, in lieu of bodily service, we have
long since commuted for the produce of vines that
might be named.
I cry you mercy; if there be dues at all, they
come of naught else than knight's service. None
of my name or lineage ever paid less to mortal!
Let it be thus, Bonifacius answered more
K 2
mildly. The question is of the amount of liquor,
and not of the tenure whence it comes.
Thou sayest right, wise Abbot, and I cry mercy
of these listeners. State thou the matter, reverend
Bonifacius, that our friends may know the humor
on which we are madly bent.
The Count of Hartenburg succeeded in
swallowing
his rising ire, and made a gesture of courtesy
towards the Abbot, as he concluded. Father
Bonifacius
rose again, and notwithstanding the physical
ravages that excess was making within, it was still
with the air of calmness and discipline that became
his calling.
As our upright and esteemed friend has just
related, he said, there is truly a point, of a light
but unseemly nature to exist between so dear
neighbors
,
open between him and us servants of God.
The Counts of Leiningen have long considered it a
pleasure to do favor to the Church, and in this just
and commendable spirit, it is now some fifty years
that, at the termination of each vintage, without
regard to seasons or harvest, without stooping to
change their habits at every change of weather,
they have paid to our brotherhood
Presented, priest!
Presented,if such is thy will, noble Emich,
fifty casks of this gentle liquor that now warms our
hearts towards each other, with brotherly and
praiseworthy affection. Now, it has been settled
between us, to avoid all future motive of
controversy
,
and either the better to garnish our cellars,
or to relieve the house of Hartenburg altogether of
future imposition, that it shall be decided this night,
whether the tribute henceforth shall consist of one
hundred casks, or of nothing.
By're Lady! A most important issue, and one
likely to impoverish or to enrich! exclaimed the
Knight of Rhodes.
As such we deem it, continued the monk, and
in that view, parchments of release, with all due
appliances and seals, have been prepared by a
clerkly scholar of Heidelberg. This indenture, duly
executed, he added, drawing from his bosom the
instruments in question, yieldeth to Emich all the
Abbey's rights to the vines in dispute, and this
wanteth but his sign of arms and noble name, to
double their present duty.
Hold! cried the Chevalier of the Cross, whose
faculties began already to give way, though it was
only in the commencement of the debauch: Here
is matter might puzzle the Grand Turk, who sits in
judgment in the very seat of Solomon! If thou
renderest thy claims, and my cousin Emich yieldeth
double tribute-money, both parties will be the worse,
and neither possessed of the liquor!
In a merry mood, it hath been proposed that
there shall be the trial of love and not of battle,
between
us, for the vines. The question is of liquor,
and it is agreed,St. Benedict befriend me, if there
be sin in the folly! to try on whose constitution the
disputed liquor is the most apt to work good or evil.
Let the Count of Hartenburg give to his parchment
the virtue that hath already been given to this
of ours, and we shall leave both in some place of
observation;then, when he alone is able to rise
and seize on both, let him give the victor's cry; but
should he fail of that power, and there be a servant
of the Church ready, and able to grasp the
instruments
,
why let him go, and think no more of land
that he hath right merrily lost.
By St. John of Jerusalem, but this is a most
unequal
contestthree monks against one poor baron,
in a trial of heads!
Nay, we think more of our honor, than to
permit
this wrong. The Count of Hartenburg hath full
right to call in equal succor, and I have taken thee,
gallant cavalier of Rhodes, and this learned Abb,
to be his chosen backers!
Let it be so! cried the two in question,We
ask no better service than to drain Count Emich's
cellars to his honor and profit!
But the lord of the hold had taken the matter, as
indeed it was fully understood between the
principals
,
to be a question on which depended a serious
amount of revenue, for all futurity. The wager
had arisen, in one of those wild contests for physical
and gross supremacy, which characterize ages and
countries of imperfect civilization; for next to deeds
in arms and other manful exercises, like those of the
chase and saddle, it was deemed honorable to be
able to undergo the trials of the festive board with
impunity. Nor should it occasion surprise to find
churchmen engaged in these encounters; for,
independently
of our writing of an age when they
appeared
in the field, there is sufficient evidence that
our own times are not entirely purified from so
coarse abuses of the gown. But Bonifacius of
Limburg
,
though a man of extensive learning and
strong intellectual qualities, had a weakness on this
particular point, for which we may be driven to
seek an explanation in his peculiar animal
construction
.
He was of a powerful frame and sluggish
temperament, both of which required strong
excitement
to be wrought up to the highest point of
physical
enjoyment; and neither the examples around
him, nor his own particular opinions, taught him to
avoid a species of indulgence that he found so
agreeable to his constitution. With these serious
views of a contest, to which neither party would
probably have consented, had not each great
confidence
in himself as a well-tried champion, both
Emich and the Abbot required that the instruments
should be openly read. The discharge of this duty
was assigned to Monsieur Latouche, who forthwith
proceeded to wade through a torrent of
unintelligible
terms, that were generated in the obscurity of
feudal times for the benefit of the strong, and which
are continued to our own period through pride of
professional knowledge, a little quickened by a
view to professional gain. On the subject of the
true consideration of the respective releases, the
instruments themselves were silent, though nothing
material was wanting to give them validity,
especially
when supported by a good sword; or the
power of the Church, to which the parties looked
respectively in the event of flaws.
Count Emich listened warily as his guest the
Abb read clause after clause of the deed.
Occasionally
his eye wandered to the firm countenance
of the Abbot, betraying habitual distrust of his
hereditary and powerful enemy, but it was quickly
riveted again on the heated features of the reader.
This is well, he said, when both papers had
been examined: These vines are to remain for
ever with me and mine, without claim from any
grasping churchman, so long as grass shall grow
or water run, or henceforth they pay double tribute,
a tax that will leave little for the cellar of their
rightful lord.
Such are our terms, noble Emich. But to
confirm
the latter condition, thy seal and name are
wanting to the instrument.
Were the latter to be written by a good sword,
none could do the office better than this poor arm,
reverend Abbot; but thou knowest well, that my
youth was too much given to warlike and other
manly exercises befitting my rank, to allow much
time for acquiring clerkly skill. By the holy Virgins
of Koeln! It were, in sooth, a shame to confess, that
one of my class in these stirring times had leisure
for such lady games! Bring hither an eagle's
featherhand of mine never yet touched aught
from meaner wingthat I may do justice to the
monks.
The necessary implements being produced, the
Count of Hartenburg proceeded to execute the
instrument
on his part. The wax was speedily
attached and duly impressed with the bearings of
Leiningen, for the noble wore a signet-ring of
massive
size, ready at all times to give this token of his
will. But when it became necessary to subscribe
the name, a signal was made to a domestic, who
disappeared in quest of the Count's man of charge.
This individual manifested some reluctance to
perform
the customary office, but, as there was just
then a clamorous dialogue among the party at
table, he seized the moment to examine into the
nature of the document, and the consideration that
was to decide the ownership of the vineyard.
Grinning
in satisfaction, at a species of payment in
which he held it to be impossible Lord Emich could
fail to acquit himself honorably, the dependant took
the hand of his master, and, accustomed to the
duty, he so guided it as to leave a very legible and
creditable signature. When this had been done,
and the papers were properly witnessed, the Count
of Hartenburg glanced suspiciously from the deed
in his hand to the indomitable face of the Abbot, as
if he still half repented of the act. Look you,
Bonifacius, he said, shaking a finger,Should
there be flaw, or doubt of any intention in this our
covenant, sword of mine shall cut it!
First earn the right, Count of Leiningen. The
deeds are of equal virtue, and he who would lay
claim to their benefits must win the wager. We
are but poor brothers of St. Benedict, and little
worthy to be named with warlike barons and
devoted
followers of St. John, but we have an humble
trust in our patron.
By St. Benedict, it shall pass for a miracle, if
thou prevailest! shouted Emich, yielding the deed
in a burst of delight. A way with these cups of
agate and horn, and bring forth vessels of glass,
that all may see we deal fairly by each other, in
this right manly encounter. Look to your wits,
monks.By the word of a cavalier, your Latin will
do little service in this dispute.
Our trust is in our patron, answered Father
Siegfried, who had already done so much honor to
the banquet, as to give reason to believe, that, in
his case, the fraternity leaned upon a fragile staff.
He never yet deserted his children, when fairly
enlisted
in a good cause.
You are cunning in reasons, fathers, put in the
knightand I doubt not that sufficient excuses
would be forthcoming, were you pushed to justify
service to the devil.
We suffer for the church, was the Abbot's
answer
,
after taking a bumper in obedience to a signal
from his host. We hold it to be commendable to
struggle with the flesh, that our altars may flourish.
As soon as executed, the two deeds had been
placed on a high and curiously wrought vessel of
silver, that contained cordials, and which occupied
the centre of the board, and more fitting cups
having
been brought, the combatants were compelled to
swallow draught after draught, at signals from
Emich, who, like a true knight, saw that each man
showed loyalty. But, as the conflict was between
men of great experience in this species of
contention
,
and as it endured hours, we deem it unworthy
of the theme to limit its description to a single
chapter
.
Before closing the page, however, we shall
digress
for a moment, in order to express our opinions
concerning the great human properties involved in
this sublime strife.
It has been the singular fortune of America to be
the source of numberless ingenious theories, that,
taking their rise in the other hemisphere, have been
let loose upon the world to answer ends that we
shall not stop to investigate. The dignified and
beneficed prelate maintains there is no worship of
God within our land, probably because there are no
dignified and beneficed prelates; a sufficiently logical
conclusion for all who believe in the efficacy of that
self-denying class of Christians; while the neophyte,
in some lately invented religion, denounces us all in
a body, as so many miserable bigots, devoted to
Christ! In this manner is a pains-taking and
plain-dealing
nation of near fourteen millions of souls kept,
as it were, in abeyance in the opinions of the rest
of mankind, one deeming them as much beyond, as
another fancies them to be short of, truth. In the
fearful catalogue of our deadly sins, is included a
propensity to indulge in excesses similar to that it is
now our office to record. As we are confessedly
democrats, dram-drinking in particular has been
pronounced
to be a democratic vice.
It has been our fortune to have lived in familiarity
with a greater variety of men, either considered in
reference to their characters or their conditions, than
ordinarily falls to the lot of any one person. We have
visited many lands, not in the capacity of a courier,
but staidly and soberly, as becomes a grave
occupation
,
setting up our household gods, and abiding
long enough to see with our eyes and to hear with
our ears; and we feel emboldened to presume on
these facts, in order to express a different opinion,
amid the flood of assertions that has been made by
those who certainly have no better claim to be heard.
And, firstly, we shall here say that, as in the course
of justice, an intelligent, upright, single-minded, and
discriminating witness is, perhaps, the rarest of all
desirable instruments in effecting its sacred ends, so
do we acknowledge a traveller, entitled to full credit,
to be the mortal of all others the least likely to be
found.
The art of travelling, we apprehend, is far more
practised than understood. To us it has proved
a laborious, harassing, puzzling, and oftentimes a
painful pursuit. To divest oneself of impressions
made in youth; to investigate facts without
referring
their merits to a standard bottomed on a
foundation
no better than habit; to analyze, and justly to
compare the influence of institutions, climate, natural
causes, and practice; to separate what is merely
exception from that which forms the rule; or even
to obtain and carry away accurate notions of
physical
things, and, most of all, to possess the gift of
imparting
these results comprehensively and with
graphical truth, requires a combination of time,
occasion
,
previous knowledge, and natural ability, that
rarely falls to the lot of a single individual. One
assumes
the task prepared by acquaintance with
established
opinions, which are commonly no more than
prejudices, the result of either policy, or of the very
difficulties just enumerated; and he goes on his way,
not only ready but anxious to receive the proofs of
what he expects, limiting his pleasure to the sort of
delight, that dependent minds feel in following the
course pointed out by those that are superior. As
the admitted peculiarities of every people are
sufficiently
apparent, he converts self-evident facts into
collateral testimony, and faithfully believes and
imagines
all that is concealed on the strength of that
which is obvious. For such a traveller time wears
away men and things in vain; he accords his
belief
to the last standard opinion of his sect, with a
devotion to convention that might purchase
salvation
in a better cause. To him Vesuvius is just as
high, produces the same effect in the view, and has
exactly the same outline as before the crater fell;
and he watches the workmen disinterring a house
Vol. I. L
at its base, and goes away rejoicing at having
witnessed
the resurrection of a Roman dwelling after
eighteen hundred years of interment, simply because
it is the vulgar account that Pompeii was lost for
that period. If he should happen to be a scholar,
what is his delight in following a cicerone (a title
assumed by some wily
servitore di Piazza
) to the
little garden that overlooks the Roman Forum, and
in fancying that he stands upon the Tarpeian Rock!
His faith in moral qualities, his graduation of national
virtue, and his views of manners, are equally the
captives of the last popular rumor. A Frenchman
may roll incontinently in the
gras de Paris,
filled
with an alcohol inflammable as gunpowder, and in
his eyes it shall pass for pure animal
light-heartedness
,
since it is out of all rule for a Frenchman to
be intoxicated, while the veriest tyro knows that the
nation dances to a man! The gallant general, the
worshipful alderman, the right honorable adviser of
the king, may stammer around a subject for half an
hour, in St. Stephen's, in a manner to confound all
conclusion, and generalize so completely as to baffle
particularity, and your hearer shall go away
convinced
of the excellence of the great school of
modern eloquence, because the orator has been
brought up at the feet of Gamaliel. When one
thoroughly imbued with this pliant faculty, gets into
a foreign land, with what a diminished reverence
for his own does he journey! As few men are
endowed
with sufficient penetration to pierce the mists
of received opinion, fewer still are they that are so
strong in right as to be able to stem its tide. He who
precedes his age is much less likely to be heard,
than he who lingers in its rear; and when the
unwieldy
body of the mass reaches the eminence on
which he has long stood the object of free comment,
it may be assumed as certain, that they who were
his bitterest deriders when his doctrine was new,
will be foremost in claiming the honors of the
advance
.
In short, to instruct the world, it is
necessary
to watch the current, and to act on the public
mind like the unseen rudder, by slight and
imperceptible
variations, avoiding, as a seaman would
express
it, any very rank sheer, lest the vessel should
refuse to mind her helm and go down with the
stream.
We have been led into these reflections, by
frequent
opportunities of witnessing the facility with
which opinions are adopted concerning ourselves,
because they have come from the pens of those who
have long contributed to amuse and instruct us, but
which are perfectly valueless, both from the
unavoidable
ignorance of those who utter them, and
from the hostile motives that gave them birth. To
that class which would wish to put in a claim to
bon
ton,
by undervaluing their countrymen, we have
nothing
to say, since they are much beyond
improvement
,
and are quite unable to understand all the high
and glorious consequences dependent on the great
principles of which this republic is the guardian.
Their fate was long since settled by a permanent
and wise provision of human feeling; but,
presuming
on the opportunities mentioned, and long habits
of earnest observation in the two hemispheres, we
shall conclude this digression by merely adding, that
it is the misfortune of man to abuse the gifts of God,
let him live in what country or under what
institutions
he may. Excess of the description in question
is the failing of every people, nearly in proportion
to their means; nor are there any certain
preventives
against a vice so destructive, but absolute
want, or a high cultivation of the reasoning
faculties
.
He who has accurately ascertained how far the
people of this republic are behind or before the
inhabitants
of other lands, in mental improvement and
moral qualities, will not be far from the truth in
assigning
to them a correspondent place in the scale
of sobriety. It is true that many foreigners will be
ready enough to deny this position, but we have had
abundant opportunities of observing, that all those
who visit our shores do not come sufficiently
prepared
,
by observation at home, to make just
comparisons
,
and what we have here said has not been
ventured without years of close and honest
investigation
.
We shall gladly hail the day when it can
be said, that not an American exists, so lost to
himself
as to trifle with the noblest gift of the Creator;
but we cannot see the expediency of attaining an
end, desirable even as this, by the concession of
premises that are false.
CHAPTER VII.
What a thrice-double ass
Was I, to take this drunkard for a god!
Caliban
Physical
qualities are always prized in proportion
to the value that is attached to those that are purely
intellectual. So long as power and honor depend
on the possession of brute force, strength and agility
are endowments of the last importance, on the same
principle that they render the tumbler of more
account
in his troop; and he who has ever had
occasion
to mingle much with the brave, and subject to
a qualification that will readily be understood, we
might add, the noble savages of this continent, will
have remarked, that, while the orators are in
general
a class who have cultivated their art for want
of qualifications to excel in that which is deemed
still more honorable, the first requisite in the
warrior
is stature and muscle. There exists a curious
document to prove how much even their successors,
a people in no degree deficient in acuteness, have
been subject to a similar influence. We allude to a
register that was made of the thews and sinews
among the chiefs of the army of Washington, during
the moment of inaction that preceded the
recognition
of Independence. By this report it would
seem, that the animal entered somewhat into the
ideas of our fathers, when they made their original
selection of leaders, a circumstance that we
attribute
to the veneration that man is secretly disposed
to show to physical perfection, until a better
training
and experience have taught him there is still a
superior power. Our first impressions are almost
always received through the senses, and the
connexion
between martial prowess and animal force seems
so natural, that we ought not to be surprised that a
people so peaceful and unpractised, in their
simplicity
,
betrayed a little of this deference to
appearances
.
Happily, if they sometimes put matter into
stations which would have been better filled by
mind, the honesty and zeal that were so general in
the patriotic ranks carried the country through in
triumph.
It was a consequence of the high favor enjoyed
by all manly or physical qualities in the sixteenth
century
,
that men were even prized for their excesses.
Thus he who could longest resist the influence of
liquor was deemed, in a more limited sense, as
much a hero as he who swung the heaviest mace,
or pointed the surest cannon in battle. The
debauch
in which the Abbot of Limburg and his
neighbor Emich of Leiningen, were now engaged,
was one of no unusual nature; for, in a country in
which prelates appeared in so many other doubtful
characters, it should not excite surprise that some
of the class were willing to engage in a strife that
L 2
had little danger, while it was so highly in favor
with the noble and the great.
The reader will have seen that great progress
had been made towards the issue of the celebrated
encounter it is our duty to relate, even before its
precise object had been formally introduced among
the contending parties. But while the monks came
to the struggle apprized of its motive, and prepared
at all points to maintain the reputation of their
ancient and hospitable brotherhood, the Count of
Leiningen, with a sullen reliance on his own powers,
that was somewhat increased by his contempt for
priestcraft, had neglected to bestow the same care
on his auxiliaries. It is scarcely necessary to add
that both the Abb and the knight of Rhodes had
become heated to garrulousness, before they
perfectly
understood the nature of the service that was
expected at their hands, or, we ought rather to say,
of their heads. With this explanation we shall
resume the narrative, taking up its thread some two
hours later than the moment when it was last
dropped.
At this particular juncture of the strife, Fathers
Siegfried and Cuno had become thoroughly warmed
with their endeavors, and habitual and profound
respect for the Abbot was gradually giving way
before the quickening currents of their blood. The
eyes of the former glistened with a species of
forensic
ferocity, for he was ardently engaged on a
controversial
point with Albrecht of Viederbach, all of
whose faculties appeared to be rapidly exhaling
with his potations. The other Benedictine and the
Abb from time to time mingled in the dispute, in
the character of seconds, while the two most
interested
in the issue sat, warily collecting their powers,
and sternly regarding each other, like men who
knew they were not engaged in idle sport.
This is well, with thy tales of L'Isle Adam, and
the Ottoman power, continued Father Siegfried,
pursuing the discourse from a point, beyond which
we consider it unnecessary to record all that passed
This will do to repeat to the dames of our
German
courts, for the journey between these Rhenish
plains and yonder island of Rhodes is far, and few
are inclined to make it, in order to convict thy
chiefs of neglect, or their sworn followers of
forgetfulness
of their vows.
By the quality of my order! reverend
Benedictine
,
thou pushest words to unseemliness! Is it not
enough, that the chosen and the gentlest of Europe
should devote soul and body to services that would
better become thy lazy orderthat all that is noble
and brave should abandon the green fields and
pleasant rivers of their native lands, to endure hot
suns and sultry winds from Africa, in order to keep
the unbeliever in his limits, but they must be taunted
with gibes like these? Go, count the graves and
number the living, if thou wouldst learn the manner
in which our illustrious master held out against
Solyman
,
or wouldst know the services of his knights!
It would sound ill in thy ears, were I to bid thee
enter purgatory, to inquire into the fruits of our
masses and prayers, and yet one and the other are
equally easy to perform. Thou knowest well, that
Rhodes is no longer a Christian island, and that
none bearing the cross dare be seen on its shores.
Go to, Count Albrecht, thy order is fallen into
disuse
,
and it is better where it is, hid beneath the
snowy mountains of the country of Nice, than it
might be in the front ranks of Christendom. There
is not a crone in Germany that does not bewail the
backsliding of an order so esteemed of old, or a
maiden that does not speak lightly of its deeds!
Heavenly patience! hearest thou this, Monsieur
Latouche? and from the mouth of a chanting
Benedictine
,
who passeth his days between safe walls of
stone, here in the heart of the Palatinate, and his
nights on a warm pallet, beyond sound even of the
rushing winds, unless, in sooth, he be not bent on
offices of midnight charity among the believing
wives of the faithful!
Boy! dost presume to scandalize the Church,
and dare its anger? demanded Bonifacius, in a
voice of thunder.
Reverend Abbot, answered Albrecht, crossing
himself, for habit and policy equally held him
subject
to the predominant authority of the age, the
little I say is more directed to the man than to his
cloth.
Let him give utterance to all he fancies,
interrupted
the wily Siegfried. Is not a knight of
Rhodes immaculate, and shall we refuse him right
of speech?
It is held at the court of the chivalrous Valois,
observed the Abb, who perceived it was necessary
to interfere, in order to preserve the peace, that
the defence of Rhodes was of exceeding valor, and
few survived it, who did not meet with high honors
from Christian hands. We have seen numberless
of the brave knights among us, in the most esteemed
houses of Paris, and at the merry castle of
Fontainebleau
,
and believe me, none were more sought, or
better honored. The scars of even Marignano
and of Pavia are less prized than those given by the
hands of the infidel.
Thou dost well, my learned and self-denying
brother, answered Siegfried, with a sneer, to
remind
us of the fight of Pavia, and of thy great
master's
present abode! Are these tidings of late from
the Castiles, or is it not permitted to thy prince to
dispatch couriers to his own capital?
Nay, reverend monk, thou pressest with unkind
allusions, and forgettest that, like thee, we are both
servitors of the Church.
We count thee notone nor the other.
Martyred
St. Peter! what would become of thy keys,
were they intrusted to the keeping of such hands!
Go, doff thy vanitieslay aside that attire of velvet,
if thou wouldst be known as of the flock.
Master Latouche, exclaimed Emich, who was
boiling with indignation, but who preserved his
self-command
in order to circulate the cups, and to see
that each man did true service in the prescribed
contest, tell him of his brother of Wittenberg, and
of these late doings in the hive. Stick that thorn
into his side, and thou shalt see him shrink like a
jaded and galled steed, under a pointed spur! Who
art thou, and why dost thou disturb my pleasures?
This sudden interruption of himself was addressed
by the baron to a youth, in neat but modest attire,
who had just entered the banqueting-room, and who,
passing by the menial that filled the glasses at the
beck of his master's hand, now stood, with a firm
but respectful mien, at the elbow of the speaker.
'Tis Berchthold, my lord's forester. They bid
me come to do your pleasure, noble Count.
Thou art seasonably arrived to keep the peace
between a sworn knight of Rhodes and a garrulous
monk of Limburg. This reverend Abbot would do
thee favor, boy.
Berchthold bowed respectfully, and turned
towards
the prelate.
Thou art the orphan of our ancient liegeman, he
who bore thy name, and was well esteemed among
the townsmen of Deurckheim?
I am the son of him your reverence means, but
that he was liegeman of any of Limburg, I deny.
Bravely answered, boy! shouted Emich,
striking
his fist on the table so hard as to threaten
destruction
to all it held: Ay, and as becomes thy
master's follower! Hast enough, Father Bonifacius,
or wilt dip deeper into the youth's catechism?
The young man has been tutored to respect his
present ease, returned the Abbot, affecting
indifference
equally to the exultation of the Count and to the
disrespect of his forester. When he next comes
to our confessionals, there will be occasion to give
him other schooling.
God's truth! that hour may never happen. We
are half disposed to live on in our sins, and to take
soldier's fortune, in these stirring times; which is
ever the chance of sudden death, without the
church's passport. We are fast getting of this
mindare we not, brave Berchthold?
The youth bowed respectfully, but without
answering
,
for he saw by the inflamed countenances
and swimming eyes of all at table, that the moment
was one in which explanations would be useless.
Had it been possible to doubt the cause of the scene
he witnessed, the manner in which glass after glass
was swallowed, at the will of the cup-bearer, would
have explained its nature. But, far advanced as
Father Bonifacius had now become in inebriety, in
common with the other guests, he retained enough
of his faculties, to see that the words of Emich
contained
an allusion of a dangerously heretical
character
.
Thou art resolved to despise our counsel and
our warnings! he exclaimed, glancing fiercely at
one and the other. 'Twere better to say at once,
that thy wish is to see the walls of Limburg Abbey
lying on the side of Limburg hill.
Nay, reverend and honored priest, thou pushest
a few hasty words beyond their meaning. What
is it to a Count of the noble house of Leiningen, that
a few monks find shelter for their heads, and ease
for their souls, beneath a consecrated roof within
cannon-shot of his own towers. If thy walls do
not tumble until hand of mine helps to unsettle them,
they may stand till the fallen Angel that set them
up, shall aid in their overthrow. Truly, Father
Bonifacius, for a godly community, this tale of thy
sanctuary's origin makes it of none of the best
parentage
!
Hear ye that! sputtered Albrecht of
Viederbach
,
who, though his tongue had continued to sound
a sort of irregular accompaniment to his cousin's
speeches, was no longer able to articulate clearly
Here ye that! imp of St. Benedict! The devil set
ye up, and the devil will be your downfall. L'Isle
Adam is a saint to thy holiest; and hisgood
sword
At this word, the knight of Rhodes succumbed,
losing his balance in an animated effort to
gesticulate
,
and fairly falling under the table. A sarcastic
smile crossed the Abbot's face, at this overthrow
of one of his adversaries, while Emich scowled in
disdain at the ignoble exhibition made by his
kins-man
;
who, finding it impossible to rise, resigned
himself to sleep on the spot where he had fallen.
Swallow thy Rhenish, monk, and count not on
the slight advantage thou hast got in the overthrow
of that prating fool, said the host, whose tones
grew less and less amicable, as the plot thickened
But to a more fitting subject; Berchthold is worthy
of his lord, and is a youth that thinks of things
as things appear. We may quit thy confessionals
for divers reasons, as thou knowest. Here is the
Monk of Erfurth! Ha! what think you of his new
teaching, and of the manner in which he advises the
faithful to come to the altar? You have had him at
Rome, and at Worms, and among ye in many
councils
,
and yet the honest man stands fast in all
reasonable
opinions. Thou hast heard of Luther, is it
not so, young Berchthold?
'Tis certain, my Lord Count, that few in the
Jaergerthal escape the tidings of his name.
Then are they in danger of a most damnable
heresy! interrupted Bonifacius, in a voice of
thunder. Why tell me of this driveller of Erfurth,
Lord Emich, if thou art not in secret praying that
his rebellious wishes may prosper at the Church's
cost! But we mark thee, irreverent Count, and hard
and griping penance may yet purge thee of these
prurient fancies Here the Abbot, inflamed as he
was with wine and resentment, paused; for the silent
monk, Father Cuno, fell from his seat like a soldier
shot in battle; the simple inferior having entered
into the trial of heads, more with a relish for the
liquor than with any thought of victory, and having,
in consequence, done so much honor to the
potations
,
as to become an easy sacrifice to the common
enemy. The Abbot looked at his prostrate follower
with grim indifference, showing by his hard,
scowling
,
and angry eye, that he deemed the loss of little
moment to the main result. What matters the
impotency of a fool! he muttered, turning away
to his principal and only dangerous opponent, with
a full return of all his angry feelings:That the
devils are suffered to gain a momentary and
specious
triumph, we are well aware, Baron of
Hartenburg
By my father's bones, proud priest, but thou
strangely forgettest thyself! Am I not a prince of
Leiningen, that one of the cowl should please to call
me less?
I should have said the Summer Landgrave!
answered Bonifacius sneeringly, for long-smothered
hatred was beginning to break through the feeble
barriers that their reeling faculties still preserved.
I crave pardon of your highness; but a short
reign leaves brief recollections. Even thy subjects,
illustrious Emich, may be forgiven, that they know
not their sovereign's title. The coronet that is worn
from June to September scarce gets the fit of the
head!
It was worn longer, Abbot, than ever head of
thine will wear a saintly crown. But I forget my
ancient house, and the forbearance due to a guest, in
honest anger at an artful and malignant monk!
Bonifacius bowed with seeming composure, and
while each appeared to recover his moderation, in a
misty recollection of the true affair in hand, the
dialogue between the Abb and Father Siegfried,
which had been drowned by the stentorian lungs of
the principal disputants, broke out in the momentary
pause.
Thou sayest true, reverend father, said the
former
,
but were our fair and sprightly dames of
France to perform these pilgrimages to distant
shrines, of which thou speakest, rude treatment in
the wayfaring, evil company, and, haply, designing
confessors, might tarnish the present lustre of their
graces, and leave them less ornaments to our brilliant
and gallant court, than they at present prove. No,
I espouse no such dangerous opinions, but endeavor,
by gentle persuasion and courtly arguments, to lead
their precious souls nearer to the heaven they so
well merit, and which it were scarce impious to say,
they will so rarely become.
This may be well for the towering fancies of thy
French imaginations, but our slower German minds
must be dealt with differently. By the mass! I
would give little for the success of the confessor,
that should deal only in persuasive and gentle
discourse
!
Here, we throw out manifold hints of
damnation
,
in plainer speech.
I condemn no usage on speculation,
Benedictine
;
but truly this directness of condemnation would
be thought indecorous in our more refined presences.
As yet, thou wilt acknowledge, we are less tainted
with heresies than thy northern courts.
Here the deep voice of Emich, who had
recovered
Vol. I. M
a little self-command, again drowned the
byplay
of the subordinates.
We are not children, most reverend Bonifacius,
he resumed, to irritate ourselves with names.
That I have been denied the honors and rights of
my birth and line, for one come of no direct descent,
is admitted; but let it be forgotten. Thou art
welcome
to my board, and there is no dignitary of the
church, or of thy brotherhood, that I esteem more
than thee and thine, within a hard ride of these
towers. Let us be friends, holy Abbot, and drink to
our loving graces.
Count Emich, I pledge thee, and pray for thee,
as thou meritest. If there have been
misunderstandings
between our convent and thy house, they
have come of the misguiding of the devil. We are
a peaceful community, and one given more to
prayer and a just hospitality, than to any grasping
desire to enrich our coffers.
On these points we will not dwell, father, for it
is not easy for baron and abbot, layman and priest,
to see at all times with the same eyes. I would that
this question of authority in Deurckheim were fairly
disposed of, that there might always be good
neighborhood
in the valley. Our hills shut in no wide
plain, like yon of the river, that we must needs turn
the little level land we have into a battle-ground.
By the mass, most holy Abbot, but thou wouldst do
well to dismiss the Elector's troops, and trust this
matter between us, to gentle and friendly
argument
.
If it were the last prayer I uttered, before
passing
into the fruition of a self-denying and holy life,
princely Emich, thy wish should not want support!
Have we not often professed a willingness to refer
the question to the Holy Father, or any other high
church authority, that can fittingly take cognizance
of so knotty a point. Less than this arbitration
would scarce become our apostolic mission.
God's truth! mein Herr Wilhelm, but ye are
too grasping for those who mortify the flesh! Is it
meet, I ask ye, that a goodly number of valiant and
pains-taking burghers should be led by shaven crowns,
in the day of strife, in fair and foul, evil and good,
like so many worthless women, who, having lived in
the idleness and vanities of gossip and backbiting,
are fain to hope that their sex's sins may be hid
beneath
a monk's frock? Give me up, therefore, this
question of Deurckheim, and certain other rights
that might be fairly written out, and the saints in
Paradise shall not live in more harmony than we of
the Jaegerthal.
Truly, Lord Emich, the means of fitting us for
the heavenly state thou namest have not been
forgotten
,
since thou hast made a purgatory of the
valley
these many years
By the mass, priest, thou again pushest thy
remarks
beyond discreet speech! In what manner
have I done aught to bring this scandal on the
neighborhood
,
beyond a mere forethought to mine own
interest. Hast thou not opened thy abbey-gates to
receive armed and irreligious men?are not thy
ears hourly wounded by rude oaths, and thy eyes
affronted by sights that should be thought unseemly
in a sanctuary?Nay, that thou mayest not suppose
I am ignorant of thy hidden intentions, do not the
armed bands of Duke Friedrich lie at watch, this
very moment, within thy cloisters?
We have a just caution of our rights and of the
church's honor, answered Bonifacius, who scarce
endeavored to conceal the contemptuous smile the
question excited.
Believe me, Abbot of Limburg, so far from
being
the enemy of our holy religion, I am its sworn
friend; else should I long since have joined the
proselytes
of this brother Luther, and have done thee
harm openly.
'Twere better than to pray at our altars by day,
and to plot their fall at night.
I swear by the life of the Emperor that thou
urgest me too far, haughty priest!
The clamor created by the Abb and Father
Siegfried
here caused the two principal speakers to
direct
their attention, for the moment, to the
secondary
combatants. From a courtly dispute, the
argument
had got to be so confused and warm, between
the latter, that each raised his voice in a vain
endeavor
to drown that of his adversary. It was but
an instant, before the whirling senses of M. Latouche,
who had only maintained his present place in the
debauch by fraud, gave way to so rude an assault,
and he staggered to a settee, where, gesticulating
wildly, he soon sunk at his length, unable to lift his
head. Father Siegfried witnessed the retreat of his
mercurial foe with a grin of exultation; then he
raised a ferocious shout, which, coming from lungs
that had so lately chanted to the honor of God,
caused
the young Berchthold to shudder with horror.
But the glazed eyes of the monk, and his failing
countenance, betrayed an inability to endure more.
After staring wildly about him, with the unmeaning
idiotcy of a drunkard, he settled himself in his chair,
and closed his eyes in the heavy sleep that nature
unwillingly furnishes to those who abuse her gifts.
The Abbot and the Count witnessed the manner
in which their respective seconds were thus put
hors
de combat,
in sullen silence. Their growing warmth,
and the feelings excited by the mention of their
several grievances, had insensibly drawn their
attention
from the progress of the contest, but each now
regained a certain glimpse of its nature and of its
results; the recollection served to recall the temper
of both, for they were too well practised in these
scenes, not to understand the value of presence of
mind in maintaining the command of their faculties.
Our brother Siegfried hath yielded to the
frailties
of nature, noble Emich, resumed Boniface,
smiling as placidly on his remaining companion, as
flushed features and a heated eye would permit.
The flesh of priest can endure no more than that
of layman, else would he have seen thy flasks
drained
of their last drop, for better intention never filled
grateful heart, in doing honor to the gifts of
Providence
.
Ay, thou passest thy debauches to the account
of this subtilty, while we of the sword, Master
Abbot, sin to-night, and ask forgiveness to-morrow,
without other pretence than our pleasures. But the
hood of a monk is a mask, and he who wears it
thinks he hath a right to the benefit of the disguise.
I would I knew, to a boddice, the number of
burghers' wives thou hast shrived since Corpus
Domini!
Jest not with the secrets of the confessional,
Count Emich; the subject is too sacred for profane
tongues. There has been bitter penance for greater
than thou!
Nay, mistake me not, holy Abbot, returned
the baron, hurriedly crossing himself; but your
bold talkers say there is discontent in Deurckheim
on this point, and I deem it friendly to
communicate
the accusations of the enemy. This is a
moment
in which our German monks are in danger;
for, in sooth, thy brother of Erfurth is no driveller
in his cry against Rome.
The eye of Father Boniface flashed fire, for none
are so quick to meet, or so violent to resent
attacks
,
on what they consider their rights, as those
who have long been permitted to enjoy monopolies,
however frail or unjust may be the tenure of their
possession.
M 2
In thy heart, rude Emich, thou clingest to this
heresy! he said: Beware, in what manner thou
castest the weight of thy example and name into
the scale, against the commands of God and the
authority of the church! As for this Luther, a
backsliding wretch, that unquiet ambition and love
for a professed but misguided nun, having urged to
rebellion, the devils are rejoicing in his iniquity, and
imps of darkness stand ready to riot in his final and
irretrievable fall.
By the mass! father, to a plain soldier it
seemeth
better to wive the sister honestly, than to give
all this scandal in Deurckheim, and otherwise to do
violence to the peace of families on the fair plains
of the Palatinate. If brother Luther hath done no
more, than thou sayest here, he hath fairly cheated
Satan, which is what thy community did of old,
when it got the evil spirit to aid in raising thy
chapel, and then, with no great regard to a debtor's
obligations, sent him away penniless.
Were the truth known, Emich, I fear it would
be found that thou hast faith in this silly legend!
If thou hast not outwitted the devil, priest, it
hath been that his prudence hath kept him from
bargaining
with those he knows to be his betters in
cunning
.
By the rood! 'twas a bold spirit that would
grapple, wit to wit, with the monks of Limburg!
Disdain kept the Abbot from answering, for he
was too superior to vulgar tradition to feel even
resentment
at an imputation of this kind. His host
perceived that he was losing ground, and he began
to see, by the manner in which his senses were
slowly receding, that he was in imminent danger of
forfeiting the important stake that now depended
wholly on his powers of endurance. The Abbot
had a well-earned reputation of having the strongest
head of all the churchmen of the Palatinate, and
Count Emich, who was nowise wanting in physical
excellence of this sort, began to feel that species of
failing which is commonly the forerunner, as it is
often the cause, of defeat. He swallowed bumper
after bumper, with a reckless desire to overwhelm
his antagonist, without thought of the inroads that
he was producing on his own faculties. Bonifacius,
who saw and felt his superiority, willingly indulged
his antagonist in this feverish desire to drive the
struggle to a premature issue, and several glasses
were taken in a sort of sullen defiance, without a
syllable issuing from the lips of either. In this
strait, the Count turned his swimming eyes towards
his attendants, in a vague hope that they who served
him so faithfully on ordinary occasions, might aid
him in the present desperate emergency.
Young Berchthold Hintermayer stood near his
lord, in respectful attendance on his pleasure, for
habit prevented him from withdrawing without an
order. Enough had fallen from the parties in this
singular contest to let him into the secret of its
object
.
He appeared to understand the appeal, and
advancing to do the office of cup-bearer, a duty
that in truth required some such interference, for he
who should have discharged it had been too
diligently
imitating those at the board, to be able any
longer to acquit himself with propriety of his
functions
.
If my Lord Abbot would but relieve the passing
time, said Berchthold, as he poured out the wine,
by descanting more at large on this heresy, he
might be the instrument of saving a doubting soul;
I freely confess, that for one, I find much reason to
distrust the faith of my fathers.
This was attacking the Abbot on his weakest, not
to say his only vulnerable, point.
Thou shalt smart for this, bold boy! he cried,
striking the table with a clenched fist. Thou
harborest
heresies, unfledged and paltry reasoner on
apostolic missions! 'Tis well'tis wellthe
impudent
avowal is noted!
Emich made a sign of gratitude, for in his rage
the priest took a heavy draught, unconscious of
what he was about.
Nay, my Lord, the most reverend Abbot will
pardon imprudent speech in one little gifted in
knowledge of this sort. Were it to strike a
wild-boar
,
or to stop a roe-buck, or haply to do harm to
my master's enemies, this hand might prove of some
account; but is it matter of fair surprise that we of
simple wit should be confounded, when the most
learned of Germany are at a loss what to believe?
I have heard it said, that Master Luther made noble
answers in all the councils and wise bodies, in which
he hath of late appeared.
He spoke with the tongue of Lucifer! roared
the Abbot, fairly frothing with the violence of
ungovernable
rage. Whence cometh this new and
late-discovered religion! Of what stock and root is
it? Why hath it been so long hid, and where is its
early history? Doth it mount to Peter and Paul, or
is it the invention of modern arrogance and rank
conceit?
Nay, father, the same might be asked of Rome
itself, before Rome knew an apostle. The tree is
not less a tree after it hath been trimmed of its
decayed
branches, though it may be more comely.
Father Bonifacius was both acute and learned,
and, under ordinary circumstances, even the monk
of Wittenberg might have found him a stubborn and
subtle casuist; but in his actual condition, the most
sophistical remark, if it had but the aspect of reason,
was likely to inflame him. Thus assailed, therefore,
he exhibited an awful picture of the ferocity of
human
passions when brutalized by indulgence. His
eyes seemed starting from his head, his lips quivered,
and his tongue refused its functions. He was now
in the predicament, in which the Count had so lately
stood; and, though he foresaw the consequences,
with the desperation of an inebriated man, he sought
the renewal of his forces in the very agent which
had undermined them. Count Emich himself was
past intelligible utterance, but eloquence not being
his strongest arm, he still maintained sufficient
command
of his physical powers to continue the conflict.
He flourished his hand in defiance, and muttered
words that seemed to breathe hatred and scorn. In
this manner did a noble of an illustrious and princely
house, and a mitred prelate of the church, stand at
bay, with little other consciousness of the existence
of the nobler faculties of their being, than that
connected
with the common mercenary object which
had induced this trial of endurance.
The church's malediction on ye all! Boniface
at length succeeded in uttering:then falling back
in his elbowed and well-cushioned chair, he yielded
his faculties to the sinister influence of the liquor he
had swallowed.
When Emich of Leiningen witnessed the
overthrow
of his last antagonist, a gleam of intelligence
and triumph shot from beneath his shaggy brows.
By a desperate effort he raised himself, and
stretching
forth an arm, he gained possession of the deed
by which the community of Limburg formally
released
its claims upon the products of the disputed
vineyards. Arising, with the air of one accustomed
to command even in his cups, he signed for his
forester
to approach, and aided by his young and
nervous
arm, he tottered from the room, leaving the
banqueting-hall, like a deserted field, a revolting
picture of human infirmity in its degradation and
neglect.
As the Count fell heavily upon his couch, clad as
he had been at table, he shook the parchment
towards his young attendant, till the folds rattled.
Then closing his eyes, his deep and troubled
breathing
soon announced, that the victor of this debauch
lay like the vanquished, unconscious, feverish, and
unmanned.
Thus terminated the well-known debauch of
Hartenburg
,
a feat of physical endurance on the part
of the stout baron who prevailed, that gained him
little less renown among the boon companions of
the Palatinate, than he would have reaped from a
victory in the field; and which, strange as it may
now appear, derogated but little from any of the
qualities of the vanquished.
CHAPTER VIII.
And from the latticed gallery came a chant
Of psalms, most saint-like, most angelical,
Verse after verse sung out most holily.
Rogers.
The
succeeding day was the Sabbath. The
morning of the weekly festival was always
announced
to the peasants of the Jaegerthal with the
usual summons to devotion. The matin bell had
been heard on the abbey walls, even before the light
penetrated to the bottom of the deep vale; and all
the pious had bent, in common, wherever the sounds
happened to reach their ears, in praise and
thanks-giving
.
But as the hours wore on, a more elevated
display of Roman worship was prepared in the
high mass, a ceremony addressed equally to the
feelings and the senses.
The sun was fairly above the hills, and the
season
bland to seduction. The domestic cattle,
relieved
from their weekly toil, basked against the
hill-side, ruminating in contentment, and filled with
the quiet pleasures of their instinct. Children
gambolled
before the cottage doors; the husbandman
loitered, in the habiliments that had borne the fashions
of the
Haard
through many generations, regarding
the silent growth of his crops, and the housewife
hurried from place to place, in the excitement of
simple domestic enjoyment. The month was the
most grateful of the twelve, and well filled with
hopes. The grass had reached its height, and was
throwing out its exuberance, the corn was filling
fast, and the vine began to give forth its clusters.
In the midst of this scene of rural tranquillity, the
deep-toned bells of the abbey called the flock to its
usual fold. Long practice had made the
brotherhood
of Limburg expert in all the duties that were
necessary to the earthly administration of their
functions
.
Even the peals of the bells were regulated
and skilful. Note mournfully succeeded note, and
there was not a silent dell, for miles, into which the
solemn call did not penetrate. Bells were heard too
from Deurckheim, and even from the wide plain
beyond
;
but none rose fuller upon the air, or came so
sweet and melancholy to the ear, as those which
hung in the abbey towers.
Obedient to the summons, there was a gathering
of all in the valley towards the gate of Limburg.
A crowd appeared also in the direction of the gorge,
for devotion, superstition, or curiosity, never failed
to attract a multitude on these occasions, to witness
mass in that celebrated conventual chapel. Among
the latter came equally the sceptical and the
believing
,
the young and the old, the fair and her who
deemed it prudent to shade a matronly countenance
with the veil, the idle, the half-converted follower
of Luther, and the lover of music. It was
customary
for one of the brothers to preach, when mass
was ended; and Limburg had many monks that were
skilled in the subtleties of the times, and some even
who had names for eloquence.
With a management and coquetry that enter into
most human devices that are intended to act on our
feelings, especially in matters that it is not thought
safe to confide too much to naked reason, the peals of
the bells were continued long, with a view to effect.
As group after group arrived, the court of the abbey
slowly filled, until there appeared a congregation
sufficiently numerous to gratify the self-love of even
a clerical star of our own times. There was much
grave salutation among the different dignitaries that
were here assembled, for of all those who doff the
cap in courtesy, perhaps the German is the most
punctilious and respectful. As the neighboring city
was fully represented in this assembly of the
religious
and curious, there was also a profitable display
of the duties that are due to station. A herald
might have obtained many useful hints, had he been
there to note the different degrees of simple homage
that were paid, from the Burgomaster to the Bailiff.
Among the variety of idle and ill-digested remarks
that are lavished on the American people and their
institutions, it is a received pleasantry to joke on
their attachment to official dignities. But he who
has not only seen, but observed both his own
countrymen
and strangers, will have had numberless
occasions
to remark that this, like most similar
strictures
,
is liable to the imputation of vapidity, and of
being proof of a narrow observation. The
functionary
that is literally a servant of the people,
whatever may be his dispositions, can never triumph
over his masters; and, though it be an honest and
commendable ambition to wish to be so distinguished,
we need only examine the institutions to see that
in this, as in most other similar circumstances, there
is no strict analogy between ourselves and European
nations. The remark has probably been made,
because
a respect for official authority has been found
among us, when there was the expectation, and
possibly
the wish, to find anarchy.
At the high mass of Limburg there was more
ceremony observed in ushering the meanest village
dignitary to his place in the church, than would be
observed in conducting the head of this great
republic
to the high station he occupies; and care was
had, by an agent of the convent, to see that no one
should approach the altar of the Lord of the
Universe
,
without his receiving the deference he might
claim in virtue of his temporal rank! Here, where
all appear in the temple as they must appear in their
graves, equals in dependence on divine support as
they are equals in frailty, it will not be easy to
understand
the hardihood of sophistry which thus
teaches humility and penitence with the tongue, and
invites to pride and presumption in the practice; and
which, when driven to a reason for its conduct,
defends
itself against the accusation of inconsistency,
by recriminating the charge of envy!
There had been a suitable display of ceremony
when several functionaries of Deurckheim appeared,
but the strongest manifestation of respect was
reserved
for a burgher, who did not enter the gates,
until the people were assembled in the body of the
church. This personage, a man whose hair was
just beginning to be gray, and whose solid, vigorous
frame denoted full health and an easy life, came in
the saddle; for at the period of which we write,
there was a bridle path to the portal of Limburg.
He was accompanied by a female, seemingly his
spouse, who rode an ambling nag, bearing on the
crupper a crone that clung to her well-formed waist,
with easy, domestic familiarity, but like one unused
to her seat. A fair-haired, rosy girl sat the pillion
of the father, and a serving-man, in a species of
official livery, closed the cavalcade.
Vol. I. N
Sundry of the more substantial citizens of
Deurckheim
hastened to the reception of this little party,
for it was Heinrich Frey, with Meta, her mother,
and Ilse, that came unexpectedly to the mass of
Limburg. The affluent and flourishing citizen was
ushered to the part of the church or chapel, where
especial chairs were reserved for such casual visits
of the neighboring functionaries, or for any noble
that devotion, or accident, might lead to worship at
the abbey's altars.
Heinrich Frey was a stout, hale, obstinate, sturdy
burgher, in whom prosperity had a little cooled
benevolence
,
but who, had he escaped the allurements
of office and the recollection of his own success,
might have passed through life, as one that was
wanting in neither modesty nor humanity. He was,
in short, on a diminished scale, one of those
examples
of desertion from the ranks of mankind to
the corps d'lite of the lucky, that we constantly
witness among the worldly and fortunate. While a
youth, he had been sufficiently considerate for the
burthens and difficulties of the unhappy; but a
marriage
with a small heiress, and subsequent successes,
had gradually brought him to a view of things, that
was more in unison with his own particular
interests
,
than it was either philosophical or christian-like.
He was a firm believer in that dictum which says
none but the wealthy have sufficient interest in
society
to be intrusted with its control, though his own
instinct might have detected the sophistry, since he
was daily vacillating between opposing principles,
just as they happened to affect his own particular
concerns. Heinrich Frey gave freely to the
mendicant
,
and to the industrious; but when it came to
be a question of any serious melioration of the lot
of either, he shook his head, in a manner to imply
a mysterious political economy, and uttered shrewd
remarks on the bases of society, and of things as
they were established. In short, he lived in an age
when Germany, and indeed all Christendom, was
much agitated by a question that was likely to
unsettle
not only the religion of the day, but divers
other vested interests; and he might have been
termed
the chief of the conservative party, in his own
particular circle. These qualities, united to his known
wealth; a reputation for high probity, which was
founded on the belief that he was fully able to
repair
any pecuniary wrong he might happen to
commit
;
a sturdy maintenance of his own opinions,
that passed with the multitude for the consistency
of rectitude; and a perfect fearlessness in deciding
against all those who had not the means of disputing
his decrees, had procured for him the honor of being
the first Burgomaster of Deurckheim.
Were the countenance a certain index of the
qualities of the mind, a physiognomist might have
been at a loss to discover the motives which had
induced
Ulricka Hailtzinger, not only the fairest but
the wealthiest maiden of the town, to unite herself
in marriage with the man we have just delineated.
A mild, melancholy, blue eye, that retained its lustre
in despite of forty years, a better outline of features
than is common to the region in which she dwelt,
and a symmetry of arm and bust that, on the other
hand, are rather peculiar to the natives of Germany,
still furnished sufficient evidence of the beauty for
which she must have been distinguished in early
life. In addition to these obvious and more vulgar
attractions, the matronly partner of Heinrich had
an expression of feminine delicacy and intelligence,
of elevated views, and even of mysterious
aspirations
,
which rendered her a woman that a nice
observer
of nature might have loved to studyand
have studied to love.
In personal appearance, Meta was a copy of her
mother, engrafted on the more ruddy health and less
abstracted habits of the father. Her character will
be sufficiently developed as we proceed in the tale.
We commit Ilse to the reader's imagination, which
will readily conceive the sort of attendant that has
been introduced.
The Herr Heinrich did not take possession of his
customary post before the high altar, without
causing
the stir and excitement among the simple
peasants
of the Jaegerthal, and the truant Deurckheimers
who were present, that became his condition in life.
But even city importance cannot predominate for
ever in the house of God, and the bustle gradually
subsiding, expectation began to take precedency of
civic rank.
The Abbey of Limburg stood high among the
religious communities of the Rhine, for its internal
decorations, its wealth, and its hospitality. The
chapel was justly deemed a rare specimen of
monastic
taste, nor was it wanting in most of those
ornaments
and decorations, that render the superior
buildings, devoted to the service of the Church of
Rome, so imposing to the senses, and so pleasing to
the admirers of solemn effect. The building was
vast, and, as prevailed throughout that region and
in the century of which we write, sombre. It had
numerous altars, rich in marbles and pictures, each
celebrated in the Palatinate for the kind mediation
of the particular saint to whom it was dedicated,
and each loaded with the votive offerings of the
suppliant, or of the grateful. The walls and the
nave were painted
al fresco,
not indeed with the
pencil of Raphael, or Buonorotti, but creditably,
and in a manner to heighten the beauty of the place.
The choir was carved in high relief, after a fashion
much esteemed, and that was admirably executed in
the middle states of Europe, no less than in Italy,
and whole flocks of cherubs were seen poising on
the wing around the organ, the altar, and the tombs.
The latter were numerous, and indicated, by their
magnificence, that the bodies of those who had
enjoyed
the world's advantages, slept within the
hallowed
precincts.
At length a door, communicating with the
cloisters
,
opened, and the monks appeared, walking in
procession. At their head came the Abbot, wearing
his mitre, and adorned with the gorgeous robes of
his ecclesiastical office. Two priests, decorated
for the duties of the altar, followed, and then
succeeded
the professed and the assistants, in pairs.
The whole procession swept through the aisles, in
stately silence; and, after making the tour of most
of the church, paying homage and offering prayers
at several of the most honored altars, it passed into
the choir. Father Bonifacius was seated on his
episcopal throne, and the rest of the brotherhood
occupied the glossy stalls reserved for such
occasions
.
During the march of the monks, the organ
breathed a low accompaniment, and, as they
became
stationary, its last strain died in the vaulted
roof. At this moment the clattering of horses' hoofs
was audible without, causing the startled and
uneasy priests to suspend the mass. The rattling
of steel came next, and then the heavy tread of
armed heels was heard on the pavement of the
church itself.
Emich of Hartenburg came up the principal aisle,
with the steady front of one confident of his power,
and claiming deference. He was accompanied by
his guests, the Knight of Rhodes and Monsieur
Latouche
,
while young Berchthold Hintermayer kept
at his elbow, like one accustomed to be in close
attendance
.
A small train of unarmed dependants
brought up the rear. There was a seat of honor,
in the choir itself, and near the master altar, to
which it was usual to admit princes and nobles of
high consideration. Passing through the crowd,
N 2
that had collected at the railing of the choir, the
Count inclined towards one of the lateral aisles, and
was soon face to face with the Abbot. The latter
arose, and slightly recognized the presence of his
guest, while the whole brotherhood imitated his
example
,
though with greater respect; for, as we
have said, it was usual to pay this homage to
worldly rank, even in the temple. Emich seated
himself, with a scowl on his visage, while his two
noble associates found seats of honor near.
Berchthold
stood at hand.
An inexperienced eye could have detected no
outward signs of his recent defeat, in the exterior
of Wilhelm of Venloo. His muscles had already
regained their tone, and his entire countenance its
usual expression of severe authority, a quality for
which it was more remarkable than for any lines
of mortification or of thought. He glanced at the
victor, and then, by a secret sign, communicated
with a lay brother. At this moment the mass
commenced
.
Of all the nations of Christendom, this, compared
with its numbers, is the least connected with the
Church of Rome. The peculiar religious origin of
the people, their habits of examination and mental
independence, and their prejudices (for the
Protestant
is no more free from this failing than the
Catholic
,)
are likely to keep them long separated from
any policy, whether of church or state, that exacts
faith without investigation, or obedience without the
right to remonstrate. An opinion is sedulously
disseminated
in the other hemisphere, that busy agents
are rapidly working changes in this respect, and a
powerful party is anxiously anticipating great
ecclesiastical
and political results from the return of the
American nation to the opinions of their ancestors
of the middle ages. Were the fact so, it would
give us little concern, for we do not believe
salvation
to be the peculiar province of sects; but, had
we any apprehensions of the consequences of such
a conversion, they would not be excited by the
accidental
accumulations of emigrants in towns, or on
the public works in which the country is so actively
engaged. We believe that where one native
Protestant
becomes a Catholic in America, ten emigrant
Catholics drop quietly into the ranks of the
prevailing
sects; and, without at all agitating the point of
which is the gainer or the loser by the change, we
shall proceed to describe the manner of the mass,
as a ceremony, that ninety-nine in a hundred of our
readers have never had, nor probably ever will
have, an opportunity of witnessing.
There is no appeal to the feelings of man, which
has given rise to opinions so decidedly at
variance
as those which are entertained of the Roman
ritual. To one description of Christians, these
ceremonies
appear to be vain mummeries, invented to
delude, and practised for unjustifiable ends; while,
to another, they contain all that is sublime and
imposing
in human worship. As is usual in most
cases of extreme opinions, the truth would seem to
lie between the two. The most zealous Catholic
errs when he would maintain the infallibility of all
who minister at the altar, or when he overlooks the
slovenly and irreverent manner in which the most
holy offices are so frequently performed; and,
surely, the Protestant who quits the temple, in which
justice has been done to the formula of this church,
without perceiving that there is deep and sublime
devotion in its rites, has steeled his feelings against
the admission of every sentiment in favor of a sect
that he is willing to proscribe. We belong to
neither class, and shall, therefore, endeavor to
represent
things as they have been seen, not disguising
or affecting a single emotion because our fathers
happened to take refuge in this western world, to
set up altars of a different shade of faith.
The interior of the Abbey-church of Limburg, as
has just been stated, was renowned in Germany for
its magnificence. Its vaulted roof was supported
by many massive pillars, and ornamented with
scriptural stories, by the best pencils of that region.
The grand altar was of marble, richly embellished
with agate, containing as usual a labored
representation
of the blessed Mary and her deified child. A
railing of exquisite workmanship and richly gilded,
excluded profane feet from this sanctified spot,
which, in addition to its fixtures, was now glittering
with vessels of gold and precious stones, being
decorated
for the approaching mass. The officiating
priests wore vestments stiffened with golden
embroidery
,
while the inferior attendants were as
usual clad in white, and bound with scarfs of purple.
Upon this scene of gorgeous and elaborate
splendor
,
in which the noble architecture united with the
minute preparations of the service, to lead the spirit
to lofty contemplations, the chant of the monks, and
the tones of the organ, broke in a deep and startling
appeal to the soul. Lives dedicated to the
practices
of their community, had drilled the
brotherhood
into perfection, and scarce a note issued
among the vaults that was not attuned to the
desired
effect. Trombones, serpents, and viols, lent
their aid to increase the solemn melody of powerful
masculine voices, which were so blended with the
wind instrument as to comprise but one deep, grand,
and grave sound of praise. Count Emich turned
on his seat, clenching the handle of his sword, as if
the clamor of the trumpet were in his ears: then
his unquiet glance met that of the Abbot, and his
chin fell upon a hand. As the service proceeded,
the zeal of the brotherhood seemed to increase, and,
as it was afterwards remarked, on no occasion had
the mass of Limburg, at all times known for its
power in music, been so remarkable for its strong
and stirring influence. Voice rolled above voice,
in a manner that must be heard to be understood,
and there were moments when the tones of the
instruments
,
full and united as they were, appeared
drowned in the blending of a hundred human
aspirations. From the deepest of one of these
solemn
peals there arose a strain, at whose first tone
all other music was hushed. It was a single human
voice, of that admixture of the male and female
tones which seems nearest allied to the
supernatural
,
being in truth, a contr'alto of great compass,
roundness, and sweetness. Count Emich started,
for, when these heavenly strains broke upon his
ear, they seemed to float in the vault above the
choir; nor could he, as the singer was concealed,
assure himself of the delusion, while the solo lasted.
He dropped his sword, and gazed about him, for
the first time that morning, with an expression of
human charity. The lips of young Berchthold
parted in admiration, and as he just then met the
blue eye of Meta, there was an exchange of gentle
feeling in that quiet and secret glance. In the
mean time, the chant proceeded. The single
unearthly
voice that had so stirred the spirits of the
listeners ceased, and a full chorus of the choir
concluded the hymn.
The Count of Leiningen drew a breath so heavy,
that it was audible to Bonifacius. The latter
suffered
his countenance to unbend, and, as in the case
of the youthful pair, the spirit of concord appeared
to soothe the tempers of these fierce rivals. But
here commenced the ritual of the mass. The rapid
utterance of the officiating priest, gesticulations
which lost their significance by being blended and
indistinct, and prayers in a tongue that defeated
their object, by involving instead of rendering the
medium of thought noble and clear, united to
weaken
the effect produced by the music. Worship lost
its character of inspiration, by assuming that of
business, neither attracting the imagination,
influencing
the feelings, nor yet sufficiently convincing
the reason. Abandoning all these persuasive means,
too much was left to the convictions of a naked and
settled belief.
Emich of Hartenburg gradually resumed his
repulsive
mien, and the effect of all that he had so
lately
felt was lost in cold indifference to words that
he did not comprehend. Even young Berchthold
sought the eye of Meta less anxiously, and both the
Knight of Rhodes and Monsieur Latouche gazed
listlessly towards the throng grouped before the
railing of the choir. In this manner did the service
commence and terminate. There was another
hymn, and a second exhibition of the power of
music, though with an effect less marked than that
which had been produced when the listeners were
taken by surprise.
Against a column, near the centre of the church,
was erected a pulpit. A monk rose from his stall,
at the close of the worship, and, passing through
the crowd, ascended its stairs like one about to
preach. It was Father Johan, a brother known for
the devotedness of his faith and the severity of his
opinions. The low receding forehead, the quiet but
glassy eye, and the fixedness of the inferior members
of the face, might readily have persuaded a
physiognomist
that he beheld a heavy enthusiast. The
language and opinions of the preacher did not deny
the expectations excited by his exterior. He painted,
in strong and ominous language, the dangers of the
sinner, narrowed the fold of the saved within
metaphysical
and questionable limits, and made frequent
appeals to the fears and to the less noble passions
of his audience. While the greater number in the
church kept aloof, listening indifferently, or gazing
at the monuments and other rich decorations of the
place, a knot of kindred spirits clustered around the
pillar that supported the preacher's desk, deeply
sympathizing in all his pictures of pain and
desolation
.
The sharp, angry, and denunciatory address of
Father Johan was soon ended; and, as he re-entered
the choir, the Abbot arose and retired to the
cloisters
,
followed by most of the brotherhood. But
neither the Count of Hartenburg, nor any of his
train, seemed disposed to quit the church so soon.
An air of expectation appeared, also, to detain most
of those in the body of the building. A monk,
towards
whom many longing eyes had been cast,
yielded to the general and touching appeal, and
quitting his stall, one of high honor, he took the
place just vacated by Father Johan.
This movement was no sooner made, than the
name of Father Arnolph, the Prior, or the
immediate
spiritual governor of the community, was
buzzed among the people. Emich arose, and,
accompanied
by his friends, took a station near the
pulpit, while the dense mass of uplifted and
interested
faces, that filled the middle aisle, proclaimed the
interest of the congregation. There was that in
the countenance and air of Father Arnolph to justify
this plain demonstration of sympathy. His eye was
mild and benevolent, his forehead full, placid, and
even, and the whole character of his face was that
of winning philanthropy. To the influence of this
general and benevolent expression, must be added
evident signs of discipline, much thought, and meek
hope.
The spiritual part of such a man was not likely
to belie the exterior. His doctrine, like that of the
divine being he served, was charitable and full
of love. Though he spoke of the terrors of
judgment
,
it was with grief rather than with menace:
and it was when dwelling on the persuasive and
attractive character of faith, that he was most
earnest and eloquent. Again Emich found his secret
intentions shaken, and his frown relaxed to
gleamings
of sympathy and interest. The eye of the
preacher met that of the stern baron, and, without
making an alarming change of manner, he
continued
,
as it were, by a natural course of thought
Such is the church in its purity, my hearers, let
the errors, the passions, or the designs of man
pervert
it in what manner they may. The faith I
preach is of God, and it partakes of the godlike
qualities of his divine essence. He who would
impute
the sins of its mistaken performance to aught
but his erring creatures, casts odium on that which
is instituted for his own good; and he who would
do violence to its altars, lifts a hand against a work
of omnipotence!
With these words in his ears, Emich of
Hartenburg
turned away, and passed musingly up the
church.
CHAPTER IX.
Japhet, I cannot answer thee.
Byron
.
The
Abbey of Limburg owed its existence and
its rich endowments chiefly to the favor of an
emperor
of Germany. In honor of this great patron,
an especial altar, and a gorgeous and elaborate
tomb, had been erected. Similar honors had been
also paid to the Counts of Leiningen, and to certain
other noble families of the vicinity. These several
altars were in black marble, relieved by ornaments
of white, and the tombs were decorated with such
heraldic devices as marked the particular races of
the different individuals. They stood apart from
those already described in the principal church, in
a sort of crypt, or semi-subterranean chapel,
beneath
the choir. Thither Count Emich held his way,
when he quitted the column against which he had
leaned, while listening to the sermon of Father
Arnolph
.
The light of the upper church had that soft and
melancholy tint, which is so peculiar and so
ornamental
to a Gothic edifice. It entered through high,
narrow windows of painted glass, coloring all within
with a hue that it was not difficult for the
imagination
to conceive had some secret connexion with the
holy character of the place. The depth and the
secluded position of the chapel rendered this light
still more gloomy and touching in the crypt. When
the Count reached the pavement, he felt its influence
deeply, for few descended into that solemn and
hallowed
vault without becoming sensible to the
religious
awe that reigned around. Emich crossed
himself, and, as he passed before the altar reared by
his race, he bent a knee to the mild and lovely
female
countenance that was there to represent the
Mother of Christ. He thought himself alone, and
he uttered a prayer; for, though Emich of
Leiningen
was a man that rarely communed seriously
with God, when exposed to worldly and deriding
eyes, he had in his heart deep reverence for his
power. As he arose, a movement at his elbow
attracted
a look aside.
Ha!Thou here, Herr Prior! he exclaimed,
suppressing as much of his surprise as
self-command
enabled him to do with success; Thou art
swift in thy passage from the stall to the pulpit, and
swifter from the pulpit to the chapel!
We that are vowed to lives of monkish
devotion
,
Vol. I. O
need to be often at all. Thou wert kneeling,
Emich, before the altar of thy race?
By St. Benedict, thy patron! but thou hast, in
good sooth, found me in some such act, holy father.
A weakness came over me, on entering into this
gloomy place, and I would fain do reverence to the
spirits of those who have gone before me.
Callest thou the desire to pray a weakness? At
what shrine could one of thy name worship more
fittingly than at this, which has been reared and
enriched by the devout of his own kindred; or in
what better mood canst thou look into thyself, and
call upon divine aid, than in that thou hast
mentioned
?
Herr Prior, thou overlookest the occasion of my
visit, which is to hear the Abbey mass, and not to
confess and be shrived.
It is long since thou hast had the benefit of these
sacred offices, Emich!
Thou hast done well in thy way, father, at the
desk; and I question not that the burghers of
Deurckheim and their gossips will do thee credit in
their private discourses. Thy fame as a preacher
is not of mean degree even now, and this effort of
to-day would well-nigh gain thee a bishopric, were
the women of our valley in the way of moving
Rome. How fareth it with the most holy Abbot
this morning, and with those two pillars of the
community
,
the Fathers Siegfried and Cuno?
Thou sawest them in their places at the most
holy mass.
'Fore heaven! but they are worthy companions!
Believe me, father, more honest boon associates do
not dwell in our merry Palatinate, nor men that I
love in a better fashion, according to their merits!
Did'st hear, reverend Prior, of their visit to
Hartenburg
,
and of their deeds in the flesh?
The humor of thy mind is quickly changed,
Herr Count, and pity 'tis 'twere thus. I came not
here to listen to tales of excesses in thy hold, nor of
any forgetfulness of those, who having sworn to
better things, have betrayed that they are merely
men.
Ay, and stout men, if any such dwell in the
empire! I prize my good name as another, or I
would tell thee the number of vessels that my
keeper of the cellar sweareth are no better than so
many men-at-arms fallen in a rally or an onset.
This love of wine is the curse of our region and
of the times. I would that none of the treacherous
liquor should again enter the gates of Limburg!
God's justice! reverend Prior, thou wilt in
sooth find some decrease of quantity in future,
returned
Emich, laughing, for the disputed vineyards
have at last found a single, and, though it might
better come from thee, as one that hath often looked
into my interior, as it were, by confession, a worthy
master. I pledge thee the honor of a noble, that
not a flask of that which thou so contemnest shall
ever again do violence to thy taste.
The Count cast a triumphant glance at the monk,
in the expectation, and possibly in the hope, that,
notwithstanding his professions of moderation, some
lurking signs of regret might betray themselves at
this announcement of the convent's loss. But
Father
Arnolph was what he seemed, a man devoted
to the holy office he had assumed, and one but little
influenced by worldly interests.
I understand thee, Emich, he said mildly, but
unmoved. This scandal was not wanting at such
a moment, to bring obloquy upon a reverend and
holy church, against which its enemies have been
permitted to make rude warfare, for reasons that
are concealed in the inscrutable mysteries of him
who founded it.
Thou speakest in reason, monk, for, to say truth,
yon fellow of Saxony, and his followers, who are
any thing but few or weak, begin to move many in
this quarter to doubts and disobedience. Thou must
most stoutly hate this brother Luther in thy heart,
father!
For the first time that day, the countenance of
the Prior lost its even expression of benevolence.
But the change was so imperceptible to a vulgar
eye, as to escape the scrutiny of the Count; and the
feeling, a lingering remnant of humanity, was
quickly mastered by one so accustomed to hold the
passions in subjection.
The name of the schismatic hath troubled me!
returned the Prior, smiling mournfully at the
consciousness
of his own weakness; I hope it has
not been with a feeling of personal dislike. He
stands on a frightful precipice, and from my soul do
I pray, that not only he, but all the deluded that
follow
in his dangerous track, may see their peril in
time to retire unharmed!
Father, thou speakest like one that wishest good
to the Saxon rather than harm!
I think I may say, the words do not belie the
thoughts.
Nay, thou forgettest the damnable heresies he
practiseth, and overlooketh his motive! Surely one
that can thus sell soul and body for love of a wanton
nun, hath little claim to thy charity!
There was a slight glow on the temples of Father
Arnolph.
They have attributed to him this craven
passion
,
he answered, and they have tried to prove,
that a mean wish to partake of the pleasures of the
world, lies at the bottom of his rebellion; but I
believe
it not, and I say it not.
God's truth! thou art worthy of thy holy office,
Herr Prior, and I honor thy moderation. Were there
more like thee among us, we should have a better
neighborhood, and less meddling with the concerns
of others. With thee, I see myself no such
necessity
of his openly wiving the nun, for it is very
possible
to enjoy the gifts of life even under a cowl,
should it be our fortune to wear it.
The monk made no answer, for he perceived he
had to do with one unequal to understanding his own
character.
Of this we will say no more, he rejoined, after
a brief and painful pause; let us look rather to
thine own welfare. It is said, Count Emich, that
thou meditatest evil to this holy shrine; that
ambition
,
and the longings of cupidity, have tempted
thee to plot our abbey's fall, in order that none may
stand between thine own baronial power and the
throne of the Elector!
Thou art less unwilling to form unkind opinions
of thy nearest neighbor, than of that mortal enemy
of the Church, Luther, it would appear, Herr Prior.
What hast thou seen in me, that can embolden one
of thy charity to hazard this accusation?
I do but hazard what all in our convent think
and dread. Hast thou reflected well, Emich, of this
sacrilegious enterprise, and of what may be its
fruits? Dost thou recall the objects for which
these holy altars were reared, or the hand that laid
the corner-stone of the edifice thou wouldst so
profanely
overthrow?
Look you, good Father Arnolph, there are two
manners of viewing the erection of thy convent,
and more especially of this identical church in
which we stand. One of our traditions sayeth that
the arch-knave himself had his trowel in thy
masonry
.
Thou art of too high lineage, of blood too
noble
,
and of intelligence too ripe, to credit the tale.
These are points in which I pretend not to dip
too deeply. I am no scholar of Prague or
Wittenberg
,
O 2
that thou shouldst put these questions so
closely to me. It were well that the brotherhood
had bethought itself of this imputation in season,
that the question might have been settled, for or
against, as justice needed, when the learned and
great among our fathers were met at Constance, in
grave and general council.
Father Arnolph regarded his companion in
serious
concern. He too well knew the deplorable
ignorance, and the consequent superstition, in which
even the great of his time were involved, to
manifest
surprise; but he also knew the power the other
wielded sufficiently to foresee the evils of such a
union between force and ignorance. Still it was
not his present object to combat opinions that were
only to be removed by time and study, if indeed
they can ever be eradicated, when fairly rooted in
the human mind. He pursued his immediate
design
,
therefore, avoiding a discussion, which, at that
moment, might prove worse than useless.
That the finger of evil mingles more or less
with all things that come of human agency, may be
true, he continued, taking care that the expression
of his eye should neither awaken the pride, nor
arouse the obstinacy of the noblebut when altars
have been reared, and when the worship of the
Most High God hath continued for ages, we have
reason to hope that his holy spirit presideth in
majesty
and love around the shrines. Such hath been
the case with Limburg, Count Emich: and doubt it
not, we who stand here, holding this discourse,
stand also in the immediate presence of that dread
Being who created heaven and earth, who guideth
our lives, and who will judge us in death!
God help us, Herr Prior! Thou hast already
done thy office in the desk this day, and I see no
occasion that thou shouldst doubly perform a
function
,
that was so well acquitted at first. I like not
the manner of being ushered, as it were
unannounced
,
into so dread a presence as this thou hast
just proclaimed. Were it but the Elector Friedrich,
Emich of Leiningen could not presume to this
familiarity
,
without some consultation as to its fitness.
In the eyes of the Being we mean, Electors and
Emperors are equally indifferent. He loveth the
meek, and the merciful, and the just, while he
scourgeth them that deny his authority. But thou
hast named thy feudal prince, and I will question
thee in a manner suited to thy habits. Thou art, in
truth, Emich of Leiningen, a noble of name in the
Palatinate, and one known to be of long-established
authority in these regions. Still art thou second,
or even third, in worldly command, in this thy very
country. The Elector and the Emperor both hold
thee in check, and either is strong enough to
destroy thee at pleasure, in thy vaunted hold of
Hartenburg.
To the last I yield the means, if thou wilt, worthy
Priorinterrupted the Countbut for the first,
he must needs dispose of his own pressing enemies,
before he achieves this victory!
Father Arnolph understood the other's meaning,
for it was no secret that Friedrich was, just then, so
pressed as to sit on a tottering throne; a
circumstance
that was known to have encouraged the long
meditated designs of the Count of Hartenburg to get
rid of a community, that thwarted his views, and
diminished his local authority.
Forgetting the Elector, we will turn only to the
Emperor, then, rejoined the Prior. Thou
believest
him to be in his palace, and remote from thy
country, and certainly he hath here no visible force
to restrain thy rebellious hand. We will imagine
that a family he protectednay, that he loved
stood in the way of some of thy greedy projects, and
that the tempter had persuaded thee it would be well
to remove it, or to destroy with the strong hand.
Art thou weak enough, Count Emich, to listen to
such advice, when thou knowest that the arm of
Charles is long enough to reach from his distant
Madrid to the most remote corner of Germany, and
that his vengeance would be as sure as it would be
fearful?
It would be a bold warfare, Herr Prior, that of
Emich of Leiningen against Charles Quintus! Left
to mine own humor, holy monk, I would rather
choose another enemy.
And yet thou wouldst war with one mightier
than he! Thou raisest thy impotent arm, and thy
audacious will, against thy God! Thou wouldst
despise his promises, profane his altars, nay, thou
wouldst fain throw down the tabernacle that he hath
reared! Dost thou think that omnipotence will be a
nerveless witness of this sin; or that an eternal
and benign wisdom will forget to punish?
By St. Paul! thou puttest the matter altogether
in thine own interest, Father Arnolph, for there is
yet no proof that this Abbey of Limburg hath any
such origin, or, if it had, that it hath not fallen into
disfavor, by the excesses of its own professed.
'Twere well to send for the right reverend Abbot,
and those pillars of sanctity the Fathers Cuno and
Siegfried, to bear witness in thy behalf. God's
wisdom! I reason better with those worthies, in
such a matter, than with thee!
Emich laughed, the sound echoing in that vaulted
chapel to the ears of the monk, like the scoffing of a
demon. Still, the natural equity of Father Arnolph
told him that there was too much to justify the
taunt of the noble, for he had long and bitterly
mourned the depravity of many of the brotherhood.
I am not here to sit in judgment on those who
err, but to defend the shrines at which I worship,
and to warn thee from a fatal sin. If thy hand is
ever lifted against these walls, it is raised against
that which God hath blessed, and which God will
avenge. But thou art of human feeling, Emich of
Hartenburg; and though, doubting of the sacred
character of that which thou wouldst fain destroy,
thou canst not deceive thyself concerning these
tombsIn this holy chapel have prayers been often
raised, and masses said, for the souls of thine own
line!
The Count of Leiningen looked steadily at the
speaker. Father Arnolph had placed himself,
without
design, near the opening which communicated
between that sombre chapel and the superior church.
Rays of bright light shot through the eastern
window
,
and fell upon the pavement at his feet,
throwing
around his form the mild and solemn lustre
which comes from the stained glass of the Gothio
ages. The services of the morning had also spread,
throughout the entire building, that soothing
atmosphere
which is usually the attendant of Roman
worship. The incense had penetrated to the crypt,
and unconsciously the warlike noble had felt its
influence
quieting his nerves and lulling the passions.
All who have entered the principal Basilica of
modern
Rome, have been subject to a combination of
moral and physical causes that produce the result
we mean, and which, though more striking in that
vast and glorious pile, resembling a world with
attributes and an atmosphere of its own, is also felt
in every Catholic temple of consequence in a
lessened
degree.
Here lie my fathers, Arnolph, answered the
Count, huskily; and here, as thou sayest, have
masses been said for their souls!
And thou contemnest their gravesthou wouldst
violate even their bones!
'Twere not an act for a Christian!
Look hither, Count. This is the monument of
the good Emich, thy ancestor. He honored his
God, and did not scruple to worship at our altars.
Thou knowest, holy Prior, that I have often
bared my soul at thy knees.
Thou hast confessed, and hast been shrived;
that thou didst not lay up future griefs
Say rather damnationinterrupted one behind,
whose voice, issuing suddenly from that sepulchral
chapel, seemed to come from the tombs themselves
Thou triflest, reverend Prior, with our holy
mission, to deal thus tenderly with so sore a sinner.
The Count of Leiningen had started, and even
quailed, at the first words of interruption; but
looking
around, he beheld the receding front, the sunken
eye, and the bending person of Father Johan.
Monks, I leave you, said Emich, firmly. It
is good for ye to pray, and to frequent these gloomy
altars; but I, who am a soldier, cannot waste
further
time in your vaults. Herr Prior, farewell.
Thou hast a guardian that will protect the good.
Before the Prior could recover his voice, for he
too had been taken by surprise, the Count stalked,
with a heavy footstep, up the marble stairs, and the
tread of his armed heel was soon heard on the flags
above.
CHAPTER X.
The way is but short; away
Armado
.
While
all must be conscious of the fearful
infirmities
that beset human nature, there are none so
base as not to know that their being contains the
seeds of that godlike principle which still likens
them to their divine Creator. Virtue commands
the respect of man, in whatever accidental stage of
civilization, or of mental improvement, he may
happen
to exist; and he who practises its precepts is
certain of the respect, though he may not always
secure the protection, of his contemporaries.
As the Count of Leiningen walked down the rich
and vast aisle of the Abbey-church, his thoughts
vacillated between the impressions produced by the
Prior, and his latent, but still predominant,
intentions
.
He might have been likened to one who
listened to the councils of a good and of an evil
genius; that exhorting to forbearance and mercy,
and this tempting to violence by the usual array of
flattery and hopes. While he brooded over the
exactions of the community, which were founded
on a legal superiority that was alike hurtful to his
power and galling to his pride, its manner of
thwarting
his views, and its constant opposition to his
supremacy
in the valley, motives of enmity that were
justly heightened by the dissolute and audacious
deportment of too many of its members, the effect
of all was secretly opposed by the image of Father
Arnolph, surrounded by the mild and noble
characteristics
of Christian virtue. Emich could not,
though he fain would, chase from his imagination
the impression of meekness, charity, and of
self-denial
,
that a long acquaintance with the monk had
made, and which the recent interview had served
both to freshen and to render more deep. But a
spectacle was prepared to meet his eyes in the
court of the convent, that did as much towards
weakening this happy influence of the Prior, by
setting
the pride of the noble in opposition to his better
feelings, as could have been wished by the bitterest
enemy of Limburg.
It has been said that the outer wall of the Abbey
encircled the entire brow of the hill, or mountain,
on which the convent stood. Though the buildings
were spacious and numerous, the size of the little
plain on the summit left ample space for exercise
and air. Besides the cloisters, which were vast,
though possessing the character of monkish
seclusion
,
there were gardens in the rear of the Abbot's
abode, and a court of considerable extent,
immediately
in front of the church. Athwart this court,
in which sundry groups of the late congregation yet
lingered, was drawn up, in military order, a band
of soldiers, wearing the colors, and acknowledging
the authority, of the Elector Friedrich. The secret
signal given by Father Bonifacius, when the Count
entered the choir, had prepared this unwelcome
sight for his neighbor.
While the men-at-arms leaned on their
arquebuses
,
in grave attention to discipline, the Knight
of Rhodes and the Abb were occupied in paying
their court to the fair wife of the Burgomaster of
Deurckheim, and to her scarce fairer daughter.
Young Berchthold stood aloof; watching the
interview
with feelings allied equally to envy and
jealousy
.
A fair morning and a comfortable mass to you,
high-born Emich! cried the husband and father
heartily, but lifting his cap, as the noble approached
the spot where the burgher stood, waiting for this
meeting ere he put foot into the stirrup; I had
thought the sight of your fathers' altar was like to
cheat me of this honor, and to send me away
without
a word from your friendly and much-prized
grace.
Between thee and me, Heinrich, this slight
could not happen, answered the Count, grasping
the hand of the Burgomaster, which he squeezed
with the cordiality and vigor of a soldier. How
fareth it with all in Deurckheim, that town of my
affection, not to say of my right?
As you could wish, noble Count, and
well-disposed
to the house of Leiningen. In all that
pertaineth
to love of your name and race, we lack
nothing.
This is well, honest Heinrich; it may yet be
betterBut thou wilt do me grace this summer
morning?
Nay, it is for your grace to command in this
particular, and for one like me to obey.
Herr Heinrich, hast looked well at these
knaves of Friedrich? Ha! are they not
melancholy
and ill-disposed at being cooped with
Benedictines
,
when there are stirring times in the
Palatinate
,
and when their master hath as much as he
can do to hold his court in Heidelberg! Seest thou
aught of this?
Emich had dropped his voice, and the burgher
was not a man to express more in answer, than the
circumstances actually required. He looked
eloquently
,
however, and the exchange of glances
between
him and the Count betrayed the nature of the
understanding that connected the castle and the city.
You spoke of commanding my duty, mein Herr
Graf, and it is fitting I should know in what manner
to do you pleasure.
Nay, 'tis no pain-giving penance I ask. Turn
thy horse's head towards Hartenburg, and share of
Vol. I. P
my poor fare, with a loving welcome, for an hour
or so.
I would it were within compass, my Lord
Count, returned Heinrich, casting a doubting look
towards Meta and his wifebut these Sunday
masses are matters in which the women love to
deal; and from the first sound of the matin bell, till
we shut the gates at even, I scarce call myself
master
of a thought.
By the Virgin! 'Twould seem ill indeed, did
not Hartenburg contain a roof to shelter all of thy
name and love.
There are noble gentlemen already on your
hospitality
,
and I would not fain
Name them not. This in the gay doublet, that
weareth the white cross, is but a houseless Knight
of Rhodes, one that wandereth like the dove from
the ark, uncertain where to place his foot; and he
of black vestments, an idle Abb from among the
French, who doth little else but prate with the
women. Leave thy female gender in their hands,
for they are much accustomed to these gallantries.
Zum Henker! most nobly born eccellenz, I
never doubted their handiness in all idlenesses; but
my wife hath little humor for vain attentions of this
nature, and not to conceal from my lord any of our
humors, I will confess it is as little to my pleasure
to witness so much ceremony with a woman.
Were the well-born Ermengarde, your noble
consort
,
in the castle, my female charge might be glad
to pay their court to her, but in her absence I doubt
that they will cause more encumbrance than they
will afford satisfaction.
Name it not, honest Heinrich, but leave the
matter to me. As for these idlers, I will find them
occupation, when fairly out of the saddle; so will I
not excuse the youngest of thy name.
The warm, frank manner of the noble prevailed,
though the arrangement was not altogether
agreeable
to the Burgomaster; but in that age hospitality
was always of so direct a character as seldom to
admit denial without sufficient excuse. Emich now
paid his court to the females. Smoothing his
moustache
and beard, he saluted the cheeks of Ulricke,
with affectionate freedom, and then, presuming on
his years and rank, he pressed a kiss on the ruby
lips of Meta. The girl blushed and laughed, and in
her confusion curtesied, as if in acknowledgment of
the grace from one of so high quality. Heinrich
himself, though he so little liked the coquetry of the
strangers, witnessed these liberties not only without
alarm but with evident contentment.
Many thanks, noble Emich, for this honor to my
women, he cried, lifting his bonnet again. Meta
is not used to these compliments, and she scarce
knoweth rightly how to acknowledge the grace, for,
to say truth, it is not often that her cheek feeleth the
tickling of a beard. I am no saluter of her sex, and
there are none in Deurckheim that may so presume.
St. Denis defend me! exclaimed the Abb; in
what shameful negligence have we fallen! saluting
the mild Ulricke on the instant, and repeating the
same ceremony with the daughter, so suddenly, as
to leave none present time to recover from their
surprise. Sir Knight of Rhodes, we appear in
this affair as but of indifferent breeding!
Hold, cousin of Viederbach, said Emich,
laughing
,
while he placed a hand before his kinsman
We forget, all this time, that we are in the court
of Limburg, and that salutations which savor so
much of earth may scandalize the holy Benedictines.
We will to horse, and keep our gallantries for a
better season.
The forward, impatient movement of young
Berchthold was self-checked, and, swallowing his
discontent, he turned aside to conceal his vexation.
In the mean time, the whole party prepared to
mount. Although repulsed in his effort to obtain a
salute from the fair girl, who had so passively
received
these liberties from his kinsman and the
Abb, the Knight of Rhodes busied himself in
assisting
the damsel upon the crupper of her father's
saddle
.
A similar office was performed for Ulricke by
the Count of Leiningen himself, and then the noble
threw his own booted and heavy leg across the
large and strong-jointed war-horse that was pawing
the pavement of the court. The others imitated his
example, even to the mounted servitors, who were
numerous; when, doing stately reverence to the
large crucifix that stood before them, the whole
cavalcade ambled from the court.
There were many curious spectators around the
outer gate, among whom were sundry of the more
humble dependants of Hartenburg, purposely
collected
there, by an order of their lord, in the event
of any sudden violence arising from his visit to the
Abbey, together with a crowd of mendicants.
Alms, great Emich! Alms, worthy and wealthy
Burgomaster! God's blessing on ye both, and holy
St. Benedict heed ye in his prayers! We are
a-hungred
and a-cold, and we crave alms at your
honorable hands!
Give the rogues a silver pence, said the Count
to the purse-bearer, who rode in his trainThey
have a starving look, in sooth. These godly
Benedictines
have, of late, been so busied between their
garrison and their masses, that they have forgotten
to feed their poor. Come nearer, friend; art of
the Jaegerthal?
No, noble Count. I come from a pilgrimage to
a distant shrine, but want and suffering have befallen
me by the way.
Hast pressed the monks for charity? or dost
thou find them too much engaged in godliness to
remember human suffering?
Great Count, they give freely; but where there
are many mouths to feed, there needs be much gold.
I say naught against the holy community of
Limburg
,
which is godly in charity, as in grace.
Give the knave a kreutzer; growled Heinrich
Frey; hast thou aught to show in the way of
authority
for undertaking this pilgrimage, and for
assailing the Elector's subjects and servitors in a
public horse-path?
Naught but this, illustrious Burgomaster,
Heinrich wore his chain of officenaught but the
commands of my confessor, and this pass of our
own chief men.
Callest this naught? Thou speakest of a legal
instrument of high quality, an' it were but a copy
of silly rhymes! Hold! thou must not be led into
temptation by too much want. Meta, wench, hast
a kreutzer?
Here is a silver pence, that may better suit the
pilgrim's necessities, father.
God keep thee, child! Dost expect to escape
want thyself, with such prodigality? But stay
there are many of them, and the piece justly
distributed
might do good. Come nearer, friends. Here
is a silver zwanziger, which you will divide honestly
into twenty parts, of which two are for the
stranger
,
for to him are we most indebted by the
commands
of God, and one for each inhabitant of the
valley, not forgetting the poor woman that, in your
haste, and by reason of her years, you have
prevented
from drawing near. For this boon, I ask
prayers of you in behalf of the Elector, the city of
Deurckheim, and the family of Frey.
So saying, the Burgomaster pushed ahead, and
was soon at the foot of the mountain of Limburg.
The train of footmen, who had lingered to witness
P 2
the largess of the magistrate, and who had
considered
the indifference of Emich as what was no
more than natural in one, placed by Providence in a
situation so far removed from vulgar wants, was
about to follow, when a lay-brother of the convent
touched one of the party on the arm, signing for
him to re-enter the court.
Thou art needed further, friend, whispered the
lay-brother. Amuse thyself with these
men-at-arms
till they retire; then seek the cloisters.
A nod sufficed to tell the lay-brother that he was
understood, and he immediately disappeared. The
follower of Count Emich did as commanded,
loitering
in-the court until the object of the Abbot was
accomplished, that of exhibiting the protection of
the Elector to his dangerous neighbor, and the
arquebusiers marched to their quarters. The road
was no sooner clear, than the peasant who had been
detained proceeded to do as he had been ordered.
In each conventual edifice of the other
hemisphere
,
there is an inner court surrounded by low
and contemplative arcades, called the cloisters.
The term, which is given to the seclusion of
monastic
life in general, and to the objects of the
institution
itself, in an architectural sense, is limited to the
secluded and sombre piazzas just mentioned. When
this part of the building is decorated, as often
happens
,
with the elaborate ornaments of the Gothic
style, it is not easy to conceive a situation more
happily imagined for the purposes of reflection,
self-examination
,
and religious calm. To us the
cloisters
have ever appeared pregnant with the poetry
of monkish existence, and, Protestant as we are, we
never yet entered one without feeling the influence
of that holy and omnipotent power that is thought
to be propitiated by conventual seclusion. In Italy,
the land of vivid thought and of glorious realities, the
pencils of the greatest masters have been put in
requisition to give the cloisters a mild attraction,
blended with lessons of instruction, that are in strict
consonance with their uses. Here are found some
of the finest remains of Raphael, of Domenichino,
and of Andrea del Sarto; and the traveller now
enters vaulted galleries, that the monk so long paced
in religious hope or learned abstraction, to visit the
most prized relics of art.
The dependant of Count Emich had no difficulty
in finding his way to the place in question, for, as
usual, there was a direct communication between
the cloisters of Limburg and the church. By
entering
the latter, and taking a lateral door, which
was known to lead to the sacristy, he found himself
beneath the arcades, in the midst of the touching
seclusion described. Against the walls were tablets
with Latin inscriptions, in honor of different
brothers
who had been distinguished by piety and
knowledge
;
and here and there was visible, in ivory or
stone, that constant monitor of Catholic worship,
the crucifix.
The stranger paused, for a single monk paced
the arcades, and his mien was not inviting for one
who doubted of his reception. At least so thought
the dependant of Emich, who might easily have
mistaken the chastened expression of Father
Arnolph's
features, clouded as they now were with
care, for severity.
What wouldst thou? demanded the Prior, when
a turn brought him face to face with the intruder.
Reverend monk, thy much-prized blessing.
Kneel, and receive it, son. Thou art doubly
blest; in seeking consolation from the Church, and
in avoiding the fatal heresies of the times.
The Prior repeated the benediction, made the
usual sign of grace, and motioned for the other to
rise.
Wouldst thou aught else? he asked, observing
that the peasant did not retire, as was usual for those
who received this favour.
Naughtunless yonder brother hath occasion
for me.
The face of Siegfried was thrust through a door
which led to the cells. The countenance of the
Prior changed like that of one who had lost all
confidence
in the intentions of his companion, and he
pursued his way along the arcade. The other
glided past, and disappeared by the door which he
had been covertly invited to enter.
It has already been said that the Benedictine is an
order of hospitality. A principal building of the hill
was especially devoted to the comforts of the Abbot,
and to those of the travellers it was always his duty,
and in the case of Father Bonifacius scarcely less
often his pleasure, to entertain. Here were seen
some signs of the great wealth of the monastery,
though it was wealth chastened by forms, and
restricted
by opinion; still there was little of self-denial,
or indeed of any of that self-mortification which is
commonly thought to be the inseparable attendant
of the cell. The rooms were wainscoted with dark
oak; emblems of religious faith, in costly materials,
abounded; nor was there any want of velvet and
other stuffs, all however of sober colours, though of
intrinsic value. Father Siegfried ushered the peasant
into one of the most comfortable of these rooms.
It was the cabinet of the Abbot, who, having thrown
aside the robes of office in which he had so lately
appeared in the choir, and, ungirt and divested of
all the churchly pomp in which he had just shown
himself to the people, was now taking his ease,
with the indolence of a student, and with some of
the negligence of a debauchee.
Here is the youth I have named to you, holy
Abbot, said Father Siegfried, motioning his
companion
to advance.
Bonifacius laid down a parchment-covered and
illuminated volume, one but lately issued from the
press, rubbing his eyes like a man suddenly roused
from a dreamy abstraction.
Truly, brother Siegfried, these knaves of
Leipzig
have done wonders with their art! Not a word
can I find astray, or a thought concealed. God
knows to what pass of information this excess of
knowledge, so long sacred to the learned, may yet
lead us! The office of a librarian will no longer be
of rare advantages, or scarcely of repute.
Have we not proofs of the evil, in the growing
infidelity, and in the manifest insubordination of the
times?
It were better for all their souls, and their present
repose, that fewer did the thinking in this
troublesome
worldThou art named Johan, son?
Gottlob, most reverend Abbot, by your leave,
and with the Church's favor.
'Tis a pious appellation, and I trust thou dost not
forget to obey the duty of which it should hourly
remind thee.
In that particular I can say that I praise God,
father, for all the benefits I receive, and were they
double what they are, I feel that within me which
says I could go on rendering thanks for ever, for
gracious gifts.
The answer of Gottlob caused the Abbot to turn
his head. After studying the demure expression of
the young man's face intently, he continued
This is well; thou art a huntsman in Count
Emich's household?
His cow-herd, holy Abbot, and a huntsman in
the bargain; for a more scampering, self-losing,
trouble-giving family is not to be found in the
Palatinate
,
than this of mine!
I remember it was a cow-herd; thou dealt a
little lightly with my brother Siegfried here, in
pretending
thou wert of Deurckheim, and not of the
castle.
To speak fairly to your reverence, there was some
business between us; for be it known to you, holy
Abbot, a cow-herd is made to suffer for all the frolics
of his beasts, and so I preferred to do penance simply
for my own backslidings, without white-washing the
consciences of all Lord Emich's cattle in the
bargain
.
The Abbot turned again, and this time his look
was still longer and more scrutinizing than before.
Hast thou heard of Luther?
Does your reverence mean the drunken cobbler
of Deurckheim.
I mean the monk of Wittenberg, knave: though,
by St. Benedict! thou hast not unaptly named the
rebel; for truly doth he cobble that would fain mend
the offices or discipline of Holy Church! I ask if
thou hast sullied thy understanding and weakened
thy faith, by lending ear to this damnable heresy,
that is abroad in our Germany?
St. Benedict and the blessed Maria keep your
reverence in mind, according to your deserts! What
hath a poor cow-herd to do with questions that
trouble the souls of the learned, and cause even the
peaceably disposed to become quarrelsome and
war-like
?
Thou hast received a schooling above thy
fortune
Art
of the Jaegerthal?
Born and nurtured, holy Abbot. We are of long
standing in the valley, and few families are better
known for skill in rearing beeves, or for dealing
cunningly with a herd, than that of which I come,
humble and poor as I may seem to your reverence.
I doubt but there is as much seeming as reality
in this indifferent opinion of thyself. But thou hast
had an explanation with brother Siegfried, and we
count on thy services. Thou knowest the power of
the Church, son, and cannot be ignorant of its
disposition
to deal mercifully with those that do it
homage
,
nor of its displeasure when justly angered. We
are disposed to deal in increased kindness with those
who do not stray from the fold, at this moment,
when the Devils are abroad scattering the ignorant
and helpless.
Notwithstanding all you have said, most reverend
Abbot, concerning the trifle I have gleaned in the
way of education, I am too little taught to
understand
aught but plain speech. In the matter of a
bargain it might be well to name the conditions
clearly, lest a poor, but well-meaning, youth should
happen to be damned, simply because he hath little
knowledge of Latin, or cannot clearly understand
what hath not been clearly said.
I have no other meaning than that thy pious
conduct
will be remembered at the altar and the
confessional
;
and that indulgences, and other lenities,
will not be forgotten when there is question of thee.
This is excellent, holy Abbot, for those that may
profit by itbut, Saint Benedict help us! of what
account would it all be, were Lord Emich to threaten
his people with the dungeon and stripes, should any
dare to frequent the altars of Limburg, or
otherwise
to have dealings with the reverend
brotherhood
?
Dost think our prayers, or our authority, cannot
penetrate the walls of Hartenburg?
Of that, most powerful Bonifacius, I say nothing,
since I never have yet profited in the way you
mean. The dungeon of Hartenburg and I are not
strangers to each other; and, were I to speak my
most intimate thoughts, it would be to say, that Saint
Benedict himself would find it no easy matter to
open its doors, or to soften its pavements, so long
as the Count was in an angry humour. Potz
Tausend
,
holy Abbot! it is well to speak of miracles
and of indulgences; but let him who imagines that
either is about to make that damp and soul-chilling
hole warm and pleasant, pass a night within its walls
in November! He may enter with as much faith in
the Abbey prayers as he will; but if he do not come
forth with great dread of Lord Emich's displeasure,
why he is not flesh and blood, but a burning kiln in
the form of mortality!
Father Bonifacius saw that it was useless
endeavoring
to influence the mind of the cow-herd in
the vulgar manner, and he had recourse to surer
means. Motioning his companion to hand him a little
casket, externally decorated with many of the
visible
signs of the Christian faith, he took out of it a
purse, that wanted for neither size nor weight. The
eyes of Gottlob glistenedhad not the monks been
much occupied in examining the gold, they might
have suspected that the pleasure he betrayed was a
little affectedand he manifested a strong disposition
to know the contents of a bag that had so many
outward
signs of value.
This will make peace and create faith between
us, said the Abbot, handing a golden mark to
Gottlob
.
Here is that which the dullest comprehension
can understand; and whose merits, I doubt not, will
be sufficiently clear to one of thy ready wit.
Your reverence does not overvalue my means,
answered the cow-herd, who pocketed the piece
without further ceremony. Were our good Mother
of the Church to take this method of securing friends,
she might laugh at all the Luthers between the Lake
of Constance and the ocean, him of Wittenberg
among the number: but, by some strange oversight,
she has of late done more towards taking away the
people's gold, than towards bestowing! I am
rejoiced
to find that the mistake is at last discovered;
and chiefly am I glad, that one, poor and unworthy
as I, has been among the first that she is pleased to
make an instrument of her new intentions!
The Abbot appeared at a loss to understand the
character of his agent; but, being a worldly and
selfish man himself, he counted rather loosely on the
influence of a mediator whose potency is tacitly
admitted by all of mercenary propensities. He
resumed
his seat, therefore, like one who saw little
necessity for farther concealment, and went directly
to the true object of the interview.
Thou hast something to communicate from the
Castle of Hartenburg, good Gottlob?
If it be your reverence's pleasure to listen.
ProceedCanst tell aught of the force Emich
hath gathered in the hold?
Mein Herr Abbot, it is no easy matter to count
varlets that go staggering about, from the moment
the sun touches your Abbey towers, to that in which
he sets behind the Teufelstein.
Hast thou not means of separating them in
divisions
,
and of making the enumerations of each
apart?
Holy Abbot, that experiment hath failed. I
divided
them into the drunk and the sober; but, for
the life of me, I could never get them all to be long
enough of the same mind, to hunt up those that were
in garrets and cellars; for while this slept off his
debauch, that swallowed cup after cup, in a manner
to recruit the drunkards as fast as they lost. It were
far easier to know the Emperor's policy, than to
count Lord Emich's followers!
Still they are many.
They are and they are not, as one happens to
view soldiership. In the way of draining a butt,
Duke Friedrich would find them a powerful corps,
even in an attack against his Heidelburg tun; and
yet I doubt whether he would think them of much
account in the pressing warfare he wageth.
Vol. I. Q
Go tothou art too indirect in thy answers for
the duty thou hast undertaken. Return the gold,
if thou refusest the service.
I pray thee, reverend Abbot, to remember the
risks I have already run in this desperate
undertaking
,
and to consider that the trifle you have so
munificently bestowed, is already more than earned
by the danger of my ears, to say nothing of great
loss of reputation, and some pricking of conscience.
This clown hath tampered with thee, Father
Siegfried, said the Abbot, in a tone of reproach to
the attending monk: he even dares to make light
of our presence and office!
We have the means of recalling him to his
respect
,
as well as to a remembrance of his
engagements
.
Thou sayest true: let the remedies be applied
but hold!
During this brief colloquy between the
Benedictines
,
Father Siegfried had touched a cord, and a
lay-brother, of vigorous frame, showed himself. At
a signal from the monk, he laid a hand on an arm
of the unresisting Gottlob, and was about to lead
him from the room, when the last words of the
Abbot, and another signal from Father Siegfried,
caused him to pause.
Bonifacius leaned a cheek on his hand, and mused
long on the policy of the step he was about to take.
The relations between the Abbey and the Castle,
to adopt diplomatic language, were precisely in that
awkward state in which it was almost as hazardous
to recede as to advance. To imprison a vassal of
the Count of Hartenburg, might bring matters to
an immediate issue; and yet, to permit him to quit
the convent, was to deprive the brotherhood of the
means of extracting the information it was so
important
to obtain, and to procure which had been
the principal inducement of attending the debauch
already described, at a moment when there was so
little real amity between the revellers. The
precaution
of Emich had frustrated this well-laid scheme,
and the result of the experiment had been too costly
to admit of repetition. There was also hazard in
permitting Gottlob to return to Hartenburg, for the
expectations and hostile spirit of the Abbey had been
so unadvisedly exposed to the hind, as to render it
certain he would relate what had occurred. It was
desirable, too, to maintain an appearance of
confidence
,
although so little was felt; for the monk
well knew, that next to friendship, its apparent
existence
was of account in preventing the usual
expedients
of open hostility. Agents were at
Heidelburg
,
pressing the Elector on a point of the last
concern to the welfare of the brotherhood; and it
was particularly material that Emich should not be
driven to any overt act before the result of this
mission was known. In short, these too little powers
were in a condition similar to that in which some
greater communities have been known to exist,
instinctively
alive to the opposing character of their
respective interests, and yet tampering with the
denouement
,
because neither was yet prepared to
proclaim all it wished, meditated, and hoped to be
able to attain, In the mean time, there was an
ostensible
courtesy between the belligerent parties,
occasionally obscured by bursts of natural feeling,
which, in politics, the world calls bonhommie, but
which would, perhaps, be better termed by the
frank designation of artifice.
The Abbot was so much accustomed to this sort
of politic reflection, that all these considerations
passed before his mind in less time than we have
consumed in enumerating them. Still the pause
was salutary; for, when he resumed the discourse,
he spoke like one whose decision was supported by
thought.
Thou wilt tarry with us a little, Gottlob, for the
good of thy soul, he said, making a sign that was
understood by his inferiors.
A thousand thanks, humane and godly Abbot.
Next to the present good of my body, I look with
most concern to the future condition of my poor
soul; and there is great comfort and consolation in
your gracious words. It is but the soul of a poor
man; but, being my all, in the way of souls, it must
needs be taken care of.
The discipline we meditate will be healthful.
Brothers, lead the penitent to his cell.
The singular indifference with which Gottlob
heard his doom, might have given the Abbot motive
for reflection, had he not been so much occupied by
other thoughts. As it was, the hind accompanied
the lay brother without resistance, and indeed with
the manner of one who appeared to think he was a
gainer by this especial notice from the community
of Limburg. So natural and easy was the air of
Gottlob, as they took the direction of a gloomy
corridor
,
that Father Siegfried began to believe he
had employed an agent whose mind, shrewd and
peculiar as it seemed at times, was in truth subject
to moments of more than usual imbecility and
dullness
.
He placed the cow-herd in a cell, pointed to
a crucifix, its only article of furniture, and, without
deeming it necessary even to secure the door,
retired
.
CHAPTER XI.
The Lady Valeria is come
To visit you.
Coriolanus
.
A short
ride brought the cavalcade of Count
Emich to the gates of Hartenburg. When all had
alighted, and the guests, with the more regular
inmates
of the castle, were ushered into the hall, the
lord of the hold again saluted Ulrike and her
daughter
.
This freedom was the privilege of his rank,
and of his character as host; and for its exercise,
he once more received the grateful
acknowledgments
of Heinrich Frey. The females were then
committed to the care of Gisela, the warder's
daughter
,
who, in the absence of its more noble mistress,
happened to be the presiding person of her sex in the
place.
Thou art thrice welcome, upright and loyal
Heinrich! exclaimed the Count, heartily, while he
led the Burgomaster by the hand, into one of the
rooms of honorNone know thy worth, and thy
constancy to thy friends, better than the master of
this poor castle; and none love thee better.
Thanks, well-born Emich, and such duty as one
of poor birth and breeding can and should pay to a
noble so honoured and prized. I am little used to
courtesies, beyond those which we burghers give
and take in the streets, and may not do myself full
justice in the expression of reverence and respect,
but I pray you, Herr Count, to take the desire for
the performance.
Wert thou the Emperor's most favored
chamberlain
,
thy speech could not do thee more credit.
Though Deurckheim be not Madrid, it is a
well-respected
and courtly city, and none need envy the
Roman, or the Parisian, that dwelleth there. Here
Q 2
is my kinsman of Viederbach, a knight that
Providence
hath cast a little loosely upon the world since
the downfall of his Mediterranean island of Rhodes,
and who hath travelled far and near, and he swears,
daily, thy town hath no parallel, for its dimensions.
Considered as a mountain city of no great
magnitude
,
meine Herren, we do not blush at the aspect
of our ancient walls.
Thou needest not, and thou must have noted
that I spoke in reference to its size. Monsieur
Latouche is a gentleman that cometh from the
capital
of King Francis itself; and no later than this
morning, he remarked on the neatness, and wealth,
and other matters of consideration, that make
themselves
apparent, even to the stranger, in thy
well-governed
and prosperous borough.
The Burgomaster acknowledged the compliment,
by a profound inclination and a gratified eye, for no
flattery is so palpable as not to meet a welcome
with those who labor for public distinction; and
Emich well knew, that the police and order of his
city were weak spots in Heinrich Frey's humility.
Lord Emich scarce does me justice, returned
the pliant Abb, since I found many other causes
of admiration. The deference that is paid to rank
in thy populace, and the manner in which the
convenience
of the honourable is respected, are
particularly
worthy of commendation.
The churchman is right, Lord Emichfor, of
all the towns in Germany, I do not think it easy to
find another in which the poor and base are so well
taught to refrain from thrusting their importunities
and disadvantages on the gentle, as in our
Deurckheim
.
I think my lord the Count must have
observed
the strict severity and cautious justice of
our rules in this particular?
None know them better, nor does any heed them
more. I cannot recall the moment, cousin Albrecht,
when any unpleasant intrusion on my privileges hath
ever occurred within its gates. But I keep you from
refreshing yourselves, worthy friends. Give us leave
a little;we will seek you again, at your own
convenience
.
The Knight and the Abb took this intimation
of the desire of the Count to be alone with the
Burgomaster in good part, and withdrew
without
unnecessary delay. When alone, Emich again
took Heinrich Frey by the hand, and led him away
into a part of the castle where none presumed to
intrude
without an especial errand. Here he entered
one of those narrow rooms, which were devoted to
secret uses, and which was well termed a closet,
being in effect but little larger and scarcely better
lighted, than the straitened apartments to which we
give the same appellation in these later times.
When fairly protected from observation, and
removed
beyond the danger of eaves-droppers and spies,
the Count threw aside his cloak, unbuckled his
sword-belt
,
and assumed the manner of one at his ease. The
Burgomaster took a seat on a stool, in deference to
his companion's rank; while the latter, without
seeming
sensible of the act, seated himself at his side, in
the only chair that the closet contained. Whoever
has had much intercourse with Asiatics, or with
Mussulmans of the southern shore of the
Mediterranean
,
must have frequently observed the silent,
significant, manner with which they regard each
other, when disposed to court or to yield confidence;
the eye gradually kindling, and the muscles of the
mouth relaxing, until the feeling is fully betrayed in
a smile. This is one of the means employed by men
who dwell under despotic and dangerous
governments
,
and where the social habits are much
tinctured
with violence and treachery, of assuring one
another of secret faith and ready support. There
is a sort of similar freemasonry in all conditions of
life, in which frank and just institutions do not spread
their mantle equally over the powerful and the weak,
superseding, by the majesty of the law, the necessity
of these furtive appeals to the pledges and sympathies
of confidants. Such, in some degree, was the nature
of the communication with which Emich of
Hartenburg
now commenced his private intercourse
with Heinrich Frey. The Count first laid his square,
bony, hand on the knee of the Burgomaster, which
he squeezed until the iron fingers were nearly buried
in the fleshy protuberance. Each turned his head
toward his companion, looking askance, as if they
mutually understood the meaning of what was
conveyed
by this silent coquetry. Still, notwithstanding
the apparent community of thought and confidence,
the countenance and air of each was distinguished
by the personal character and the social station of
the individual. The eye of the Baron was both
more decided, and more openly meaning, than that
of the Burgomaster; while the smile of the latter
appeared rather like a faint reflection of the inviting
expression of the former, than the effect of any
inward
impulse.
Hast heard of last night's success? abruptly
demanded the Count.
Nothing of the sort hath gladdened me, Herr
Count; my heart yearns to know all, if it touches
your high interests.
The mass-singing rogues are stripped of their
wine-tribute! Of that much are they fairly and
legally disburthened! Thou knowest of our
long-intended
trial of heads; I had intended to have
prayed thee to be a second at the banquet, but the
presence of these idlers put some restraint on my
hospitality. Thou wouldest have proved a stanch
second in such an onset, Heinrich!
I thank my lord the Count, and shall deem the
grace as good as accomplished in the wish. I am
not worse than another at board, and may boast of
some endurance in the way of liquor, but the
seriousness
of the times admonishes us, of civic authority,
to be prudent. There is a wish in the people to be
admitted to certain unreasonable and grave
privileges
,
such as the right of vending their wares in the
market-place at unseasonable hours, when the
convenience
of the burgomasters would be much vexed
by the concession; and other similar innovations,
against which we must make a firm stand, lest they
come, in time, to invade our general authority and
cause an unnatural convulsion. Were we to give
way to pretensions so extravagant, Herr Count, the
town would come to general confusion; and the
orderly and respectable city of Deurckheim would
justly merit to be compared to the huts of those
countries of which they speak in the distant land of
America, that hath so much, of late, given cause to
writings and conversation. We need, therefore,
look to the example set; for we have busy enemies,
who make the most of the smallest indulgences. At
another time, I would gladly have drained
Heidelburg
to your gracious honor.
Thou wouldest not have been in danger of
observation
here; and, by the three holy Kings of
Koeln, I should know how to tutor any prying knave
that might chance to thrust a curious eye within
these walls! But thy discretion is worthy of thy
prudence, Heinrich; for, with thee, I deem the time
serious for all lovers of established order, and of the
peace of mankind. What would the knaves, that
they thus trouble thy authority? Are they not fed
and clad? and do they not now possess privileges
out of number? The greedy rogues, if left to their
humors, would fain envy their betters each delicate
morsel they carry to their mouths, or each drop of
generous rhenish that moistens their lips!
I fear, well-born Emich, that this spirit of
covetousness
is in their vile natures! I have rarely
consented
to any little yielding to their entreaties, such
as a wish to swell out the time of their
merry-makings
,
or a desire like this of the market-place,
that the taste of the indulgence hath not given a
relish for fuller fare. No; he that would govern
quietly, and at his own ease, must govern thoroughly;
else shall we all become illiterate savages, fitter for
the forests of these Indies, than for our present
rational
and charitable civilization.
Braver words were never uttered in thy
council-hall
,
and well do I know the head that conceived
them! Had there been occasion to have summoned
thee hither for the banquet, the excuse should have
satisfied, though the vineyards were the forfeiture.
But what didst think, friend Heinrich, of the priests
to-day, and of their warlike company!
'Tis plain Duke Friedrich still upholds them;
and to deal frankly with my lord the Count, the
men-at-arms
have the air of fellows that are not likely to
yield the hill without fair contention.
Thinkest thou thus, Burgomaster? 'Twere a
thousand pities that men of tried mettle should do
each other harm, for the benefits and pleasure of a
community of shaven Benedictines! What is there
to urge in favor of pretensions so audacious as
these they prefer, and which are so offensive, both
to me, as a noble of the empire, and to all of any
note or possessions in Deurckheim?
They lay great stress, Herr Count, on the virtue
of ancient usages, and on the sacred origin of their
mission.
As much respect as thou wilt for rights that are
sealed by time, for such is the stamp that gives value
to my own fair claims; and many of thy city
privileges
come chiefly of use. But the matter between
us is of abuse; and I hold it to be unworthy of those
who can right themselves, to submit to wrong. Do
the monks still press the town for dues?
With offensive importunity. If matters be not
quickly stayed, we shall come to open and indecent
dissension.
I would give a winter's enjoyment of my chases,
were Friedrich more sorely pressed! exclaimed the
Count, laying his hand again on the Burgomaster's
knee, whose countenance he studied with a
significance
that was not lost on his companion. I speak
merely in the manner of his being driven to know
his true and fast friends from those who are false.
Heinrich Frey remained silent.
The Elector is a mild and loving prince, but one
sorely ridden by Rome! I fear we shall never have
a tranquil neighborhood, notwithstanding our long
forbearance, until the Church is persuaded to limit
its authority to its duties.
The eyelids of the Burgomaster lowered, as it
might be in reflection.
And chiefly, Heinrich, am I troubled lest my
good and loving Deurckheimers lose this occasion
to do themselves right, continued the Count,
squeezing
the knee he still grasped, until even the
compact
citizen flinched with the force of the pressure.
What say they in the council-hall touching this
matter?
There was no longer any plausible apology for
the silence of the Burgomaster, who did not
answer
,
however, without working the heavy muscles
of his face, as if delivered of his opinions with pain.
Men speak their minds among us, noble-born
Count, much as Duke Friedrich prospers, or fails, in
his warfare. When we hear good tidings from the
other side of the river, the brotherhood fares but
badly in our discourses; but when the Elector's
warriors
triumph, we hold it prudent to remember they
have friends.
God's truth! Herr Heinrich, it is full time that
you come to certain conclusions, else shall we be
saddled to the end of our days by these hard-riding
priests! Art thou not wearied with all their greedy
exactions, that thou waitest patiently for more?
In that particular, a little sufficeth for our humors.
There is not a city between Constance and Leyden,
that is more quickly satisfied with paying than our
Deurckheim: but we are husbands and fathers, Herr
Count, and men that bear a heavy burthen of
authority
;
and we must be wary, lest in throwing
aside one portion of the load, space be found on
our shoulders to place another that is heavier.
When I would speak of your strong love to the
town, there are distrustful tongues, that question me
sorely of its fruits, and of your own honorable
intentions
in our behalf.
To all of which thou couldest not be wanting
of replies! Have I not often entertained thee with
my loving wishes in behalf of the citizens?
If wishes in our behalf could serve our interests,
the townsmen might, in their proper right, put in a
claim to high favor. In the way of longing for
our own success, Antwerp itself is not our better.
Nay, thou takest my meaning unkindly: what
Emich of Hartenburg wishes for his friends, he finds
means to perform. But we will not trouble digestion,
as we are about to feed, with these tiresome details
I pray you, Herr Count, not to doubt my means;
little troubles me, when
Thou shalt yield to my humor. What! is not
the Count of Leiningen master in his own castle. Not
a word more will I hear till thou hast tasted of my
poor hospitality. Did my knaves serve thee, as I
commanded yesterday, with the fat buck that fell
by my own hand, Heinrich?
A thousand thanks, mein Herrthey did, and
right cheerfully. I gave the rogues a silver penny for
their largess; and the dust of the Jaegerthal was
washed away in heavy draughts of our wine of the
plain.
I would have it so; between friends, there should
be no niggardly reserve, in the way of courtesies,
said Emich, rising. Dost not bethink thee,
Burgomaster
,
of looking among the youths of
Deurckheim
for a son to stay thy age? Meta hath reached
the years when maidens gladly become wives.
The wench is not ignorant of her time of life,
and the search of a suitable husband hath not failed
to give me fatherly concern. I do not presume to
compare our conditions and early lives in aught
that is disrespectful, mein Herr Graf; but, touching
all that is common to great and little, the youth of
this day seem not as they were in the time of our
young manhood.
Priest-ridden, Burgomaster;too much of Rome
in our laws and habits. God's my life! when I first
mounted steed, in the court below, I could have
leaped the convent towers, did a Benedictine dare
gainsay the feat!
That would have been a miracle little short of
the raising of their convent walls, answered
Heinrich
,
laughing at his companion's flight, and rising
in deference to the attitude the noble had been
pleased to take. These Benedictines have been
careless of their advantages, else might they still
have kept the circumstance of that miracle as much
beyond dispute, as it was in our young days, Lord
Count.
And what say they in Deurckheim, now,
touching
the affair?
Nay, men treat it, at present, as they treat other
disputable subjects. Since this outcry of Brother
Luther, there have appeared many who call in
question
not only that, but divers others of the Abbey's
feats.
Vol. I. R
The Count unconsciously crossed himself, seeming
to ponder gloomily on the subject, within his own
mind. Then glancing towards his companion, he
perceived that he was standing.
I cry thy mercy, worthy Burgomaster; but my
inattention hath given thee this pain. My leg hath
been so much of late suspended in the stirrup, that
it hath need of straightening; but it should not, in
justice
,
cause thee this inconvenience. I pray thee,
Herr Frey, be seated.
That would ill become my station in your
presence, noble and well-born Emich; nor would it
do fit credit to my reverence and affection.
Nay, I will hear none of this. Thy seat, Master
Heinrich, and that without delay, lest I seem to
overlook thy merits.
I pray mein Herr Graf not to do himself this
wrong; nay, if it be your honorable willI blush at
mine own daringif I consent, I call my lord to
witness 'tis only in profound respect for his will!
During this struggle of courtesy, the Count
succeeded
,
by means of gentle violence, in forcing the
Burgomaster to resume his seat. Heinrich had
yielded with a species of maiden coyness; but when
he found that, instead of occupying his own humble
stool, he had unwittingly been forced into the
arm-chair
of the noble, he rebounded from the cushion,
as if the leather contained enough of the electric
fluid to bid defiance to the nonconductor qualities
of the ample woollen garment in which his nether
person was cased.
Gott bewahre! exclaimed the Burgomaster, in
harsh, energetic German: The empire would cry
out against this scandal, were it known! I owe it to
my reputation to deny myself an honor so little
deserved.
And I to my authority to enforce my will, and to
proclaim thy deserts.
Here the amiable force on the part of the Count,
and the courteous coquetry of Heinrich Frey, were
resumed, until the latter, fearful of offending by
longer resistance, was obliged to submit, protesting,
however, to the last, against the apparent
presumption
on his own part, and against the great
injustice
which the lord of the hold was doing to his
own rights, by thus insisting.
A distinguished foreign orator once pronounced
the titles of honor, and the social distinctions that
are conferred by the European governments, to be
the cheap defence of nations. This opinion
strikes us to be merely one of the thousand bold
fallacies that have been broached to uphold existing
interests, without reference to their true effects, or
to their inherent justice. This cheap defence,
like the immortal Falstaff, who was not only witty
himself, but the cause of wit in others, is the origin
of a hundred sufficiently costly habits, that leave
him who bears the burthen but little reason to exult
in its discovery. We recommend to all one-eyed
economists, who still retain any faith in this
well-known
opinion of the English orator, to read that
letter in the Spectator, in which a city youth relates
the manner he is driven to vindicate his own reserve
to his fair country cousins, who would fain reproach
him with an ungraceful disrespect of his holiday
privileges, by reminding them of the calculations of
the individual who refused to indulge in
cheese-cakes
,
because they brought with them so many
other unnecessary expenditures.
But whether honors of the description just alluded
to, do or do not form any portion of the economy
of a nation, there is little question but flattery, like
this which Emich has just bestowed on the
Burgomaster
,
is one of the subtle and most powerful agents
of the great in effecting their secret purposes. Few
are theyalas, how few!that possess a vision
sufficiently clear, and an ambition so truly noble, as
to look beyond the narrow and vulgar barriers of
human selfishness, and to regard truth as it came
from God, without respect for persons and things,
except as they are the instruments of his will. It
is certain that Heinrich Frey had little pretension
to be one of this scrutinizing and elevated class; for
when he found himself fairly seated in the chair of
the Count of Hartenburg, with the noble himself
standing, his sensations were like those which are
felt by the philosopher of the other hemisphere, who
is authorized to put a ribbon at his button-hole;
or the tradesman of this, who is elected to the
common-council of his native city, after being run
on both tickets. Still he greatly regretted there
was no one to envy his preferment; for, after the
first soothing effect on his own self-love, that unquiet
spirit which haunts us to the last, disfiguring the
fairest pictures, and casting its alloy into every scheme
of happiness, suggested that his triumph would be
imperfect without a witness. Just as this rebellious
feeling became troublesome, there appeared at the
door of the closet, the very being of all others that
the Burgomaster would have chosen to see him in
the enjoyment of this high honor. A gentle tap
announced the presence of the intruder, and when
the authoritative voice of Emich had given the
permission, the mild Ulrike appeared on the
threshold
.
Surprise was strongly painted on the features of
the Burgomaster's wife. The husband had crossed
his legs, and was indulging in his ease, with a sort
of noble indifference to the unusual situation in
which he was placed, when this extraordinary sight
greeted the eyes of his amazed consort. So absolute
and so tenacious were the rules of Germany on all
things that concerned the respect due to rank, that
even one as little troubled by ambition as the meek
Ulrike, had great difficulty in believing her senses,
when she beheld Heinrich Frey thus suddenly
elevated
to a seat of honor in the presence of a Count
of Leiningen.
Nay, enter without fear, my good Ulrike, said
Emich, graciously; thy worthy husband and I do
but indulge in mutual friendship, while my varlets
prepare an unworthy banquet. Do not think to
break our discourse.
I only hesitate, noble Emich, at seeing Heinrich
Frey preferred to that seat, while the Lord of
Hartenburg
stands, like one of humble birth, at his
side!
Touch not the matter, meine Frau, said the
husband condescendingly. Thou art a loving
consort
,
and art well enough amid thy sex, and in
questions
that belong to thy breeding; but in an affair,
like this, between mein Herr Graf and me, thou
mayest only mar what thou canst not mend.
By the life of the princely Karl! master
Heinrich
,
you do insufficient justice to Ulrike's
discernment
!
Were mine own Ermengarde among us,
thou shouldst see that we prize thy loving wife little
less than we esteem thee. But it were better that
we inquire of Ulrike the occasion of her visit,
before we attempt to school her on matters of
deportment
.
Though so rough and unnurtured on many of the
points that are now deemed essential even to an
indifferent civilization, Emich had a quick interest
for the perception of character, and possessed as
much of the refinement that marks a superior
condition
in life, as the state of the age and the situation
of his own country permitted. There can be no
greater mistake than to imagine that mere nominal
rank is any pledge for a correspondent degree of
refinement, since every thing is relative in this world,
and where the base of the pillar is rude and little
R 2
polished, it would be a violation of all architectural
keeping, to expect a capital of a different style.
Thus it is that we, without any social orders but
those of convention, are struck with so many
glaring
discrepancies among people whose patricians,
having studied all that is factitious and plausible in
breeding, are still deficient in the grand essentials of
reason and humanity, simply because the roots of
the society, of which they are only the more
luxuriant
branches, are planted in the soil of ignorance
and debasement. The Count of Hartenburg had
possessed ample opportunities of witnessing how
much the intellectual qualities of the Burgomaster's
wife were superior to those of her husband; and he
had sufficient discrimination and experience to be
quite aware of the importance of conciliating such
an ally in advancing his own particular views. It
was in this spirit, therefore, that he ventured on so
blunt a reproof of Heinrich's superciliousness, and
volunteered the compliment to the spouse; probably
hazarding the latter, from an intimate conviction
that most husbands are content to hear eulogies on
those who are so completely in their power as their
own wives.
Since it is your honorable pleasure, Herr Count,
for God's sake let the woman come in, answered
Heinrich, still, however, without changing an attitude
so soothing to his self-esteem. If she should see
me seated in a presence in which it would much
better
become me to kneel, why it may help to show
that God hath given her a companion that is not
altogether without the world's esteem, little as he
may merit it. Enter freely, therefore, good Ulrike,
since it is my lord's pleasure; but presume not on
his condescension to me, which is rather a mark of
great love for our town, than any matter connected
with domestic life.
In all that the high-born Count hath done honor
to any of us, whether as of Deurckheim, or as his
unworthy neighbors, I desire respectfully to be
grateful, returned the wife, who, by this time, had
recovered from her surprise, and who now advanced
farther into the narrow room, with the modest
self-possession
which ordinarily distinguished her
manner
:If
I do not come amiss, I crave to be heard
of both, in a matter that toucheth nearly a mother's
heart; and a matter, as it is of Heinrich Frey's
child I would fain speak, that I trust may not be
indifferent
to my lord the Count.
Were it of mine own little Kunigunde, the
subject
should not be more welcome! said the noble.
Speak freely then, gentle Ulrike, and with the same
simplicity thou wouldest use were it only to thy
husband's ear.
Thou hearest, woman! mein Herr Graf enters,
as it were, into all our tribulations and happiness,
an' he were no other than a brother. So mince not
the matter, but deal frankly with us; though I
admonish
thee not to push thy words to all the
familiarity
of household discourse.
As it is of a subject so near, I pray leave to close
the door, before more is uttered.
The words of Ulrike were cut short by a hasty
gesture of approbation from her husband, and by
the Count himself, who, with more of the
consideration
and manner of a gentleman, performed the
desired
office with his own hands, thus admitting the
wife, as it were, into the very cabinet of their secret
councils.
CHAPTER XII.
You would be another Penelope: yet they
Say, all the yarn she spun, in Ulysses' absence, did
But fill Ithaca full of moths.
Coriolanus
.
When
Ulrike found herself fairly closeted with
the Count and her husband, and was quietly seated
on the stool which the former, spite of the latter's
protestations to the contrary, had insisted on her
taking, she cast her mild eyes about her, with that
expressive and touching appeal that a woman is apt
to make, when she feels called on to act as the
adviser
,
if not the guardian, of him whom nature
intended
and the law presumes, is both able and
willing
to discharge those offices for her.
Notwithstanding
Heinrich's obstinacy and masculine swaggering,
many occasions had arrived, in the course of their
matrimonial life, to produce a latent conviction in
both, that the order of things was a little inverted,
as respects judgment and moral authority, by
inclining
one to lean, though with but an indifferent grace,
where he should have supported; and tempting the
other, at times, to overstep her sex's duties, though
it was always done with an intuitive perception of
her sex's seemliness and means.
For this condescension I thank my Lord Emich,
and thee, Heinrich, commenced the thoughtful
matron
;
for it is not, at all times, advisable for the
wife to intrude unbidden even to her husband's
presence.
A significant ejaculation, which might almost
merit a coarser term, was the manner in which the
Burgomaster expressed his assent, during the brief
pause that succeeded this excuse of Ulrike. The
more courteous host bowed with sufficient respect,
though, even by his manner, it was evident he was
getting impatient to know the real motive of the
interruption
.
We are too well pleased to receive thee, to
remember
the usages and rights of manhood,
answered
the latter, with a kindness of manner that
was insensibly extorted by the winning and feminine
qualities of her he addressed, and which, in some
degree, softened the pretensions of his language
Proceed with thy matter, for none can be more
ready to listen.
Thou hearest, good Ulrike! the Herr Count is
willing to remember thou art a Burgomaster's
consort
;
and, as he is pleased to say, we are truly
impatient
to be let into the cause of thy sudden visit.
The thoughtful Ulrike received this
encouragement
like one accustomed to be treated, in some
measure, as a being inferior in capacity and force
to her husband, but not without a shade like that
which is produced by unmerited humiliation.
Smiling
and
few, even in early and attractive youth,
had so sweet an expression, when her countenance
thus gleamed, whether it were in pleasure, or in
melancholysmiling, as it might be, partly in female
gentleness, and partly in sadness, she commenced
the purport of her visit, coming, however, to her
true object with great reserve and with the caution
of a woman accustomed to influence, rather than to
control.
For the great kindness and condescension of the
Herr Emich, in behalf of Heinrich Frey, and of all
that are his, no one is more grateful than I, she
said; if I may now seem to trouble him with the
concerns of a family on which he has already so
freely lavished favors
And friendship, good Ulrike.
And friendship, since you permit me, noble
Count, to use the wordbut, if I now seem to
trespass
beyond breeding, by troubling your mind with
a concern that is so remote from your own interests,
I trust you will remember a mother's tenderness,
and think of the highborn Ermengarde, whose
anxiety
for her own offspring may furnish some excuse
for that I feel for mine.
Hath aught befell the blooming Meta?
God's my life! exclaimed the troubled
Heinrich
,
abandoning his much-prized seat, in the
suddenness
of paternal alarm. Hath the wench
suffered
from the over-rich eels of the Rhine? or is
she massed to death by these accursed monks?
Our child is well in the body, and, the blessed
Maria be praised! she is pure and innocent in mind,
returned Ulrike. I have little cause for aught but
gratitude in either of these behalfs;but, she is of
an age when girlish fancies become unsettled, and
the flexible female spirit seeks impressions from
others than those whom nature hath made its
guardians
.
This is some of thy usual incomprehensibilities,
good woman, and language that is not easily
understood
by any but thyself. The noble Graf hath no
leisure to hunt up new ideas to maintain a discourse
in subtleties. Had the girl indeed tasted too freely
of the rare dish which the honest Burgomaster of
Mannheim so kindly sent me, as I at first feared, no
doubt the means to cure might be found in
Hartenburg
;
but thou askest too much, wife of mine, when
thou wouldest have any but thine own husband enter
into all the cunning niceties that sometimes beset thy
imagination.
Nay, Master Heinrich, here may be more
urgent
matter than thou thinkest; thy dame is not a
woman whose opinions are to be neglected. Wilt
proceed with thy recital, good Ulrike?
Our child is at that period of life, continued the
mother, too much accustomed to the manner of her
husband to permit it to divert her thoughts from
their main intentionwhen the young of every
sort begin to think of the future. It is a principle
that God hath implanted, Herr Emich, and therefore
it is for good; and we, who have watched over the
infancy of our offspring with so much anxiety, have
trained their youth with so much care, and have so
often trembled for their noon-time, must, sooner or
later, consent to loosen the sweet ties that bind us
to our second selves, in order that the great ends of
the creation shall be accomplished.
Umph! ejaculated Heinrich.
Nay, gentle Ulrike, said the Count, maternal
love hath drawn this picture in stronger colors than
may be necessary. When the time for matrimony
comes, God's my life! daughter of thine and honest
Heinrich Frey, need not wear maiden's coif a day
longer than is necessary to do suitable reverence to
the church. Here have I youths, out of number,
that look to the house of Leiningen for grace, any
one of whom would be glad to wive with the
damsel
I should name. There is young Friedrich
Zantzinger
,
the orphan of my last deputy in the villages
of the plain; he is a lad that would gladly do harder
service to gain my love.
When old Friedrich left the boy fatherless, he
left him without a penny, drily rejoined the
Burgomaster
.
That is a fault which might be mended; but I
have others that can be named. What thinkest thou
of the eldest son of my Heidelburg attorney, worthy
Conrad Walther?
Curse the knave! I hate him from my heart.
Thou art warm, Master Heinrich, against one
that I both trust and favor.
I cry your mercy, Herr Graf; but a sudden
rising of the bile, at the mention of the fellow's name,
got the better of respect, answered the
Burgomaster
,
with more moderation, who, as he saw by the
lowering look of Emich's brow, the necessity of
explanation, continued, with rather more openness
than he might have thought necessary under
circumstances
of less urgency: Perhaps the high-bron
Count was never possessed of the matter of our late
controversy?
Nay, I pretend not to judge my friends,
Let but my lord condescend to hear me, and I
leave him arbiter between us. It is well known to
you, Herr Emich, that collections were made, and
charity asked, in behalf of the peasants who suffered,
the past year, from the sudden rising of the Rhine.
Among others, the good Christians of our town were
importuned for succor; and, for none will deny
that it was a sad visitation of Providence, we gave
freely as became our several means. To prevent
improper uses of money, in all cases of liberal
donations, the sealed bond of the donor, at a near
day, was asked in preference to the silver; and mine
was granted for the fair sum of twelve crowns, as
a poor donation suited to my hopes and station. It
so fell out, Herr Graf, that those charged with the
distribution had occasion for their money before the
instruments were up; and they sent agents among
us, in order to enter into such negotiations as the
cases might need. Gold was scarce at the moment;
and because, in regaining my bond, I had a heedful
regard to mine own interests, the misdealing Conrad
would fain transport me, like a thief, before the
authorities
of Heidelburg, to undergo the penalties of
a usurer. Son of his shall never call me father,
with your gracious leave, nobly-born Count of
Leiningen
!
This truly offereth some impediment to the
affair; but, failing of young Conrad, I have others
that may be accounted worthy of this advantage.
So put thy maternal heart at ease, good Ulrike, and
trust to my active friendship to dispose of the girl.
The Burgomaster's consort had been a patient
listener during the short but characteristic digression
of her husband. Trained in the opinions of the
times, she did not possibly endure all that a mother
and a wife, of equal native sensibility, might now
suffer at so evident a debasement of her sex; but as
the laws of nature are permanent, neither did she
escape a pang of wounded feeling as she heard the
different expedients that were so hastily devised for
the future disposal of one who formed her chief
happiness
in life. There was less of that hectic color,
which commonly gave a lustre to eyes that were
by nature rather melancholy than bright, and her
voice was fuller of emotion than before, as she
continued
.
For all this heed of me and mine, I again thank
the Herr Count; but there is a power that is stronger
with the young than the counsel of the experienced,
or even than the wishes of their friends, she said.
My intent, in intruding myself unbidden into this
secret conference, was to say that Meta had listened
to the voice of her sympathies more than to the
usages of her class, and chosen for herself.
The Count and Heinrich Frey stared at the speaker
in mute surprise, for neither fully comprehended her
meaning; while Ulrike herself, one of her objects
being
accomplished, in having made this long-dreaded
declaration in the presence of a person able to
repress
the anger of her husband, sate silent, inwardly
trembling for the consequences.
Wilt thou explain the meaning of thy worthy
consort, Herr Heinrich? abruptly asked the Count.
Zum Henker! you ask me to perform an office,
Lord Count, that might better fit a Benedictine, or
a clerk. When Ulrike, who is an excellent and
obedient companion in the main, once gets upon the
stilts of fancy, I never pretend to be able to raise
an idea to the level of her shoe-buckle. Go to! thou
Vol. I. S
hast well spoken, wife of mine; and it will now be
better to seek our child, lest yonder cavalier of
Rhodes be oiling her ears with the unction of
flattery
.
Nay, by my house's honors! but I will know
more of this matter, thy fair and virtuous consort
consenting, Master Heinrich. Wilt explain thyself
freely, dame?
Whether it be from the instinct of weakness and
delicacy, or only the fruit of precepts constantly
inculcated, a virtuous woman rarely admits the
existence
of the sentiment of love, either in herself or
in any that is dear to her, without a feeling of shame,
and possibly not without an intuitive knowledge
that she is conceding some of the vantage-ground
of her sex's privileges.
This feeling was apparent in Ulrike, by the slow
but complete suffusion of her cheek, and by the
manner
in which her looks avoided those of Emich, spite
of the self-possession and calm of her years.
I would merely say, Herr Emich, she replied,
that Meta, like all who are young and innocent,
hath fancied an image of perfection, and that she
hath found an original for her picture in a youth of
the Jaegerthal. While of this mind, she cannot, in
honesty or in maidenly respect, become the bride
of any other than him she loves.
The affair grows clearer, returned the Count,
smiling like one who took no very deep interest in
the matter; and it is as well explained as heart
could wishat least, heart of the youth in question.
What thinkest thou of this, Herr Burgomaster?
The comprehension of Heinrich Frey could not
altogether misconceive so plain an explanation, and,
since the moment when his wife had ceased speaking,
he sat regarding her mild but troubled countenance,
with parted lips and open eyes, like a man that first
learns some unlooked-for intelligence of great
moment
.
Herr Teufel! exclaimed Heinrich, taking up
the last words of the Baron, unconscious of the
disrespect of what he didArt talking of our own
natural-born child?
Of none other. In whom else have I this
motherly
affection?or for what other can I feel this deep
concern?
Dost mean that Metamy daughter, Meta
Freyhath inclination for son of woman, except it
may be the natural love and reverence she beareth
her own father?that the girl hath truant and free
fancies?
I say nothing to give this opinion of Metamy
daughter, Meta, returned Ulrike, with womanly
dignity. Our child has done no more than listened
to the secret whisperings of nature; and, in yielding
her affections to a youth whom she hath often seen,
and long known, she hath merely paid an homage
to merit, that the most virtuous are the most apt to
yield.
Go to, Ulrike! Thou art well enough among
thy household, and a woman for whom I have
esteem
;
but these visions with which thou art so often
troubled, give thee an air, at times, of being of less
discernment than thou mayest fairly claim to be.
Excuse the dame, Herr Count; for, though her own
husband, and a little weak on the subject of her
infirmities
perhaps, there is not a more thrifty manager,
a more faithful spouse, or a kinder mother in the
Palatinate.
Nay, thou little need say this to me! None
know the worth of Ulrike better; and, I may add,
few respect her so much. It were well to hear
further of this matter, Heinrich; for, to treat thee in
candor, there may lay more beneath this opening
of the excellent wife, than is at first apparent.
Our Meta hath seen the qualities of some worthy
youth sooner than they have struck the eye of her
quick-sighted father, thou wouldst say. Is it not so,
dame?
I would say that the heart of my child is so
closely bound in that of another, as to leave little
hope of happiness, should her matrimonial duties
teach her to forget him.
Thou thinkest then, good dame, that the young
fancies of a female, when once indulged, are not to
be removed by the offices of wife and mother?
that a caprice of the imagination is stronger than a
vow made at the altar?
Though the eyes of both the Count and the
Burgomaster
were riveted on the fine and speaking
countenance
of Ulrike, the volume of eloquent nature,
that was thus opened to their observation, proved
little better than a blank. Strong and dramatic
exhibitions
of feeling require but little interpretation for
the dullest faculties; but few indeed are they who
are capable of comprehending the secret workings
of a spirit chastened and restrained as that of a
virtuous, but unhappily paired woman. There is,
perhaps, no one aspect of human nature more
common-place
,
or more easily understood, than that
which is hourly offered by a worldly-minded and
capricious fair. She runs her little career,
seemingly
as erratic as a comet, though, in truth, her course
is always to be calculated on the infallible principles
of vanity and selfishness; but no secret is more
hermetically
sealed against impertinent and vulgar
curiosity, than the elevated sentiments which sustain
the suffering and silent female who is truly instinct
with the high qualities of her sex.
We are no railer at the domination of man; for
we are persuaded that he who would wish to
transform
the being that was created to be his solacer
and companionhis guide in moral darkness, and
his sharer in sorrow as in joyinto a worldly
competitor
,
changing love and confidence to rivalry
and contention, is but miserably instructed in that
sublime ordinance of nature, which has thus
separated
the highest order of its creation into two great
classes, so replete with mutual consolation and
happiness
.
Had the wife of the Burgomaster arisen, and, in
chosen terms, made an appeal to the sympathies of
her companions, in which language should unite
with manner to produce an effect, she might have
been understood, as the every-day reader
understands
all such pictures of female character; but
where she sat, silent, suffering, and meek, she was
completely concealed from any means of
comprehension
possessed by either. Her eye did not
kindly, for long and patient subordination had taught
her to submit to the misconstructions of her husband;
nor scarcely did the faint color of her cheek
deepen, since the load at her heart counteracted
the natural impulses of pride and resentment.
I think, Lord Count, that when an innocent and
youthful female heart yields to a power that nature
perhaps has made irresistible, she said, it, at
least, merits to be treated tenderly. Meta hath
few fancies of the kind you mention; and the
attachment
she feels, though doubtless deepened by those
colors which the least experienced in the truths
of life are the most apt to paint, is but the natural
consequence of much association, and of great
deserving
on the part of the young man.
This is getting to be plain, Herr Emich, said
Heinrich Frey, pithily, and must needs be looked
to. Wilt condescend to name the youth thou meanest,
Ulrike?
Berchthold Hintermayer.
Berchthold Teufelstein! exclaimed the
Burgomaster
,
laughing, though there was something like
S 2
a secret consciousness of danger in the very manner
in which he gave loose to his merriment. A
penniless
boy is truly a fit husband for child of mine!
The quiet, blue eye of Ulrike was fastened on her
husband; but she averted it with sensitive haste,
lest it might betray that she was thinking of the time
when her own father had consented to her marriage
with one nearly as poor, merely because the
penetration
of the parent had discovered those qualities
of prudence and gainful industry in his townsman,
which after-experience so fully developed.
He is not rich, Heinrich, was her answer; but
he is worthy: and why need a chill be thrown on
the heart of Meta, for the desire of that which she
already hath in sufficient plenty?
Hear you this, Herr Emich? My wife is lifting
the curtain of privacy before your respected eyes,
with a freedom for which I could fain cry mercy.
Berchthold is a youth I love, gravely observed
the Count.
In that case, I shall say nothing disrespectful of
the lad, who is a worthy forester, and in all things
suited to his service in the family of Hartenburg;
still, he is but a forester, and a very penniless one.
I had not thought to dispose of the girl so soon, for
a little maidenly leisure does none of the sex injury,
Lord Count; but as she hath her head set upon this
Berchthold, it may be well to wrap it in a matron's
coif, by way of filling it with ideas more suited to
her hopes.
The remedy may prove fatal, Heinrich! mildly
observed Ulrike, raising her tearful eye to the
obstinate
features of the Burgomaster.
Nay, I ought to know the constitution of the
family; what has so well succeeded with the mother,
cannot harm the child.
The wife did not reply. But Emich of
Hartenburg
had been deeply interested by her gentle and
winning manner, for he had watched her
countenance
closely, and understood the womanly effort
by which the appearance of calm was preserved.
Turning to the Burgomaster, he laid a hand on his
shoulder, with a friendly smile, and said
Herr Heinrich, thou hast a fair and gentle
consort
;
but, I think, too, thou hast scarce less faith in
me than in thy wife. Give us leave; I would fain
reason this matter with Ulrike, without the aid of
thy influence.
A thousand thanks for the honor to me and mine,
high-born Count! As to faith, I would leave the
dame a year on Limburg-hill, without other thought
than for her convenience; for none know the worth
of Ulrike better, though she is so difficult to
comprehend
when her fancy is moulting. Now kiss me,
dame, and prithee do no dishonor to the Count's
counsel.
Thus saying, Heinrich Frey placed a hearty kiss
on the soft cheek that the obedient Ulrike freely
offered, and left his wife alone with the noble, without
other thought than of the high distinction that was
conferred on his name. The manner in which he
prized the notice of the Baron was sufficiently
manifested
by the readiness with which he communicated
the circumstance that Emich and his consort were
closeted, on an affair touching the interests of the
family of Frey, to all who would listen to his tale.
CHAPTER XIII.
Ah me! for aught that ever I could read,
Could ever hear by tales or history,
The course of true love never did run smooth!
Shakspeare
.
When
the door was closed on the husband, the
Count turned to the wife, and continued the
discourse
.
I love young Berchthold Hintermayer, good
Ulrike, he said, and would gladly be of aid in
this affair, which, I see plainly, thou hast much at
heart.
The mother would be unnatural that had not
anxiety for the happiness of her child. In youth,
Lord Count, we gaze before us, filling the dim ascent
with scenes drawn after our wishes, and peopling
the world with the beings that we deem most
necessary
to our hopes; but when we have reached the
eminence, whence the commencement and the end
of life can both be plainly seen, do we first find
truth. I am as little disposed as another to venture
rashly on a union that has no better security for its
fruits than a blind and feverish passion, that will be
certain to consume itself by its own fierceness; but,
on the other hand, none who have known life as I,
can be disposed to consider lightly those
resemblances
of taste and opinions, those gentle touches
of character and disposition, that are most likely to
conduce to wedded love.
Thou art esteemed lucky in thine own
consorting
,
dame?
God hath much blessed me in many mercies
the question is of Meta, my Lord Count.
Ulrike, spite of herself, had changed color; but,
aided by the manner of matronly reserve she
immediately
assumed, the little emotion passed with
Emich as no more than a display of feminine reserve,
that was intended to repress a curiosity he had no
title to indulge.
The question is of Meta, is sooth, he answered;
and, by Saint Benedict! the youth shall not want
for friendly and free support. But favor should have
favor's reward. If I give into thy humor in this
concern of thy daughter's marriage, good Ulrike,
in return, I expect of thee a service on which I
scarce lay less stress.
The matron raised her eyes to the countenance
of her companion, in surprise. One who had not so
uniformly preserved her own self-respect, might
have doubted of what she heard; but the look of
the Burgomaster's wife merely conveyed a meaning
of curiosity and innocence.
You will deserve far more than I can bestow,
Herr Count, should you do aught to secure the
happiness
of Meta.
Fair wife, continued Emich, seating himself,
and taking her hand, with the freedom which his
superior rank and the usages of the country allowed,
thou knowest the manner in which these
Benedictines
have so long vexed our valley; and, being so
deeply in the confidence of the honest Heinrich, thou
must have suspected that, wearied of their insolence
and exactions, we have seriously bethought us of
the means by which to reduce them to the modesty
that becometh their godly professions, and which
might better justify their pretensions?
Emich paused, and sat intently regarding the face
of his quiet listener. He had unwittingly touched
upon the very subject that had been the chief
inducement
with the Burgomaster's wife for intruding
upon the privacy of the conspirators. She had long
suspected their intentions; and, though she felt deep
care for the future lot of Meta, and had gladly
availed herself of a favorable occasion to break
the ice on a subject that, sooner or later, must be
disclosed, her real object was to warn Heinrich
against the probable consequences of the plot. In
this disposition, then, she heard the Count with
secret
pleasure, and prepared herself to reply, in the
manner she had long meditated.
All that you say, Herr Count, she answered,
has more than once crossed my mind; and deeply
have I grieved that those I so love and honor should
thus meditate injury to the altars of Godplan
desperate
devices to interrupt his praise.
How! dost thou call the whinings of these knaves
praise of aught but their own hypocrisy?
interrupted
Emich. Are they not the instigators of most
of our sins, by their example?the parents of all
the contention that troubles the neighborhood?
Consider, good Ulrike, that heaven is not a close
into which souls are to be driven blindfolded; but
that we, who are of the flock, have at least the
right, as we have the means, of judging whether
the shepherds are fit for their office, or not.
And should they prove unequal to, or unworthy
of their duties, where do we find authority to do
them harm?
God's my life! good wife; are our swords
nothing? Are a noble name, an ancient and high
descent, a long-standing claim to command, and a
stout heart, nothing?
Arrayed against the Almighty, they count as
the leaves of your own forest, when fluttering in a
gale;less than the flakes of snow that drive, in
winter, against the battlements of your strong castle.
Limburg is reared in honor of God; and he that
raises a hand against the sacred walls, will be apt to
repent the rashness in woe. If there are unworthy
ministers at its altars, there are also those that are
worthy; and, were it not so, the mission is too high
to be sullied by any frailty of those who abuse their
trusts.
The Count was disturbed; for Ulrike spoke
earnestly
,
and in a voice of sweet persuasion. He leaned
his chin upon a hand, as a man that pondered well
on the hazards of his enterprise.
What thinkest thou, Ulrike, of this brother of
Wittenberg he at length asked. Could we but
fairly make him out honest and wise, ecclesiastical
authority for lowering the pride of Limburg might
be had!
I am one of those who think Brother Luther
honest; I am also one of those who think him
mistaken
:
but even he is far from urging to deeds of
violence.
By Saint Benedict! woman, thou hast had
converse
with Father Arnolph, touching this question.
Echo does not answer sound more faithfully than
thou repeatest the sentiments of the Prior.
It is not strange that they who love God should
feel and speak alike in a matter affecting his honor.
I have said naught to Father Arnolph, nor to any
other of the Abbey, of your designs; for it is not
easy for Ulrike Frey to forget she is both wife and
mother. But I have prayed often, that the hearts of
those who contemplate this dangerous sacrilege
may be softened; and that, for their own safety,
they may yet see the evil of their plot. Believe me,
Count, the Dread Being who is worshipped in
Limburg
,
will not forget to avenge himself of those who
despise his power!
Thou art certain, Ulrike, that thy opinions have
weight with me, for since childhood have I known
and respected thy wisdom. Nay, had there not
been want of those claims which birth can alone
give, thou wouldst now be sitting in this castle its
mistress, and not a guest. The self-denial which
was practised, in order to do my father pleasure,
cost me much pain for many years; nor did I rightly
regain my freedom, until the birth of my eldest
born turned my hopes towards posterity.
It is seldom woman hears the acknowledgment
of her influence with the stronger sex, without
secret satisfaction. As there had been nothing in
the attachment to which the Count alluded, to alarm
her principles or to offend her delicacy, Ulrike
listened to this reference to the feelings and incidents
of their younger days, with a smile that produced
an effect on her gentle features, which resembled the
melancholy light which illuminated the chapel of
the religious community in question; or which was
mild, placid, and, if we may be permitted an
expression
so vague, tinged with hues of the past.
We are no longer young, Emich, she answered,
withdrawing her hand, under a keen impulse of its
proprietyand that which thou speakest belongs
to a former age. But if thou dost, in sooth,
entertain
this opinion of my discretion, I have never
said aught of thee but in thy honor. There were
other reasons than the late Count's will, why I could
not listen to thy suit, as thou wert then informed;
for we are none of us the controllers of those
sentiments
which so much depend on taste or accident.
By the sainted eleven thousand of Koeln!
Heinrich
Frey was scarce a youth to do this
disadvantage
to the heir of my line and name!
Heinrich Frey received my troth, as the noble
Ermengarde received thine, Herr von Hartenburg,
answered Ulrike, with the composure of one whose
feelings had never been interested in the refusal to
which she alluded, and with the dignity of a woman
sensitively alive to her husband's character. By
Heaven's favor, we are both happier than if wedded
either above or beneath our hopes. But if thou
couldst deny thyself this boonfor such, in thy
young fancies, didst thou believe my handto
oblige thy father of earth, wilt thou still defy him
of Heaven, to gratify a longing less excusable?
Go to, Ulrike; thou pressest me out of reason;
I know not fairly that I even meditate the enterprise
thou meanest.
Or, in other language, thou art not yet decided
to commit the sacrilege. Before thy hand strikes
the irretrievable blow, Herr Count, hear one that, in
thy youth, thou professed to love, and who yet
remembers
thy preference, with grateful kindness.
Thou art more indulgent as a matron than as a
maid! This is the first word of pity for all the
sorrow thou causedst my youth, that hath ever
escaped
thee!
Pity is a term it would ill become Ulrike
Haitzinger
to use to Emich von Leiningen. I said
gratitude
,
Herr Count; for the woman that pretendeth
not to feel this sentiment towards the honorable
youth that has preferred her to all others of her
sex, payeth an indifferent compliment to her own
heart. I never disavowed that thy suit gave me
both gratification and sorrowgratification, that
one of thy hopes could find sufficient in me to
justify
thy choice; sorrow, that thou wert necessarily
disappointed.
And had our births been nearer an equality,
gentle Ulrike, hadst thou, like me, come of noble
parentage, or I, like thee, been of more humble
origin, couldst thou, in sooth, have found, in thy
heart, the excuse for a different answer?
We are here to discuss other matters, Herr von
Hartenburg, than these recollections of childish
feelings.
God's my life! Callest thou the pain of
disappointed
affection a childish sorrow? Thou wert ever
tranquil in temper, and too much disposed to
indifference
on the subject of any warmth of heart,
beyond the cold duties of family regard.
Vol. I. T
This may be my fault, if you will, Count Emich,
but I esteem it an advantage to feel strongest where
duty most directs the affections.
I remember thy final answer, made through thy
friend young Berchthold's motherI owe the lad
no grace for the boon, were justice donebut thou
answered, that the daughter of a Burgomaster was
unfit to be the partner of a Baron; and thou prayedst
me to render all duty to the Count my father, that
his blessing might lighten the disappointment. Now,
were the truth known, that reply cost thee no more
than a simple refusal to one of thy maidens of some
trifling grace!
Were the truth known, Emich, it would tell a
different tale. Thou wert then young, and, though
violent and hot-headed, not without many manly
virtues; and thou greatly overratest the power of a
thoughtful girl, if thou supposest she would gladly
give pain, where she has received naught but
esteem
.
And had I been thy neighbor's childor wert
thou the daughter of some equal of the Empire?
In that case, Lord Count, the answer would have
been the same, said the other, firmly, though her
countenance evidently lost its tranquil brightness in
a transient cloud: The heart of Ulrike Haitzinger
spoke in that reply, as well as her prudence.
God's truth! thou art of cutting simplicity!
cried the Count, rising abruptly, and losing the
expression
of gentleness that the recollection of his
better days and youthful feelings had given his
features
,
in their usual hardened character. Thou
forgettest, Frau Frey, that I am a poor Count of
Leiningen!
If I have failed in meet respect, returned the
mild Ulrike, I am now reminded of the fault, and
will sin no more.
Nay, I would say naught unkind or ungentle
but thou bruised my spirit, with a sore answer. We
were conversing of the accursed monks, too, and
blood gets hot at the mention of their names. Thou
thinkest, then, my excellent neighbor, that, as
Christians
,
we are bound to submit to all the exactions
of these reverend knaves, and that to presume to
right ourselves, is flying in the face of Heaven's
authority?
You put the case in your own humor, Count.
I have said naught of abject forbearance, or of
unnecessary
submission. If the Limburg monks are
forgetful of their vows, the question is of their own
safety:as for us, we have to look that we do
nothing
wrongful of itself, or nothing that may be
accounted
disrespectful to Him we worship
Prithee, good Ulrike, interrupted Emich,
resuming
his seat, in the familiar manner he had used at
the commencement of the dialogue, let us converse,
in freedom, of this inclination of thy child. I love
young Berchthold, and would fain do him service,
were the means offering; but I greatly fear we
shall have difficulty in bringing Heinrich to a
complying
state of mind.
The apprehension of his refusal hath caused me
much uneasiness, Herr von Hartenburg, returned
the tender mother; for the Burgomaster is not one
of those who change their opinions readily. The
over-zealous persuasion of friends increases his faith
in himself, at times, instead of softening those
resolutions
which the wisest of us are apt to form hastily
and without thought.
This quality of thy excellent consort hath not
escaped me. But Heinrich Frey was wived so
happily
himself, and with so little claim to riches on his
own part, that he should not, in reason, bear too
heavily on a youth that might have known better
days, but for a hard fortune befalling his parents.
He that hath been poor, should have respect for
poverty in others.
I fear that such is not the working of human
nature, answered the thoughtful wife, nearly
unconscious
of what she uttered. Our experience
in life would prove that they who have risen show
the least tolerance for those who tarry in the rear;
and, as none prize the gifts of rank and consequence
so much as they to whom they are novelties, we
ought not to expect the successful man too soon to
forget the longings he felt when in adversity, nor
him to whom honors are new, to look too closely
into their vanity.
Nay, Heinrich is not so young in consideration,
or so new to fortune, as to be classed with these.
Heinrich! exclaimed the matron, across whose
chaste brow there stole a crimson suffusion, that
resembled the flush of even upon the snowy peaks
of the AlpsThere is not question, here, of
Heinrich
Frey!
The Count smiled till the mustachios curled upon
his brown cheeks.
Thou art right, he answered courteously; it
is in Berchthold and Meta that we are most
interested
.
I think I see the means of accomplishing
all we wish in their behalf, and means that offer so
readily as to wear the air of being a gift of
Providence
.
They are only the more welcome for their
character
.
Thou knowest, Ulrike, that I am greatly
burthened
with charges that lay heavily on all of my rank.
Ermengarde hath most of the qualities of her station,
and a love of splendor that is costly; besides, this
outfit of my young heir, who travels with the
Emperor
,
hath much drained me of means, of late;
else would I offer, of pure love for thee and thine,
that which would make the connexion acceptable to
Heinrich. In this strait, borne down, as we all are,
by the war, and saddled with the cost of keeping
on foot so many men in Hartenburg, I see no other
present means than that I have just mentioned.
Or have not mentioned; for, in the desire to
prove your inability to serve the youth, nothing hath
yet been said of this favorable chance offered by
Providence.
I cry thy mercy! Thou hast rightly judged me,
Ulrike, for I feel it a reproach to be able to do nothing
for one I so esteem.
Put no undue meaning on my words, interrupted
the matron, smiling like one who wished to reassure
her companion. It has never entered my thoughts
that the Counts of Leiningen are bound to portion
all who serve them, according to their several hopes.
It would lighten the heaviest purse in the Palatinate,
Herr Emich, to furnish an equal marriage-gift to
that which may be the share of Meta Frey.
None know this better than I. Heinrich and I
have often discoursed of the affair, and I could fain
wish there existed no inequality of rankbut this is
idle, and we will talk only of Berchthold and his
hopes. Thou are aware, Ulrike, that there are
heavy issues between me and the brotherhood
concerning
certain dues, not only in the valley, but on
the plain, and that the contest fairly settled in my
favor will much increase my revenues. Now were
this unhappy dissension decided as I could wish, it
would not only be in my power, but it would become
my wish, to bestow such grace on all my principal
followers, and on none so much as on Berchthold,
as might leave a favorable opinion of my bounty.
We want but this affair rightly settled to possess the
means of winning Heinrich to our desires.
Could this be honestly done, my blessing on him
that shall effect it!
I rejoice to hear thee say this, good Ulrike.
T 2
Thou, of all others, mayest be most useful in the
matter. Heinrich and I have well nigh decided on
the fitness of disturbing the monks in their riotous
abominations
The words are strong, when applied to
professed
Benedictines!
By the holy Magi! they are more than merited.
Here, has not the day twice turned since I had
Bonifacius
himself weltering in wine beneath the roof of
Hartenburg, an' he had been a roisterer of a
suburb
!
Bonifacius, Limburg's Abbot, have I seen in
this unfit condition, Frau Ulrike, within mine own
good castle walls!
And in thine own good castle company, Herr
Emich?
Dost thou make no difference between Baron
and Monk? Am I a sworn professor of godliness,
a shaven crown, or one that looketh to be accounted
better than his fellows? That I am noble is the
chance of fortune, and as such I receive and profit
by the advantage, though, I trust, always in fitting
reason; but no man can say that Emich of
Leiningen
pretends aught to the especial virtues of a
monkish character. We that are modest may claim
to indulge our failings, but justice should heavily
visit him that sins under a cloak of sanctity.
I know not that thy exception may avail thee in
the end. But thou wouldest say something to
Berchthold
Hintermayer's advantage?
That would I, and right heartily. Could
Heinrich
be brought to a firm mind, that I might count
on the support of the townsmen, these reprobates
in cowls should be quickly disposed of; and, as of
necessity, my dues would be much augmented, by
clothing Berchthold with a deputy's authority over
the recovered fields and villages, he should so gain
in men's respect, as to soften the reluctance of the
hardest-hearted Burgomaster in all Germany.
And in what manner dost thou look to me, in
effecting this object?
One of thy understanding need scarce put the
question. Thou hast been long a wife, Ulrike, and
art skilled in the persuasions of thy sex. I know
not thy practice with Heinrich; but when
Ermengarde
would have her way, spite of her husband's
inclinations, she has various manners of coming to
her wishes. To-day she is smiling, to-morrow silent;
now she fondles, and then she frowns; and, most of
all, is she ready in seizing the moments of idle
confidence to press on my unprepared reason the
arguments of kisses and coquetry.
It were idle to say I do not understand you,
Herr von Hartenburg. I wish not to raise the
curtain
of your domestic confidence, nor do I feel
disposed
that any should presume to lift mine. Heinrich
and I pursue our several ways, as each deems
right, though, I trust, always with the harmony of
wedded interests, and I am little practised in the
influence you mention. But, dear as Meta is to the
heart of her motherand surely no shoot from the
parent stem ever gave fonder hopes, or justified
more tender regardUlrike folded her hands, and
turned her meek blue eyes to heavenmuch as I
esteem young Berchthold, who is the child of my
youth's nearest friend; and gladly as I would see
their young hearts for ever bound up in the same
ties of family concord and matrimonial love, the
common parents of lisping laughing babes that
should cluster at my knee, giving the evening of life
some compensation for the chill of its noon-tide
rather than aid thee in this unhallowed design;
rather than do aught, even in rebellious thought,
against the altars of my God; rather than set my
selfishness in array against his dread power, or
fancy wish of mine can prove excuse for sacrilege
I could follow the girl to her grave, with a
tearless eye, and place my own head by her side,
without regret for that calm decline which, when
the weary probation of life is ended, Heaven grants
to the deserving.
The Count of Leiningen recoiled at the energy
with which his companion spoke; for none are so
commanding as the mild when aroused to resistance,
or so authoritative as the good when required to
exhibit the beauty of their principles. He was
disappointed
;
but, though a sort of instinct warned him
that he had no further hopes of gaining the
assistance
of Ulrike, and, almost without knowing it
himself, the respect which he had always entertamed
for his companion was increased. Taking the hand
she extended to him, in amity, the moment her
excitement
had a little abated, he was about to reply,
when a footstep in the adjoining room, and a timid
tap at the door, interrupted him.
Thou canst enter, said the Baron, believing
that one of the castle maidens was without, and
glad for the relief.
A million of thanks for the honor, returned Ilse,
curtsying to the floor as she availed herself of the
privilege. This is the first time so great a favor
ever befell me in Hartenburg, though, when a girl,
as it might be a ruddy maiden like our Meta, I once
was admitted to a closet in Heidelburg. There was
I, and the late Burgomaster, Ulrike's father, and
the good wife, her mother, on a junketing, in our
young days, to see the curiosities of the Elector's
Palace, and we had visited the tun
Thou art sent to seek me? interrupted the
mistress
.
Hath Meta need of her mother?
That may be always said of a certainty, for
girls of that age are like the young of the nest,
Herr Count, who are ever in danger of breaking
their necks, if they take a hasty flight, without the
example of the old to give them prudence as well as
courage. Twenty times each dayI know not an'
it be not fiftydo I say to our Meta, `Do as thou
wilt, child, an' thou dost nothing amiss.' I hold it to be
wrongful to curb young humors so long as they are
innocent; and therefore do I say, that kindness is a
better rod than anger; and, in this reproving and
chastening manner, Herr von Hartenburg, have I
reared both Meta and her mother. Well, here you
both are, in friendly communion, an' you were
children of the same cradle!and Heinrich Frey
is yon, without, tasting the rhenish with the two
churchmen that infect the castle
Thou wouldst surely say frequent, good nurse.
What matters a word, child! Infect or frequent
are much the same, when one speaketh of the gentle
and gay! I remember ye both young and handsome,
and a pair that the whole town of Duerckheim said
ought never to be parted; for if one was noble, the
other was good; if one was strong and valiant, the
other was fair and virtuous; but the ways of the
world led ye on different paths, and Heaven forbid
that I should say aught against ways that so many
travel!
And thou hast left Meta with those that infect
the castle, to come and say this?
Naught like it. It is true I let the girl listen to
a few of their idle words, for without experience a
maiden may not know when to repulse an improper
freedom; but for any levity to escape my eye, were
as impossible as for my Lord Count to fail in duty
to the Limburg altars. No, I complain not of the
stranger nobles; for while he of Rhodes did many
gentle offices in behalf of Meta, the reverend Abb
held me in discourse touching this heresy of Luther,
and, I warrant you, ecclesiastic as he is, he went
not away the worse for my opinion of the schismatic!
We had goodly discourse on the dangers and
tribulations
of the times, and might have had much
learning between us, but for young Berchthold, who
fancied himself beating the forest, by the manner
in which he threshed among the old armor of the
hall, disturbing all present with the idle pretence of
seeking a cross-bow for the Count's pleasure in the
morning; as if the Herr Count would have hunted
with less satisfaction because there were wise words
uttered in his halls! The Hintermayers are a race
I love, but this youth seemeth to be wanting of
respect for years.
And what hast done with my child?
Thou knowest it was thy desire she should say
a few greetings to the fallen Lottchen; and when I
thought the wandering cavalier had had his say, I
beckoned the child away, in order that she might
go to the hamlet on that errand. She will be
none the worse for the discourse with that free
cavalier, for naught so quickens virtue of the pure
stamp as a little contamination with viceit is like
the base metal they put in gold, to make the precious
ore hard and able to undergo many hands.
Thou hast not suffered Meta to go unattended?
Didst ever know me fail in duty? Thy motherly
heart is quick to take alarm, like the bird fluttering
at each leaf that rustles. Not I, in sooth: I sent the
vain Gisela to keep her company, and whispered our
Meta well, as they departed, not to fail to draw
instruction
from her companion's light discourse,
which, I will warrant, turns on naught else but the
gallantries of these strangers. Oh! leave old Ilse
to profit by any thing edifying that may turn up, in
the way of accident! I that never yet lost a good
moral for want of pushing an opportunity! and here
stands Ulrike as proof of what I have done. I owe
you excuses, Herr Emich, for sending away your
forester; but the boy vexed me with his clatter
among the shields and arquebuses, and, in order to
give him a wholesome lesson in silence, I sent him
to see Meta safe to his mother's door, under the
pretence
of its being necessary to have a manly arm
present, to beat off the barking curs of the hamlet.
Does Heinrich know this?
In sooth, he is so beset with thy honor in being
closeted with my Lord the Count, that he does little
besides talk of it, and take his cup. When the child
was thus cared for, by the one who first held her in
arms, and one, too, whose experience is little short
of threescore and fourteen, I saw not the necessity
of calling him from his pleasures.
Ulrike smiled, and turning to the Count, who had
been so much lost in thought as to give little heed
to the words of the nurse, she offered him her hand,
and they left the closet in company.
END OF VOL. I.